      "identifier" : [
         "8_06911_460"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "XVIIL No. 16 MI-E September lSth, 1915 C -AN jAD-L Price 10 Cents 1 Aà N THE BATTLEFIELDS 0F WHEAT Edmonton soldiers helplng te harvest Alberta grain. Shali we blave a khakl harveat next year?",
         "TUE COURIER. Electric Service Means comfort, con- venience, economy and safety. The home that is pletely equipiped electrical devices happy one. com- with is a Ail th.e drudgery of house-keeping is elim- inated by electricity. You can wash, iron, sew, sweep, cook, keep cool in summer and warm in winter, by means of electrical ap- paratus designed especi- ally to relieve you .of unnecessary and fatigu- ing labor. At our showrooms al these devices are ready for y o u r inspection. Competent demonstra- tors will operate- and explain them for you. Theq1 Toron-to Ele âmct riec Light, Company, Limited déAt Your Service\" de St. E. Adel. 404 Mr. Edison's Wonderf ul New mntrument MASTE ST n strumei Just, Out -The ýperfeted musical wonder of the age. And shipped on a stupendous special offer direct from us. W ITE today for our new Edison Citalog-the catalog that tells you ail about the eonde new model Edisoui with Mr. Edison's new diamond stylus reproduoer. It wiUl aiso teill about our new Edison offert -Now read: Keeps the3 Boys 1on, the Farm The city has no lure for the young people In the fara home where tuere is \u003ea new Edison. Ail the attractions of cityr life- the best that the theatres. the opera, the or- chestras and bands cou offer-are brougKht riglit to yerx freside. Home becomes a real home- flotmat a place ta sleep when the day's worlc is done-but a place full 0f lite, action and enjoyment. And thlak of the harvest dance in thse great bara when the crops are gathercd. The nov Edison, of course will furnish the mnusic. Nota squealcy flddle, this time, but the music of a big brasa band ta dance byr. No, your eilidren wiii flot need to go to the city for enjoyrnent tram a horne maie at- tractive ly the nev Edison. It will furilii the life they crave'-and il will lie lite without env of the city's evits. Titsly, your homne wii 1 e- corne a place where your ebildren wiii vau t ta stay, and where your neighbor's viijldren wiii Waut to couse if you have a nov Édisôn. -' Write Today for our noew Edison Cat- alog-tlie cealog that tella yon aIl about the nov model Edison with Mr. Edison's nov Diarnond Point reprodu-er. It yull alan tel, jais .bout our nev Edisont offer. Free ôan fferand your choice of a the brand new records on an absolutely'fre. loan. Hear aIl the waltzes, tw steps, ývaudevilles, rainstrels, grand eperas, old sacred hymns. every kind ( comîc and popular mnusic, also your choice of the highest grade concerts an oiperas, as, rendered by the world's greatest artists. Entertain your famil a jorfriends., Then, whon yeu arc Chrodgh with the. ontfit yoé a Uotbýe a our expenfe. Ronmo, ota pnny do\"n~ de=àui-no guraneeo Cý. o. al tou-oolgtio 0bsafuo rau yrowhoedirect tomn us--direct to yon. ieturnable at our expense or payable (if Yoms Want to keep it) at the actual rock-bottomn price direct from us\u0026 The easo: Wy sliould we mnake sucli an ultra.-lberi The easo : : Wel, w'lltèll you.-we are tremendousi e nd of this magnificent new instrument. When yon get it in Yeur town we 1mev ever boy wvill say that nothing like it has ever been heard-so wonderful, so grand, so beaul fut, such a king of entertalnerrs-so we are pretty sure that at least Boirne one, If not Yo then somebody lwil want to buy one of these mew style Edisons espeidWl as thoy a bem ofere no atthe meut astoundlu roc-bottons une. sd wi eaV teu as low a four dollars a meonthe. Our New Ed.o Catalogf Sent Free F K. BnSO Edisea Plxonouraph Distributors Your nme and address on a NA~ 7828.355 perbelAvé. Wb\" lEsitba postal or in a lette:, (or juàt .CU,1S.neImyoriwEi thse coupon) ia enougis. No Otlgm ul~rLnasu orfe ns obltgationuinl asking, for the on the new model Sdlsom Phonogramz. catalo,-. \u0026et this offer- whfl. tlis off br laste._______ Fi Out the coupon today.Um- F. K. Babson, gâos Phoorail Dibâdm Ad..._ ___ V.i.Ofice, Bdison Blockc, chicaso i Provincial (Ontario) Pa rhoroughly Universal Vacation Terril Midst Wild and Delightful Scenery Ideal Canoe Trips-A Paradise for Campera Splendid Fiahing 2,000 Feet Above Sea Level IIGHILÀND INN affords fine hotel accommodation. Camps \"ýNominigan \" and\" \u003effer novel and comfortable accommodation ai reasonable rates. for illustratedl matter giving fuli partieulars, rates, etc., to C. E. Horning, Union7 Toronto. Ont. k M",
         "COURIDR U, àe, Iâfion a f 0 é-eu Wk Septemnber 1 Sth, 19 15 PERT NENT PARAG RAPH S Sidelights on WhatSome People Think the World is D-ing lAit NICHOLAS la now generalissinio ou'land and sea. .There have been pbetographs of the Czar and the Grand Duke Nicholas, hli. ,cousin; and the Czar up against the giant very wan and puny and juat a littie scared, Ight think. Aise many years ago there was DgraPh of Bismarck and the present Kaiser, lCoked very much liRe the popular dog picture, 1anId Impudence. It looked absurd that, the th of a Prince could ever oust the super-man ck. To many it may seem quite, as ridiculous e littie Czar-should i 11 the boots of the Grand But the Czar anay surprise the world. He ly has the loyalty of the Grand DuRe; and )\u003eGerman Inftuences aIn Russia will be clean out when it's Czar against Kaiser. In whicb e re-echo the last ue of the Rus national -\"'Lçng dive the Czar.\" 'TRY FORD has won the admiration of al Ainerica snd a good part of the worid, for bis practical wisdom In ouducting business reftt.sbaring basis. Just before the war lie KIIlloed te the White House te help Presi- 7ilson discover the psychological reason o! mies. Since the war bis factories bave beeu than ever. Now h ests aside a million dol- be used In a oaupaIgu agalnst war, weuld ,ery soldier .wear a badge labelllng hlm as a SI', offers a large ceuh prize for a bistory '\"that shaîl not maRe demigods of soldiers,\" s kept ali of his '20,000 employees but ten \u003em JelnIng the National Guard. By the sanie )erhaps, Mr. Bryan drives a Ford car. last the only national wonder o! the worlId ee have la te 4ie taken down. The leaning ,Ower of Plsu leld its place among the sacred roniders a good whiie. But the cracked and 119 tower over the Royal Victoria Museum wa had begun te give Pisa a bard run for interest. According to Hon. Robert Rogers' ation by experts, thîs monument te Laurier !e and must corne dowu beforeit begins to )ugh the roof, damaglug our national works It was ne longer possible to patch up the Ls they do witb Engllsh cathedrals. The 'tewer o! art was not built that way. IAb- Iiilts May have hoped that the tower would 2 long as the Tory Government. But the 1 to lbs t«ken ýdown 'by the Tories. ýOISM iu this war le for the moat part un-' 'eCOrded. Mucb that la least talked about al the newsapers is of the grlm variety. O1_tor at the Dardanelles who, lost both legs Sleft on the fleld and, hlmsel! as near deatb lI ceuld be, crawled, frin mu= te man or flded mon a#bout hlm deing what be could e thelr suf!erlngs-ls a greator and grlmmer Lu ho ever could seem te be If he had got terla Cross. That kind of heroism trans- Il humnan decoration, because 14 la the next the lns.pired action of a god CABANES, a French scientlat of high re- Lte, bas wrltten a hlstory of the Hohen- CllerIns. In bis title ho calls thls mone.rchlcal Tlle Dynastie de Degeneres!\" The book has r1eference to the Kaiser, whom lie traces ()mI the Great Elector 1688 tlirougli a pretty 'le Of -onstroslties cropplng ont la bis sen k\u003c, whose chie! regret was tbat lhe could net 4i8 Ow~n funeral; in Frederick William 1,, 'd te 1\u003c111 hie own son by bis own bande and EDstio experiment of prodncing giant soldiera bly nlarrylng bis glgantie guards to tii, biggest women he could lind; again lu Frederick the Great, who taught that a Ring la above ail law; bis nephbew, Frederick, a visionary; and on dewti by direct descent te the present Emperor, in whom the Houe of Hohenzollern cornes to a climnax of moral dege'neracy. It zeems about time the Hohenzollern dynasty went on the international scrap-heap. IMNBU-RG, DUMBA AND C0. have been doing Da fine Uine of business in the United States. Dr. Dernburg, the Kaiser's press agent, bas been deported as an undesirable alleu. Dr. Dumba, the Austro-Hungaiian ambassador, la te follow suit. BIS BACK TOTHE ENEMY The only time a British soidier turna his back te the enemy la when he lB uUing his pecket perle- cope. This la a simple littie instrument conslatlng of two mirrors at rlght an gles, and arranged 80 that It can be adjusted te a Sword or a bayonet and held above the parapet of a trench witheut danger to officer or privat,. Washington does not lRe Deraburgsand Dumba. \"Sorry yeu dîdn't like MY frlend. Dernburg \" !ý the Kaiser. \"Tastes dIffe. Shail I sed _u anýother?\" \"«Sorry you don't appreciate any represeutatîve Dumba,\" says the Emperor Franz Jesef. \"But 1 osan fiud ýplenty o! werk for hirm at home. By the way, there are a number o! able gentlemen la Anstria whose acquaintance you have net Made. Let me know the Rind of man you would lUe te experlment with, and I may be able to accommodate yeu.\"1 The trouble wlth the Dernbnrgs and Dumbas !a that they carry on their expei-imeuts with UnIted States diplomatic psychology instigated by their own governments, and when it cornes te brlnging these International meddlers u-p wlth a short tura, the goveruments o! Germany and Austria are net held responsible. We must conclude tbat Dernburg and Dumba are botb submarlnes. H-- OSE wbo knock about freely la the music and Istudio life of London and Paris say that 'Mdme. Clara Butt, the great Engliýsb con- tralto--now Mns. Kennerly Rumford-was tbe real original of Trllby. Perbaps when Trilby was wrlt- ten, la 1894, or thereabouts, -the super-contralto o! magnificent proportions may have sulted Du Maurler's notions cf what Trilby w'as. She hersait tboughtý se. for she is snld to have struck Trllby attit udes on the plat!orm, lu erder to make a bit. Tlme works changes. The contralto ls stilI great. But any Svengali who sheuld undertake te hypnotize the' Clara Butt o! -the present day would need te hypnotlze the audience to maRe thern belleve, le was delng 14. ANDREW CARNEGIE, arch-paclfist and Iron- master, please taire notice. Be net dis- couraged, Andrew, Laird of Shibo. There ls ,stlll peace la the world. Y'our Illustrious friend WIl- helm tbe Kaiser is stili working for Veace. A year ago no)w you mayh'ave doubted this, wben he began te devastate Europe. At -that time yon were tee old to looR wlth ceniplacency on tbe destruction of preperty that to rebulld would make a boom la Iron and steel. You 'had built the million-dollar Peace Palace at The Hague, and 'it began te look lRe a peaceable white -elephant. TaRe 'bear O peace pro- pagandist. The white elephant is flot dead. Lo and behold, your peace-worshlpplng War Lord bas offered te submit two cases to The Hague Tribunal. One le tbe lndemi1ty over the unspeakable borror o! the Lusitania. The other la the question of whetber or net the Arabic lntended te mam the U boat that sunk ber wibout warning. So If you wlill abandon Skibo an1d open up tbe Peace Palace at The Hague, you may have a nice, comfortable time keeplng on fyle the questions which the Kaiser, having smashed ail international iaws, la now wlllng to subn\u0026t te the tribunal of international law. And when the Allies have finished theý war, tbese questions may cerne up as it was la the days o! oid. SENATOR HUMBERT speaks eut once more lRe a man la prepbeoying victory for French $-inch guns and the Ailles agalnst the guns of the Gerinans. It was Senator Humbert, Member o! tbe Senate Committee 'ou Mllitary Affaire, whe, before the war made the revelations about Frenucb boots anrd Prencb unpreparedness for a grsait war. He now writes for the Associated Pressa e statement o! vie- tory wbich for real perspleaclty based upon observa- tion gees the orations of Premier Viviani one botter. Hle says: 11I have beard that a German officer boîasted that the treepa of the Kaiser would itake Calais whenever they willed, by 'paylng the prîce,' whleh be set up as 50,000 Riiled. Tbis boaut la sllly. The Germans can pay our terrible three-incb guns a bloody price o! 50,000 or 500,000 men If they pîsase without gettlng- anywhlere. France in any case lias had for centuries the geniua for artillery. Once more as bas given a proo! of this lu lier marvelous three-luch guns, whicb ne German cannon anywhere near approaclies lu ýperfecion.\" This la sorne o! the best practical proo! yet te band of wbat France la doing. XVIIIL No. 'l6",
         "THlE COURIER. Six binders drawn by a \"caterplilar\" engine did thý.harve\u0026tîng this.year on the 4,160-acre Crowfoot Farmn in Southern Alberta. The six binders m\u003c( down the crop ln a 48-foot awath. The coat of the' binders and engine alone wouid ýb. equal to the value of a good crop on a fair-aized farm. FPIGHTING THE\"« BATTLES 0F WHEA' \u003c News of our great Agricultural Army Now Operating in the Grain-fields OCTOBER, 1915, wili see te greatest drive ever set lu motion ln this country. By that timieVile blggest vileat crop ever produced, ln Canada w1il be on tile inarel out frein t)xe praiýries to thle markets of Great Bri'tai. Au army of farmers ln beilind Vthe me'vement. Thle f ar- me rs of thle West til year, wiil have semevilere ln thle nelghbourhood of 200,000,000 busilels of viheast te nieve out of thle country by rail and water, thon- sanda of miles Vo the Britishl consumer and tile armIes I tile tronches of France and Flanders. Thie total crop of ail grains eetimated til year for Vile country west of thle Great Lakes varies froin 537,000,000 Vo 566,000,000 buailels. Of tuis, about two-flftis ln bulk, qulte ilf lu velgilt and mucil more bilan bal i value wlll be vileat. The loveet mean average of the roslesit estimates gives tile West nearly 100,000,000 busilels more vileat tbus year tilai last. IV is Vthe whleat tilat meves out. And, it ls tile icrëa.se hi tile ileat bushelage that, wifl maire tile transportation ln Canada tis year Vile most compli- cated labour of Hercules Canada eèver ilad. Call lb Patrofsm and Production, or just plain production-or paradox. 'gut It ilappens tilat just wilen we have the most wheat to move we have ln slgilt Vile leat macilnery for moving iV beyond Vile termnal elevatýors. In ail probabillty, before navi- gation closes, 100,000,000 bushels o! grain 'wiil have been railed te tile speut of tile ihopper at Vile great lakes termiais. Prom past expprlencie, lese tilan haîf til ameunt caa be carrled down thes lakes and out te Canadian ports. The balance vill have te geV an outiet tilrougi Ainerican ports just about Vthe Urne when tile belated bilon-bushl wiloat crop of the United States 'sets on its grand imarcil eut. 'T HERE ýIs ne doubt about Vthe capabliVy of thle Ibox car and railway en.d of our transport systera Vo ilandie til colossal cumulative mass o! wiieat. The tle-up must occur at Vile Montreal and eastern elevators. Our silips are noV as numerous as tiley weTe, in Vthe yýears vilen ve had leas 'wheat to ±port. Many of thoni are ýbusy raasporVing troops and munitions o! war. Tile war can't wait. Sene of Vile vileat muet. Joffre and Frenich and, Kitchlener viIi noV declare a war 'holiday ln order Vo geV Oanadlan vileat acrose Vile Ablaziblo. Steaau- shlp corapanles can't meve Vile vient fast eneugil witilout sufficlent silips. Governinenta must aet, Th~ie Canadian Premier bas already sald that fadIi- ies, would be pI'ovided te ive Oanada's record crop, Hie does not say vilat fae4litles, Negotlations are said to b. undfir vay. As thle Iniperial Go'rernmeat has reqWltifoned \u003cCanadlan -ships for var purpoes, will It also provIde otiler sips for vileat purposeg? 'lime vil tell. Meanwhhle, Vile fariner array le busy speeding up the meveinent that vill Vax Vthe capaelty of rà.lways and steameilips and elevabors and corporations and goverziirnt8. Tiat army began Vhe iaovement lasV f all in extra fali plougblng. It took it up again tht,; sprhrg wti more and more By NORMAN S. -RANKIN gasoline tractors and ilorse Veams bilan ever vere kuowu before. Nature jolned Vile movement vîtil Vile fineest series of cop-making ventiler programmes over seon la Vilat grain empire 800 miles east te vest and, 350 miles soutil Vo nertil. Tiers vere bad veatiler zones, but Viley vere scattered and dld flot materially affect thle output , in fLnia aect uI ivIMVàlIII vvnC«2., - -àUS ln uflW TiSta, the heads were six Inches long. Tile season opened earîler bilan usual. \"Precipita- tlon,\"' as Vile scitntists cail iV, began la good ti. At oe Urne optimistes jolned vitil pessImiste ln pre- dlctlng an ovrplus o! rain. Thle ventiler visard, Fester, from across Vthe lUne, gave out a dark Iati- matioa that noV a inder vould be ln operatloa weet of thle great les. Poster vas fooled. Ceres, tile crop god, chose a psychologloal m~oment vilen old Sol was put Into commission Vo ripen Vile that vas headed eut on a. Votai grand area 589,023 acres. For tilree weeks at Vile most c Vume most of Vile -grain boit had gond weath( And îV vas a,,vast empire of grain ileada-' oats, barley and fax-raved about by expert amateurs of ail descriptions. Some of Vile fields of Vile, West are toc Immense Vo be vOl i-til thle naked eye except from a roof. TI joke about Vile fariner startig off te plougil true many a tzue. \"Why -doee he bil 111 good-bye?\" asked Vile tendrlooV. \"'Oh, ile'S off Vo plougil and ile vonV be balci VIll iiext 1 was Vthe reply. \"lYen se, il; Vakes a week ou' Vo go from one end of a furrov Vo Oie otlE back again.\" A triflo exaggerated; but some of these faru o! fabulous slze-4,000 acres and more. Til8Y corne rlgilt te Vthe front Vila year. In Alberti Vo be apecifie, Vibre are a fev of Vilese planta George Lane\u0026--cattle-breeder and old-tiflOr Burns, Oie cattIe king; thle Noble farn at ford; the Crowloot f arm Iu tile Irigation Ble(li A ND It was on these big farme Vilat the rush f th biner mahiner ile h siens o! a spectacle. RV vas a ilungry Ye blziders. *MY klngdoin for a binder,\" shout agricultural Richard Il. \"Binders,' binder8- blnders.\" On thle Crowfoot larm, six blii40l out beilind a caterpillar locomotive tla\u003et lookl eue of Vilese German siege guns in transit cut a swatil 48 feet wide-elgilt foot te a bindei if pulled by herses would take two Veazas. Binder Vvlne became an imediate r Bushelage and strav had increased vith In' farming. Ordinaxy years some o! tilese fieldi Vve pounds of twlne Vo Oie acre. Tis yeari the' Oiree and a ilf pounds. Frein a place called ý iu Alberta,\\ cornes Vile Informnation tilat la sexii ( six pounds cf twine vas needed for an acre. Voeu. na been fetclhlng ln Vvlne by carload suppleinent Vthe under estimakes of Vile farnO1 IV vas Oie iligiest average cf crop eiver kno'w Vile greaeet record o! individual big crops. Ini A Vile average jumped from. 20.19 busell te 23 bu Individual creps vent as 111gh as 40, 50 anid 54 bueilels. Estimates of froin 30 Vo 50 bu5il0ý acre bave cerne ln froin ail parts of botil PrOv In Oihe Irrigation Block, close Vo Calgary, the mates are even greater bilan these. w doubt,\" eald Immigration Commeesloner J. Walker, after a tour of thle West, recentlY, as regarde quanblty and quallty, tIV le ie t I have ever seen.\" Mr. Walker le conserv\u0026t hie staVements, and knovs tilerougilly vhal speaks about.",
         "TH1E COURIER. on the land wliere lie iast year raised 400 bushels )Otatoes to thie acre, a crop of Marquis wheat, Ilated by beet-growers from ail over the country, un1 60 bushels per acre, at least. At Medicine a crop of 36 acres ln the Woldliester District led 54 bushels to tlie acre, and ibridge now raîses its estimate of 1' Yield from 30 'bushels ýto 35. ~lnating the water4oprtimlsm fromn ,hese statements, we are conserva- y able to, deduct a crop yield con- rably lu excess o! anytliing tlie t lias yet produced. i'hat -wiîî the crop be?\" is tlie ques- that tliousands are asking. Figure It yourself from. -the government's nates, But do flot forget that the area, of WesernCanada is roughly niles long by 350 wide--a huge ter- Y to generalize about. Vîce-Presi- 13ury of the C.P.R. says«240,000,000 e1a o! wheat, and another compe- a-utioity raises hlm 10,000,000. A amount of new land, hitherto un- Vated, lias this year been brouglit r 01r01, owing to a great extent, to Mforts made by the Canadian Gov-, enlt to encourage furtlier cultiva- to feed the warring ailied nations. \u003efservative estimate of tlie addi- 1 land under cultivation is 10 per' d the mien to liarvest tliis crop? 'he first time in history the West inMen east. Britishi Columbia lia lts unempîoyed down to the prairies Lther tlie -whleat, oats, barley and And somie 0f'tlie soldiers wlio IlOt Yet gone to tlie front are lielp- lie Empire on the battlefields of P'ORTS from ail parts of Western Caniada more than two weeks ago ildieated liarvesting well to com- 11, witli threshing in swing at Parts. In Alberta, cuttlng first at Letlibridge, wlntei- wlieat, on Bringing up 3t 5, whule In Saskatchewan, the nlation to' land Is that it comxnenced at unon August 9, Marquis wheat, and ait ýiey tl Prelude wheat, on thie same date. the Western ýCanadIan farmer Is-to use ni that lias recentîy become familiar-fully ized. He can take the field at an instant's and lu force. Waltlng the order to ce, Virhole batteries of machines were ' 11P in line, and not very far behind tliem, ýavY artiilery, the threshlng machines, are 3eing examined and repaired, every -wheel Ouied, every part assembled, everythlng in less; whle tlie elevators, tlie fortresses that \u003ehold the prisoners, have been overhauled uit ir, order so tha teil, capaclty shahl be to the demand. This -was the situation a 1 ago; to-day, the army, tlie maclines, and evators are at work-and overtime-evon nlday. *furtlier, fact le wortliy of notice. Fertile !tli water and sunshlne will produce crops. V'eat 'las tlie fertile soul and the sunshine, 'i Year it lias had wliat -w-ilprobably prove the record 'rainfall for thIrteen years. g the montlis o! April, May, June and July raln fell In Southern Alberta than during hOle o! last year. In that district the ramn- *;t Year tutalled 10.18; to the end of July ear it '-as 11.47. In spite of tlie floods thnt Place In July, and whiJlI it was feared WAa-sli out tlie cropà in many places, tlie SCrop in the hletory of tlie West Is being g in Winnipog last week, Hon. Frang'm Miniser of Railways, conflrmed. wliat Sir Robert Borden liad previously said about the provision of slips adequate to transport tlie export crop. Sir Robert liad told himi tînt complote arrange- ments liad been made to liandie ahl wlieat seeking an outiet until tlie end of September. the heavy artillery. Threahing wheat, thousands of bushe at Indian Head, Saskatchewan. Wheat loaded by a stock mnachine is dumped out like a Ioad of graVel for threshlflg, at Pense, Sask. 5 \"After that,\" lie said, \"furtlier arrangements wili be made. The Admiralty will release more slips, as they are required for thîs purpose, and I do flot anticipate any difmculty. It is a question, however, of how mucli wlieat will be offered. At present the farmers may flot want to seli.\" Wlietlier farmers choose to seli or flot in great quantities at present, thie fact remajm, that the wlieat Must lie got out before next harvest. The Mlan Who, Would Not By NORMAN PATTELSON. B EFORE tlie war, if you asked a young man to go into training as an officer in tlie militia, lie would not. Before tlie war. if you asked a ridli fathor to encourage lis son to do theo liard work of a lieutenant in tlie militia, lie would not. Before tlie war, if you asked an em- ployer of -labour to givo ten per cent. of lis men two weoks' lioliday to go to .camp\" to get their annual drili, lie would flot. Before tlie war, if you souglit sul- scriptions to buy bandi instruments, cookors, macliine guns for liard-drilling volunteer regîments, tlie man with money to spare would not. Before tlie war, if you asked a Cana- dlan motlier to encourage lier son to iearn rifle-sliooting, s0 that if danger ever tlireatened lie would be able to take lis sliare of home defence, she wouid not. Bofore tlie war, if you euggested to a County Council or a City Council tliat it should give an annuai grant to tlie local rogiments within ite boundaries, tliey would not. Before tlie war, If you argued witli a bla a day, Ujniversity President that thero sliould be military training at every university, because a large supply of citizen army offcors would do away witli tlie neceslîty of a standing army, lie would nof. 1 Bofore tlie war, Lord Straticona established a fund for tlie pliysioal training of scliool-hoys. Dr. James L. Huglies tried to induce tlie scliool- inspector ia overy county in Canada to encour- age bis teacliers to earn part of this fund, but lie would not. Beforo tlie war, wliea the students of govera- ment suggested tliat more business-iike metliods of administration sliouid be lntreducod lato tlie government departments at Ottawa, tlie mem- ber o! Parliament laughed and weuld flot. Before the war, If you euggeeted that tlie phy- sical and moral qualities of the people were more important than minerais and fIlheries and puhp-wood, and stocks, and reai estate, and gen- erai money-making, tlie man Who heard you dubbed you a dreamor, and lie wouid flot. Before tlie war, wlin an Intelligent citizen was aeked to thinkover tlie situation and try to mako up lis mînd as to wlietlier lie sliouid put bis citizensliip boforo lis partlsanshlp lie weuld. fot. Before the war, if the average citizen was asked to admit that lis wife, lie daugliter, lis sons and hie woaltli, beionged to tlie State if the State chose to caîl upon hlm to surrender tliem, lie would not. Since tlie war, Canada lias got a now viow of liersoîf and lier citizons a new view of tlieir citizenship. Tlis is tlie most remarkable fea- ture of the war-period-not tlie number of soi. diers nor tlie bushls of wlieat, but tlie trans- HIE ýCHOICE-By VANCE PAL-MER A,, Love Story Full of Psychology and Oriental Col.our were plylng backwards aad 3s the water like ssnall ia Ild the cries o! the boatmen Parrled with one another i lner wlth the rod funnels ail ilie gathered ahl manner o! e hove to tho effect was th Id by busy ants. But the lwartlug lier as everything iblng town, tenarrow-thro the Petty commerce of theJ etch of water on wblch the lis ishop, Beverley could 5001 iemseives from the Wharf -0 or three motor laundlies i frettod about buslly. Sue eePinýg wltli the lazy heat of for- afternoon, and the temlier o! the towa. Even ln sects the mhain street and lu the Dalm-shaded walk above, rang peope lounged about wlthi lazy indolence, or hay back ii re- ln their rlckshawz as if enoug1i effort wore to bie pped found ln watdhlng the autwxmatlo movement o! thoîr craft coolies' legs. There was Semething lu Beverley's at of fibre that kexjt hlm f rom lpping into the shoth and Bluff eoftness of the East, and a look o! impatience fiitted else across his face as he glalced UP and dowu the s-treet. ~ated '-Confound that boy,\" lie said to himsel!. \"Ho ouglit hast, to hiave -been back an heur ago. The youug waster sun- is piaylug fan-tan ln some side-street or other, l'il guaraateo. Perhaps r'd bet.e go inysel!.\" nore Ho bit the end off a fr081 cigar, and made his way anad down te the Bound. At the nets ln thse phaylng- wlth ground near the water a few Young mon in flaniiels hl a were languldly knocking about the balls that the tho plgtailed Chinese boys tossed up to thens; It seemed to him tisat the boys were the only ones te get any amusement from the actlvîty. heped ana sampa.n at the atone landngpRae aid te d mnoan sitting huddled up over a bowl o! rice sprang qulckiy t0 tlie swlvel oar in the bowe. \"I'm -net likely to meet anyone 1 know,\" was the thought that ficked tlirougî Beverley's braîn as they moved off. Yet it was that llkelibood, more than anyt-hlug else - that kept hlmi from leaving his carde personally on Mnost of thse liners tliat entered Hong-Kong iroadstead. Ho had stepped eut e! bis social caste \u003cliberately, and 14 did not hurt hlm to know that when hie name lhltered througli the casual smoke-room. talk 14 was handled carelessly; that hoe was looked upon as a tinit o! the scattered clan e! uGentleman-Once.\" That point of viow was easy te haugli away, for the liardniess in bis fibre that had kept hlma clear e! oye,",
         "firm-muscled, anil free from ail the flabbiness tbat the East smears upon the weak, had aise mnade hlm insensitive. It mattered nothing to him that as curlo- dealer lic was looked down upon by a handfui of men lie dcspised. There were others thougli before wbom It wouid not be s0 easy to carry himself as jauntiiy. The big bull of -the liuer towered over tbem as they tossied about in their ýcockle-sbcil of a craft. There were traders hurryiug up the gangway, and passengers coming down. Somewhere up In the spaces o! the maln-dcck an excited voies said: \"Oh, dad, I sbouid hike to go ashore in one of those sampans.\" The person addressed, a stout, cleric oid .gen- tleman witb a white hlmet and coloureil giasses stirred. slightly in bis deck chair. The worry and bustie of going ashore seemed to have an effect on oneor more of those elaborate Illnesses lie had corne East te combat. \"Don't lic foolish, Nina,\" lie said, brusquely. \"The launcli will be heredirecthy. Can't you aec it coin- ing, Mac?\", The tall, dark man who was lounging by tlie rails said, siowly: \"Ys-it's coming now.\"1 IT edged up slhntiy feeling its way to the bottoin of the gangway. The girl leaning over the side was absorbcd In watcblng a !aiiy sampan ln which an airnond-cycd baby playcd about, securely ticil to the mast by a cou of rope, whule a couple of fowls clucked In a cage at the bows. Her brown eyes were fuIl of Interest, but U4 was liardly this or any other particular thing that made ýtbem giow, nor was it the scen~t andl celour o! the East. Se stoodtapping one o! the iowcr rails witli ber poInteil sboc. and the wind billowed out lier blouse o! white silk that was curt 10w at the neck. \"Corne aiong, Nina,\" said lier father, at iast, \"1al the rest are going. 1 doni't belleve that confounded steward bas brouglit my dressing-case up from the cabin. . . . Hallo, wliat's this? Another hotel advertisement?\"1 Beverley hll comes up the deck and presenteil bis card. \"No,\" lie sald, briskiy. \"Just a reminder tha-t if you want some rare olil china it can be lad at that address. I don't want to brag, but we bave oppor- tunities o! acquirlng it that éthers havcn't. We have a buyer continuaiy In the Interlor, and lie knows every bit o! pottery that's worth havinag froin Lhazsa to Newolwang-\" HIe went on 'talking ini an extravagant style that was not habituai to hlm, for just then lie partlcularly wantcd to feel at case. Under the deck-awnings lie stood, big and voluble ln bis white ducks and yacht- ing-cap, a rather cynioai smlle twlstlng 'bis lips, as If lie werc listenlus to some automatlec heap-jack, THlE COURIER. while the girl watched hlm strangely. He did nlot once glance at lier, thougli every nerve and fibre of hlm seemed aware of hier gaze. As for Nina, bier brain seemed cbiefly alive to physIcal impressions, to the way lie had broadened and filied out, to the dark tan of bis face, and bis careless, aggressive mariner. She stood by the rails as if numbed, while lier f atber crusbed tbe card ini bis hand and .passed on. Then, as Beverley came up to bier, slie said, drily: \"You don'tseemn to reinmber me.\" \"Ob, I think so,\" bie said. \"You are Miss Nina Brayne, aren't you?\" \"Hfow clever of you to think of the name.\" \"Not at ail,\" lie said, careiessly. \"I've got a fairly long memory. I'm not always as grateful tu it as now, tliough.\" T HERE was somethlng qulte pointlessly unreal about bis pollteness, and it chIlied. ber into reserve. She becaine very mucli aware o! the space of time that seemed -to corne down suddenly like a porteullis and shut ýoff everything that was waitlng to be sald. He at once became part o! the surroundings that were strange and alien to lier. \"What have you been doing ?\" she asked, 'at lat. \"Oh, anything,\" lie said, fiippantly. \"At present if you want any china or oid curies, I can fit you :out. 1 don't thinli I bappen to have a catalogue with me.\" ,He feit in is plockets, and there seemed something Ironie about bis action. IMac's liere,\"1 she said, quickiy. \"HIe traveiled over wlth us.\" \"Naturally,\" \"1t, was Just by chance lie happened to loin the saine boat. He liad te take a six-inonths' holiday or risk a break\"down. ,I think he's looking af'ter the baggage now.\" She glanced over to where the stewards were f uss- ing about with suit-cases and liand-luggage at tbe bead of the ýgangway. \"Tell him. I'd like ýto see hlm when he's -got any lime to spare,\" lie saicd, abruptiy. \"He'll know where to flnd me--at least 1 gave your father a card. Good- byefor the present. 1 miay happen to Sse you again before you leave.\" There was a 1sting in biýs bow, and the cool way in which lie sauntered off. » Her face was flushed as she rejoined lier father, wbo was sitting htmself In the launcb. and adjusting bis smoked glasses. \"«Who was tbat ?\" lie asked, \"Yeu seexned to know him, Nina.\" She looked out abs'ently over tlie strip of dancing w'ater. \"Mr. Beverley,\" she said, \"a friend o! Mac's. HIe came East four Or five years'ago.\"1 \"Beverley,\" lie said, tbougbtfuliy. \"Beverley? yes, I remember. That young man who--well, I suppose it's no good raking that up now.\" S IIE re-arranged bier skirts and looked 11P b main deck wbere Beverley was wanderiflg distributing is cards among the few remai passengers. Ie seemed unconcerned and iritent the inatter in band. In truth, the re wýas a hlo0 impressions busiiy sorting tbemaselves out in] brain, and.,combining with that fund of cyBIl wbich most men carry secretly hidden in their as a weapon for tbeir own protection. He waSI by the added -sincerity and depth tbat had coins bier eyes, and tlie lack of tliat provocative CccU which. was once so apparent, but time iniglit tauglit lier that tbe most effective art conceais i Tbe sampans were now scurrying towards ,sbore, and tbe iast passenger bail left the i Beverley sauntered down the gangway, and sli into bis own boat, lying back in the bows scribbling a note as they headed, towards the sli \"I must see Mac,\" lie thouglit. \"Tbere's no re at ail wliy lie should try to dodge me.\" And wben tbe string bandl 'was piaying that 1 in, a littie caf e overiooking tbe water, lie st In and teok bis seat near the window. He waS derlng a good deai how Ma-c would look, and m'hl there was any possibillty of! resuming that frlendship that bad knit together their boyhood.. thin mist o! bis cigarsmoke quickened lis vl and bie saw again tbe two of tbein in knickers, figl each otlier's batties doggediy; then at collegý gether breaking the same ruies and burning the aliowance of midniglit oul franticaiiy just bef0rn exams. came; then again- as young mnen settil-g ln company for the'long struggie, careless Of thiug till tbe irony of. things brouglit about the smash. The band was playing an airy waltz, andl tbr the open window lie couid see the liglits of a -' of slips winking ac ,roassthe water. Thie soft fit~ of the tropic nigilt seemed to touci ýail tbing9s ca ingly and lay a speli upon tbemn. \"Weil, Phul said a voice behind bim. HIe turned round to see Mace standing there, 10,c unconfortaÉble and. 1,11 at case, inclined, to a fc and exaggerated geniaiity. it mails hlm stîff en self unconsciousiy. \"Weii,\" was ail lie could say. They ,sat down together, and the Chinese lvurried up with a traýp and glasses. Tbe talk foillowed was about trivial things, and they Wat ecd other closely as m\u0026n do wbo know th8.t wor\"l are divorced from the reahity o! their thElW Mac's thin, dark face bad become lincd and flirro a'nd bis eyes were a littie resticas. (Continued on page 17.) GERMANY'S TASK IN RUSSIA A nother Optimistic Article Based -Upon Sound Military Observation MYlast article polteil out somte o! the diffi- culties w'blcl lieset thc !urthcr progress e! the Germnans int Russia, as a prelimlnary for examlning the probabilty o! any traas!er o! consîderabie forces frein Poland into Flanders, dwclliiug specialily on the impossibility o! consohl- datlug a hastlly reconaîructeil raiiway la the lime liefore the comlag o! tbe autunin raîns. The crea- tion o! gi\u003eod roads-it would have to lie \"creation,\" because there are no inelalied roada in Russie- would be an ebvieus method o! alleviallng the situa- tion, but, un!ortuualely for the Gernuans, tlicy are la this case s.iso up againsl physical difficulties equaily insuperable under the lmitations o! lime andl labour whlcli confront 11cm, because there 15 no material o! any 'description except tiuuler la the wbole theatre o! operations, nlot even gravel lu the river lieds. Tii a somewhal similar case la Baluchistan w. had te imnort our ballast for rallways bly sea frein Erng' land, visa Karachl-an expedienit obvlouaiy imnpossible te Gerunany at thc present lime. Even timber for corduroy roads, at besî a poor expedient for jrealiy heavy traffic, la oniy avaihable lu the immediate vlcinity o! lbe forestS, for the Germaus bave no, longer any borses to spare for baulage, as the Rus, sians have thlven thein ail before themin l thoir retreat. Tbese are flic bed-rock \u003cacts la lhe situa- tien, wblch people who niake war frein their aria- chairs consistently overlook, sand science witlioul time andl labour at ils command is as powerless te ovcrcouc 11cm as w. wcre lu the Cimea more than bal! a century ago. THEN AND NOW. IT is odd bpw close Is the paralci between the situationts then and now. Tbere, toe, our pro- greas depended upon bbc accumulation o! siege artlllery and am.unilin in quantilies adequato te level the, Russian parapets with lhe gr\u003c\u003eund, but thrqughout thie long winter the two miles o! muil separabig the harbour o! Balaklava. \u003croui the basea depots delayed aIl prgestli the wea.tber condi- lions changed, and even lIen tIings went elowly By COL. F. N. MAUDE, C.B. enougli; but for eacli mile we then had te traverse the Germnans now must cross aimost a bundreil. Little aid, therefore, can lie expecteil by the Germans froin any visible means of communication except the raiiways, and since ut takes days to accumulate animunition enougli for a single day's igling, ber further ailvance can only take place liy a serles o! spasmodic efforts, w'hlch can only i'ecur at fixeil time intervals, the duration o! wbicli Lhe Russians, knowlng the extent o! damage tliey in- fliiteil on the bridges andl track, can estimate witb a considerabie approacli to accuracy. The Germian lieavy guns must o! necesslty be divided into groups, because net only would no man ln bis senses dreain of dlstriliuting Ilica uniformiy, say, one te thc mile o! front, but because, lieing depeudent on the rail- ways, tliey muest remain ln close proximlty to thein, because the difficulty o! laIerai distribution frein the railway depols reniains in any case. On the ilays, therefom'e, wlien the German guns break ont into actlvity, îhe Ruasiaus, wlio, bclng at present unliampereil by heavy transport, possess thie ailvantage of mobiiity, can operate belweeu the fanks o! 'the groupa o! siege artillery, andl then wlien the necessary pause in the tre o! the latter sets la tley can press forwar4 agalu by siege inethods andl threaten le stornm the works by whicli the siege guns are proteotcd ln suob a mariner that aay move or wi$thdrawal o! lte latter becomies an1 impossibility. But as 50011 as the Russlan trooPs arrive in adequate numbers-and sooner or laer tbis superiority must lie established-lba pressÈ on thie intervals lietweei the siege-gua groups must become se beavy thal wllbdrawal becomes a uecessity, and how that willh. drawal lis b lie effected ln face o! au army which bam proveil itseif superior ln ail fors o! normal fighllng-i.e., w1thoul lIe support o! heavy guns-la a problein I wlll lcave te Ihe Gei!maa Staff tc\u003e settle; and I 'do ni\u003et envy thein the taelc. O! course il Is Impossible te state wi'tb accuracy liere in Englanil how long 8uch a condition maly endure; -but one lias oniy to consider wbat would happen if the relative difference la efficiend3 ýtwo sides became extrenie-I.e., If the Russa as superior te tie Gerinans la flghtlng power the British were te the mulineers la India or as superior In aumbers as the Allies WE the French aftcr Leipzig,, wben tbey sîniPl gardeil bbc fortresses bell by thc latter an' on throiÎgh tbe gaps lietween Ihein on their Paris. The idea, is the saine; the differei oniy la degrce. RUSSIANS AS FIGHTERS. T HAT the Russianls are superlor as figliters ~tain, primarly on their exploits hast Y' in particuhar by tlie extraordlnary cour' endurance they displayed in the ieng-drawn-01 o! combats la the Carpathians, wbere the XIý the grounil andl cliniate denied theni evezi degree o! support la their attacks w'hich thei complemient o! fild artllery wouid oticrwi afforded llicm. Andl that the Germans !ully r( Ibis supcriorily 1 deduce from thie fact th have been compehleil te abandon ahi their 1 conceptions as to the value of mobilliy andl 1 the slege artlillery solution as the onhy 1 methoil of placing themacêlves on an equali their castern adversaries. Tliey are as weil aware o! ail these Poil ami aysel!, because wc ail drew Our insplratio ,tialy from. the~ saine source, eften frei tl persons; and ia everythlng blisy have do]] their great off ensive broke down hast winte see ýoniy a seriea o! ýdesperale eff orts t0 diplomatic opinion by the extent o! thie tel and local successes galueil. They, the Stal qulte well that anytýhing approachlng a deciý tory is uow beyond tbeir reacli, and hope 0: they may lbe able te coaceal their own mtr",
         "THlE COURIER. WINSONE SABLE ATOM. Pomeranian awned by G. E. Ward, Toronto. Firat in classes under 8 pounds. «AUTY BOY AND LADY FLOSSIE e of poodie$ in-the show. Owned by Mrs. Gammon, Hamilton. DAYDREAM AND BUTTERFLY Prince Charles Spaniels, shown by the Celamo Ken- ne. Both winners of fîrets. OAKLEY RED ROSE aniel owned by F. M. Whittemore, mwn, Ont., winner of two firsts. oral c SHOW ME A GERMAN! Coster's Diamiond, winner of one first and four seconds. Owned by H. A. Wilson, Toronto. 'icago. White Bull« M re. W. L LUCKY WEAVER AND CALMO PERFECTO, Cocker Spaniels, shown by Mrs. F.* W. Lewis, To- ronta. Winners Of six 'prizes. O BELL rs. T. F. Stevens, To- of two fi rats. Engllsii Toy Spanlel, shown by Mrs, A. G. Lester, wlnner of a tirSt.",
         "THE OCOURIER A GREAT ARTIILLERY PHOTQGRAPH put have made this picture, whlch as an epic rivais any of the fabulous labours of Hercules. These Russian sappers and gui Id cannon over a speclally built track on to a temnporary platform built cf tree-trunks and pine-wood slabs. The gu.n is nme big wheeis runnlng on the grounid, low truck wheels operatlng on railWay tracks. lt was flot built for gasoline traction, a~ fieId-plece capable of transportation anywhere, even over «the swamps of Russia. The only probsmn seema te be getting nie i to inove it And this picture of movirng a great Russlan gun, taken in Poland, la one of the great epical photographs of the PICTURES By G. WARD PRICE In London Daily Mail IT is often the trivial tbings that brlng out the bItterness. o! war. A party of French soldiers, on their way frein bospital te 'à convalescent home, were waiting the «ther day in Creil Station for tbe train. Some, witb arme bung lu neat white elIngs, still had the healtby flush of face wblcii a year's soldier- Ing iu aIl weatbers bail given thein. Those whose greater injuries had kept them. for months lu sickly smellixig wards were pale and baggard, and their tre'ncb-stalned bIne uniforins hung meagrely upon their shrunken frames. A gruif sergeant was calling tbe roll, cbecking eacb naine on the tally as its owner rose frein the row of forme where the convaleOscenits were sittiag and crossed over te tbe otiier side of tbe roo«n. 'Durand,\" bie called. \"Hfere, sergeaxst,\" was the answer, as a younig man, walking almeest buoyan'tly, despite his sbattered arm, rose froin the littie group. \"Legrand.\" -\"Here, sergeant,\" and the full-bearded ifatber of 'a faiuily, happy to bave escaped with w'hat the French soldier bas learned te call a \"good wound,\" fellowed it.\"1 Th~e reply came w sitting by the tablE lers, bowever, but sta Ln,\" exolalmed the Seri Stand np!\" shouted t The children playlng in the beautiful gardens cf the CJhamps Elysees are always the prettiest siglit iii Paris. That stretcb, only a few hundlredý yards long, of carefully tended î[owerýbeds and dainty lawns bld- den amiong the trees is iu summer the mosýt charming part of the most, beautiful capital ln Europe. The little girls, dressed as if tbey were beautiful big dolls, axe the most exquislte of ahl the frowers ln the gardene. Their gaies and make-beleves under the ýtrees go on just ais tbey always did. The old women who run the tiny roundabouts and swings, the little boys who Iead the goat-crÉe hav known no falling-off lu their prosperlty since the war began. Silvery equeals of lauglitei, the flaehing of sturdy little white legs over skipping-ropes, scain- perings ami ball-catcbing, and the immemoriai Punch amd Judy at the corner are just as vigorously carried on as if the Gerinans were thousands of miles away instead of only sixty. But one cbange bas, Indeed come, tboiigh very -it ilie h~'iliirpn iiqv, not notieed it. Wnell uJ with a lo7senge-sbaped mark on thein f man dead. Fields that are heavy witb the earth's eternal reproduction are do with these marks of man's desltxict\u003en. Mile alter mile bas its soidiers' gravi bore, clustering thickiy there, on the, SI bills, in the heai't of the vaileys, in the v of the cottages, andinl the màiddle of -that are repeopled now but were: then every emblein of life but bsttle. lit was a partieularly impressIve visit cause I was here for two days while -that ftlid these graves was going on. field ln wbicb I stumbled over the dea( Zouaye, killed an hour before, lylng oi among the clover. lt is golden with col but one of the crosses that rise amn must be bis grave. The village le busy work again wbere I tallved with the 'ou ecomrades, two of thema living-and ea.tin ,cheese without concern-wbile the third themn dead. The woods wbere the Chasseurs d'-A streaning gal¶antly by on their white are sleepy in the sun; the long Uines anc of buddled \u003c}erman deail are buried; thi have been picked up; th~e dead artillery disembowelled cows that dotted the fiel legs sticking grotesquely in the air, ar the horrible stench of deaitb and burute thet hung lll\u003ce a foui miasma over ir fair country on those warm, misty Sept iuge bas been biown away by a y'ear's ch Who would beileve 'it ail happened? There are stili shattered chuxrchee pltted witb shrapnel and inachine-gun 1 seen in Barcy and Vareddes, and soins o 1 whE r the wV",
         "THE COURIER. PHE WORK 0F NEW BRUNSWICK rnor Wood, who merged the ,tic Fund with the general. Judge J. Gordon Forbes, President Patriotic Fund Executive, St. John.. Mayor James H. Frink, of St« John, headed many patriotie activities. Prmier Clarke, In hie officiai capacity, Pe took an Important part. .aren, M.D., in charge of- dian Hosptal, France. Activities in -the East han rnost Provinces to the battie inswlck bas flot been behinti i Transport C aledolan leaving St. J ohni, N.B., wîth the 261 I - c LIULVU U-1~ The Army attaehed to îerseas Rail- th Battalion. Lt.-CoI. B. R. Armstrong, of the Artil- way Construction Corps were In barracks at St. John several weeks before embarking. The 55th, recruited imxnedliately after the departure of the 16th, is now at VYetrfrtrr ýhas been Up to fuil strength twice, 'but reduceâ by drafts for other nits. New Brunswick contributed men to the Princess Pats. Surgeons and physIcians have gone from New Brunswick. Dr. Murray MacLaren froni St. Jobn began duties at Salisbury plain, where under bis direction manor bouses were turned Into bospltals and 1,200 men were under the care of bis staff. Dr. MacLaren 15 now in cbarge of No. 1 Canadian hos. pital at Etapies lu France. Dr. Corbitt, of St. John, was one of bis surgical staff. Dr. Duval, of New Brunswick, was among the severely wounded, and is stillin luospital. Col. Dr. McKee, oculist fromn Fredericton, Is now at the Dardanelles. Dr. Edwin J. Ryan, of St. John, Is wlth bim. Dr. Brydges, a New Brunswick surgeon, is In France. Patriotic funds were orgauîzed, immediately sfter the outbreak of war. A mass meeting was called by Mayor Frink, of ýSt. John, and a committee of one bundred was appolnted to create a soldiers' relief' fund. An executive was formed, with Judge Forbes as president. Wltb the assistanýce of the Lieutenant- Governor this fund was mergeri wltb the general Patrlotlc Fund of Canada. About 700 familles are getting ~financial aid fromn the St. John office at present. The whole amount furnisbed by New Bruns- wick to this fumd is about $150,000. As St. John is an alî-winter port niuch war busi- ness in forwardlng men, borses, bay, grain, and ail sorts of war supplies i-s carried on there wltbout interruption. New 'rfînswlck mechanics are busy Lieut.-Col. J. 26th",
         "THE COURIER. SIR WILLIAM VAN HORNE bas lft the word o! work o! wiceh for many yeurs lie bas been anc a! the great geniuses. For severai years since bis retirement fram the C.P.R., whicb he dld mare than auy other ma ta create ns a great practical scheme of transportation, he iiad been rail- roading Cuba. Thut work aiso hie just about finisbcd, Those wbo bave neyer seen or talked ta Van Homne bave mlesed a glmpee o! one of Uic world's remark- able men. Looklng back over a stronge, advcnturous 11fe cin Canada, the United States and Cuba, this eminent \u0026merlcanCanadian citizen o! Canada muy bave rcflectcd that bie bas sald a number o! tbings wblch naw might be bard to prove. What Van Horne tbougbt abou~t the war bc bad never so far as le known given to the press. Tbree years ago, whea tbe writer o! thle interviewed Sir William ln Mont- real be gave bis opinions about Germuan methods an~d tbe Kaiser. What those opinions were can best bc taid by recalling thpm Just as they werc set down at the timne-wb,,en the Gexrman menace wae belug talked o! la this country, and wbcn men with Uic wisdom o! Van Horne were as guilelessly unlnformed about wbat Uic menace really was as thc average citizen. The writer said then: \"'Van Hrnme belleves in Empire. He conslders Kaiser Wilhelin perhaps the greatest Emperor Unit ever iived. He does not believe la the German wiýar ecare. He belleves that warsbips are but symbole or pawns iu the game. The reai war te bis mind le bound te be lu trade. Hie tald secyral storice about the Kaiser-whom be bad neyer met but grea.tiy wanted te meet some day; how Uic Kaiser gai in- formation for his consular reports concerning thc Laumentide Paper Ce., information whleh bie blmself, president o! thc compauy did net possess, for the Kaiser neyer permite an agent te make a copy a! sueb; ditto, the mine o! Britieb Columbia; elmilar the story of how the Kaiser got Germun rails on Uic road from Argentine to Cblli-nvolviug a State breakfast te Von Stumm Uic German rail-maker; sîmilar again whcn the Kaiser expcnded a State din- ner to get Uie Hamburg-American line it sanie- whcme or oiber; and finally bow expertly Wilielm found eut w'hat it was worth te Germnany ta steai Americun students from Parle and get tbem Into only tbing wrong wlth us in Canada ls-we don't. sweat enougli.\" \"Roasevelt knows thé philosophy of humbug. That's sometbing. We need some better word than bumbug ta express wbat it meane. The world is ruied largely by humbug.\" But there was nothing of the cynic about this, more of the Gargantuan humorist. Sir William in- tended ut that time ta write his scmi-philosaphy a! living into a book-wbicb be bas probabiy ne«ýer donc. But there are liundreds of men in Canada wha have been brain-stimuiated by Van Horne into big- ger things than tbey knew bow ta tbink for them- selves. And in ail bis doing o! big things Van Horne must be remembered as a mnan wbo always regarded it one of the luxuries of life ta be able ta tblak tbings- ont for bimsclf and ta buiid Up a more ar les unscientific pbilosopby. Van Horne iivcd twa lives mare successfully than mast men because bie bad prodiglous bodily strengtb. and a brain that was neyer satlsfied witb the ordin- ary activities of business. As a railroader be was anc 0f the world's geniuscs. He began railway life in thé United States as 'an office boy, ln tbe rallway station of bis native tawn, Joliette; campelled at the age of faurteen ta make bis own way and ta hclp support bis family. Giftcd wlth a llmitlees capacity for bard work and a towerlng ambition, bie soan mastcrcd railroading in varlous branches;. telegraphy, tlcket-agency, train despatcher, superintendent of telegraphs, divisional superintendent, general manager; and, finaily, wbite stlU a young ma, be beame general superîntendent of thc Chicago, Milwaukee \u0026 St. Pui Railwuy. At the age of 37 bie lcft thut post and the country lu wblch bie niigbt bave become a great national figure ta become generai manager of the C. P. R. That was in 1881, when the first great Canadian transcontinental was littie mare than a fiuanciai euterprlse. The first sod of the main line vwas turned lu May, 1881. The last spike was driven lu 1885. Van Horne was made general manager of tbis prospective \"streuk of r-ust\" ln Navember, 1881; and it wa largely due Wo his dynunlie activity that the work o! building sncb a railway was pusbed at snch a colossal rate. He became president o! thc coin- pany lu 1884, and still in bis farties proccedcd ta make bimsef a greut citizen of Canada, ln wbosc future bie believed more profoundly than did many -native-baril Canadians. The turc of thc C. P. R. caused William Van Horne to become not only a real Canadian6, but a great Im- perialist. -The Flood Tide SBy A.- FINANCIAL EXPERT. T HERE seems ta bc ltite doubt now tht indus- trial, commercial and financiai Canada le ia flood-tlde. Tihe era of economY, whlcb bas swep't ail cauntries as a resuit of the war, bas probably been most *pronouriced lu Canada. The Dominion, lt muet be acknowledged, le as yet a weakling among the ýcountries of the world, but she le a -weakllng endowed by heredlty wlth braine and - - ~ i ~ nid cali re- A GREAT- MAN GONE By AUGUSTUS BRIDLE villages, Canada, Australia, Japan, are giVenl overflow. Sa it is that our own manufacturing plants are working to capacity, on ýday and niglit shifts shelis and parts of shelîs, on leather products, tules and clothing, and on ail the infiffite varlet small accessories wUich, go to the cquipment and nisbixig of vast armies at war. And we have Positive assurance o! Great Brîtain that we bave ail tbc work: we can'possibly bandle. So, indeed, Canada's ebb tide has turned, an( are in the flood. Our failmers last year l1aiýd out e avallable acre thcy could handie to the culitvatlc wheat,' and they sowed carefully. The result larger crop, and one wbich was so heavy ta the that stookers had hard work keeping up with binders, ýthat the swatbs cut by the binders fi selves had to be narrowed or the blades woiild GLI and that caterpillar trains 'travelled at half 1 usual Bpeed. Our railways have rushed f eeding ta completioli and have reduced curvature ai, lines, lu order to tap every possible acre and to vide facilities for the quickest transpartatio\". freigbt receipts bld fair ta eclipse the totls 0 other years in consequence. Pan-Amercan e s'lonists and tourists f rom the United States are f our. passenger coaches and our hotels. Ou mines are not only working ta capacity at the Pr time, but are enlarging tbeir equipments in that they may take advantage of -the insisteXlt,' wide demand for goki. Our silver mines areru ste\u0026dIy, althougb nat at capacity, and the ufle ieing lahid aside lu storage against the time wh market value per ounce shall have risen fr0i 20 per cent. According ta the best posted 11 experts, this will occur immediately upan the c tian of the war. This year's catch of fisb a bu0 phenomenal one, and aur cast lines are stocke the fInny -product of the sea, which will ulni flnd markets in couatries wbere seafarers hav turned, Into sol-diers and trawlers inta trW Even as regards our lumber industry, whlleth cut may nat be as large as lu former years, u crament bas redoublcd its activities ini timbe servation, and wben the demand le re-awakn wili bie ail the better prcparcd to take care of!i The machinery of our country le operatiflg 1o and steadlly, ouled by ecanomy. Even sentine tangible, illus\u0026,ve, sentiment, whic7a bas se as effect upon business conditions, le mucbý lsiiPr reason of the fact that tbc prescrnt carnings O dian industrial and publie utiiity corporsitiole a mucli better showlng. War perlods now cu 'with war perlods, iastcad o! witb peace Pero heretofore, and the effeot is plainly apparet aitbough the resuit o! comuparisons le onl isi and bas no actuai substance. And laet, but ne our govcrnment is backing our banks and our b aur business enterprises. Summarlzing these Is lit not plainiy apparent that we have ittle t plain of and lndeed much ta be thankful far.",
         "THE COURIER. \"HFE CONTRASTS 0FWAR THE DECIMATION 0F A GLORIQUS FRENCH REGIMENT. weeks ago the 71st Regiment contained 4,000 men in the violent fighting area of the Argonnie. SÎnce the German offensives in that region the 71et is ýd ta 1,800 men. This photograpir is a grim picture of some of those who gave up their lives for France, and in s0 doing did ta the Germana what has neyer yet been photographed. AN AMUSING GAME 0F CAROS. UE Argonne playlng a game calIedi La Manille. They are soldiera walt for an opportunity to kill more Germans. ---i È!ý OF WAR",
         "TUE COURIBR. THE .CA NA DEA Ne COURI1ER COU~RIER PRESS, LIMITED) lai SRMCOE ST. EDITED BY JOHN A. COOPER TORONTOI, SEPTEMBEIt 18. 1915 Uncle Sam's Latest OUR VUncle Samual ha framed a new commaud- ment: \"Thou mayat murdor wonan and chil- dran and idestroy liberty, but thon ahait not interfero with my right to manufacture munitions.\" Germn Slavery ~LAVE~RY lias beau rastorad lu Europe by the Ger- man cancinerors. The matai 'workers of Bel- gilumn ufit mako guns and ammunition for the Huns or ba shot. Unless the German xilitary auta- crut Is humzbled and4 th\u003ce cancer of Pruesianissu re- ýmovad from !lurapeau alvilization, slavary will ha re-estabilhed on that conrtinent. Yet the dosendats o$f the Meu of the North w\u003cho died tha\u003ct the hIae slaves mi\u003eght ba frea, culmly sit back and permit the establishment of slavery in Europe wdthout a protest. Neutra.lity under ancli cir- curnstauces savoure of selfishness and cowardico. Surely the people of the United States muet soon s00 thut their present position ls untanable. Australia's Glory WHEN Australlu's fooet and New Zealand's sol- Sdiars swept the Soutihern Seas of the Gernan flag, Canada was proud of the glory whioh came té\u003e thesa twa sister Dominions. Thora là now even rreater reason for Drnde. The achiavements of in Canada. The lafter 1ls the new- naine for a modified forim of conscription. Before the war no ane believed in National Service. Naw a aarge body of opinion has grown up, which là baased on the doctrine that in tîme af stress the State hue the ri-ght ta say whe'ther a man shall fight or make munitions or dig coàl. Wbdah wîll came off victorious-Volýuntary Soi- vice or National Service? Ail depends upan the avents of the Gi-eat War. If inatters grow worse for the Allies, National Service la bound ta coma ln soine fori. In Germanýy, Austria, France, Russia and Italy, the principla of National Service le admitted. In Great Britain alona the voluntary principle sur- Canada la vitally interested. If Great Britain ,adopta tihe prlud4plo of National Service, Canada would likely follow suit. No one likes the ide-a- but these ara days of atorn necessity. The First Dufy NOT every five dollars given to a patriotic fund Is wiaoly used. There are saine funds lu which t ha collectera themaelves take tan per .cent., and lu o thera lu which thora are other forma af leak- age. Thora are other funds which. are not patrîotic -but simply expedient. The man wha desires ta give five dollars and have every cent of it effective should confine himsolf ta the Red Cross Fund and the National Patriotic Fund. These are munaged by well-kne'wn oltizens, upan, wellMefined and efficient linos. After a citizen has decided upon his manthly contribution ta these two funds, hae la thon fres ta give to the lasser funda, such as those for prisonare af war and convalescents. Indeed, it milght bo laid dowu as basic principle, that every citizen muet contribute regularly ta thesa twa central funds, or lhe is not dolng hie first duty. More War Orders A bas beaui pointed out lu this paper from timo ta tinoe, the Allies cannot go much farther wlth thair p1Jr4chases lu the United States. They hava, not the gold ta puy for thon. On the other haud, the Allias can purchaso more lu Canada, 'because it will ba easier te arrange cradit haro. Ronce Canada is likely ta get mare war orders lu the future. Canada is part of the British Empire and \u003cCanada muet extend cradit to the Allias if necessary. Sir Robert Borden and his calloagues have beau pressing this onl the British Goverumant with a fair amount of succass. Trhe difficulty ha been that tha War Offibe authorities thaught Canada praducod nothlng but timber aud wheat. They ara just hegin- ning to discover whut spýlendid factories thore ara lu this country and how variod are the producta which thesa can pradtice. Knowing His Employees H W many employars in Canada know their em- Hployee? We tallc about keeplng mnen out of bar-rons, of making them progressiva by home-study, of koeping then physicalily fit by sports, of teaching their wdves ta be real mothers anid women, of making their oildren strong anld but who lW dc'ing It? Are the emplayats Of 1 eusy on the job? Sa far as the wrlter knows there la only oneO employers In Toronto that have a club and an al arganizatian that là worth while. There are nu~ af basebail clubs and ho ckey clubs and ail t] connection. 'wth factories, but theyare purelj dental-flot a part of a Bystam. OccasiOflallY î ployer pravIdes a lunch roam, then rubs bis and tha.nks lits God tha.t hie là generaus. The~ and finunclal compantes have a peusian funid a it go at that. The employer -wha does bis duty le the maJ employa someane ta study the e 'mployees and to hlm on measures that are noeded for their I educatian and happinos. Ha must have an org wha knowe evory man, woman and child conW wlth the warehouse'or factory, directly or indl ,Henry Fard's systomn may not be dll-wise, 1 has the organlzers at wçork. Thay wlll proba the right thi[ng if be wilýl let them. Caear system, as descrlbed ln the New York Herald isupply hie cottan operatîves lu North Caroll' cottages at $3 ta $5 a month, ta distribute flow vegetable seeda every sping, ta employ expe men te conduct coolvlng and sewing classas, tc the mothers how te tuko cua af thoir bah furnleh tiheir homes and sa on. There areao stancesof this kind lu -the United States, but are they In Canada? Double Salary RUMOUR has It that several officiais of t minion Gavernmeut drawing salaries $2,500 ta $4,000 a year have been sent~ front ta ear a second salary of $2,000 ta This là surely unfair. Why ahould ane colc worth $7,000 a year te tha Goverumont, and i colonel, equally capable, but nlot a civil serý warth only $4,000? No civil servant shol auything by going ta the front; neithor shi gain onything, That le the raie adopted Toronto City Caundil, and it is excellent. double salaries for clvil servants should be CRI Wicked Suggestions AWICKED Joker spread the story that th ie: war would tae place between the two li low races. And when somneone asked hin cently, if he Ineant Japan and China, ha caimly ain \"ýNG-JPanf and the United States.\" A simailar wtcked f ellaw suggeated that Sir j\u003c\u003ehi naine his battery, now in England, the -Eaton Battery.\"1 And another witcked chsp remarked would MeNaught be right, because it would casfl tinet Russelliflg in high military circles. Thut other wkcked suggestion about making re5.X ais instead of honcrary colonels ha at last found into the newspapers, after two or threc mnth-1 clubs. But one xxowspaper man spolled the joke, sulted his roaders by suying that the empixasis Wa \"rour.\" That journa.list should be superannuated. AN EVENT WHICH BREATHES OPTIMIS",
         "TuIE COURIER. TH E SI1G N 0F TH-E MA PL E A NEWS DEPARTMENT MAI NLY FOR WOMEN As We See Others it uddoenly bomdl uuin wrn N the second Thursday lu September, Toronto 7of white roses, ail ln honour of the cause- fighting the Wbite Piague. The Queen Sanitariurn, at Weston, was establislied some ago, as -an institution where cildren suffering tulbercular trouble might be treated. The work 'rown lu a inuner to grati-fy the founders, and littie kiddies, -on whoin thls blight bas fastened, earlY being releaised, from is grip. The ravages ar axe maifest ami appalllng-but just as dle are the ravages of this cruel and secret foe, e strengt I l revealed only by the statlstlcs of iealtb department.' If you wlsb toi accoinplisb est work lu citizenship, you must begin early. ýuring or heallng of the tubercular chlld is the bit of campaigning lu the flght agaiust the s Plague.. 'Ou1to bought white roses, right and left, on the Of Septexuber, and three huudred and ninety e city's best motors were et the service of Young workers aud their captains. Banik gers rajllled to the financial climax of the cause, rom ail citizeus went williing contributions to 'ork of saving the smali persons. ýsSon in Fathercraft ;7RE bas been au Iufiulte deal of rubbish talked in the last tew years on thie subject of zuother- iiood. The wrIters -of these welrd articles are [y Young men who have their diploma bonours froin the paroliment uianufactory-but sôme- a wlse girl graduate undertakes to tell mothers iraudiMothers Just heow Mary is tobe fed and ie is to -be clothed. Occasioually au irate ýr bas a few words to aay on the subject; but Sgenerally too busy, looking after the tem- V1 aud eternal welfare of Mary and Jolinnle, to a haîf-hour for u article on how she le train- le dear Iltte creatures. re are a few more-up-to-date-thau-usual philan- 8ts lu New York who have a Sebool of Mother- in whlch simple matters relating to the infant's diet and lingerie are dealt w1th, ln a most flating and Instructive fashion. Recently, it een Proposed to.establisb, aeo, a Scbool for l'craft, where anxlous papas xnlght be 'iu- e\u003ci !R the 'proper way to handleaud amuse ýry Youuig chuld. Que.o! the principles of this lai that the* parent shail use every endeavour \u003etect ami safeguard the welfare of the cbild lire years; and, for each day'a delay lu se lie shall recoive a bad mark or demerit at the ]Pâtrick Carrigan, a resideut o! the clty of York, *baving heard, o! the propSied school, Sto quelify as* a pupil by vliing varlous l(0ur laat month, demaudlug their promise to t and icare for bis few-bours-ld offsprlng. litally, however, Mr. Carrigan used a revolver 'Orclng bis request, and the ueighbours, net daning the~ iethods of the latest Foollebuss 1ercraft, were se unkind as te cli upon the te explain th~e limnitations of the Sullivan Law rick o! the Paternel Heart.-:\u003e tbing but the .\u0026plendid, big-hearted city that gives berself royally, either lu friemisbip or war. On the elghtb of September,- Hamilton just hadl the time of ber lîfe lu a f ete wblcb made the Amateur Âthletlc Grounds \u003cotberwIse the eld Cricket Field)- look lke one, vast bouquet o! colour sud fragrance. 0f course, Hamiltonwas uot merely arnusing bersef- THE NEWLY-WEDS. A picture of Mr. and.Mrs. Chang Vat Jun, taken after the wedding cercmony onR August 28. The bridc's bouquet and her flowiflg veil are concessions8 ta West. ern custom. she dees not eujoy a wbOle sfternoou and evening wltheut meaulng a great deal of happinesa fer some- ne else. Thia Urne, Flan-lton was celebrsting, wlth lu a hurst o! personaI con- ia fonduesa for Hamilton- witb the fast-flittlug yeers, Hamilton or make her suy- bospital supplies as the end in view of ail the gayety- It was boped that ten thousand dollars would be reaiized-but Hamilton miglit have known better- than to, set any linit for ber citizeus. After the day's work and play were ever, they counted justý elghteen thouBand dollars, which Hamilton fete badr made for the soldiers. lt just does one good te think o! Hamilton and how lt is worklng, aud the Hamull- ton womeu don't know the meanlng of the blues or the ýdumps, although there bas been tragedy enougb and te spare lu that beautiful city sîno0 the boys marobed away. Yes, I know that every clty in Canada la doiug its bit-but I merely wlsb to re- mark that Haimiltoulans have given between seven aud eigbt dollars per capita i 'patriotic donations since the war began. Se, wbether it ls dollars or mnachine guns, the chief clty of Wentwortbi Is vent- ably set on a bll. ]DRIN. A Chinese Honeymoon in Canada VISITORS to the Paclflc !Coast always flnd a certain fascination lu -the glimpse of Orien- tal lfe wblob 1Its cities afford. The 'sojourner lu Vancouver or Victoria luvari- abiy asks te, be taken -to the Chinese and Japanese quarters, wduere the shops, wlth their decorations representing a atrange and foreiga standard of art, witb their allen wares and witb their sef t-voiced and courteous attendants, the restaurants, wlth their mystenlous fonds and drinks, which make a subtle cballenge to, the adventurous spirit, aud the theatres, amazing aud bewilderiug, never fail to, cast a speli over the imagination. But the casuel visiter never -penetrates beyond the streets ami abopa ef -the Oriental quartera and departs wlthout havlug gained even the slghtest kuowlege of tbe private life -o! the dweilers therein. There la lu Vancouver a Cbînese eociety and a Japanese cîrcle, of wbom but littie la knoivn by the majority of the resldeuts 'of that clty. It is only uipon the occasion of ome Important eyent of au officiel character, auob as the visit ot a Japanese admirai or e Chînesle diplomnat, ;lu wbose: bonour formai functions are arranged tbat members of these cIrcies corne out o! their seclusion and those wbo are iprivlleged te meet. tbem learn that they are persous of education and refinement. A few of -the white residents of Vancouver were last rntb favoured with invitations to a weddlng, when twe members of this class of the Chînese colony were rnarried, the nupttals being celebrated witb elaborate ceremonial ami lavish feïstivity. The groom was Mr. Cbang Yat- Jun, -and the bride Miss Mamie YIp Sang. The parents of the youthifut couple, both o! wboni were boru In Vancouver, are among the oest wealthy and fuent , ai e! the rny wealthy Chinese reaidents o! the city.. The bride bas been weli educated, and the groom ls stili a student at MoGîl lJnlIversity Coliege, wbere he bs completed bis second year. The marriage ceremony, wbich, was_ marked by- mucli formallty,, took -place at the residence o! the Chîiese Conýsul, and was followed by a banquet at tbe Uutel. Vancouver, et wllcb s 'ixty guests were, present. The table was laid lu the-beautiful oval dhilng-iroomi o! the uew botel, sud the floral arrange- mente and other -appointouents. expressçd the last word o! tbe art Of 'the decorator. The menu carde; and place carda were charrnlng examples o! Cbinese art, sud exqulslte faveure were presentei te the gueste. An orchestra wss statloned ln su aicove beblnd a floral screeu, sud is music filled, the Inter. vals between the toasts and feicitatiens. Ail o! t ho Chinese ladies lu attendsuce wore native cos- tumnes of mucb beauty sud elegance, that o! the bride VlP Sang, both memnbers of promnent Chinese famni.' noyfer the beautifulty d«orate table. T",
         "THE COURIER. w a M LOeS of these lîttie LUX wafers are working wonders every wash-dayoal over Canada. In color they are likeScrai-to the toucli like silk The fine, soft, creanly lather LUX makes, is splendid for woollens-it never sbrinks or hardens them In fact, al ldndsof garments, wollens, sill\u003cs, laces, linens, etc., daînty or other- wise, are really preserved by LUX. It leaves them Iuxuriously dlean, but wlth the fabrie absolutely free from matting and1 sbrinkage. SAMPLE FREE on application te, Lever Brothers Iànited, Toronto. Sold at ail grocers, 1IOc. toabur: Ist LUX is aud in Caasda. 2m\u0026 It woW't ua\"zu wooâisi17 THE CANADIAN BANK 0F COMMERC SIR EDMUND WALK ER, C.V.O., LLD., D.C.L., Proaident AL-EXANDER LAIRD, Gênerai Manager. JOHN AIRD, Ass't Generai Manager. CAPITAL, $15,000O000 RESERVE FI SAVINGS B3ANK ACC( Interest at the curreut rate la allowed on ail deposits Careful attention ls given to every account. Small ac Âccounts may be opened and operated by mail. Âecounts inay be opened ln the names of two or moni te be made by any one of them or by the survivor. being an embro4dered robe, marvel- lously wrought on a wondrous fabrie, a typical product of the Orient. M. D. The Duchess' Fund. M EMBERS of the Woman's Cana- dian Clubs tliroughout Canada who desire ta, contribute ta the fund which IlR.H. The Ducliess of Conoaught lias asked for, may send their subsoriptions througli the Carna- dian Courier. Titis fund is for the re- lief of Canadian prisoners in Gerrnany. These prIsoners, are receiving only twenty-five cents a week and titis is flot sufficient to ibuy thie necessary food and comforts. 'Rer Royal R-igliness lias already cabled $2,ùOO to, the Canadian Re.d Cross for 'this purpose. Every Cana- dian Club mexnber should *assist Ilu. thfs urgent undertaking. Full Infor- mation rnay be secured from this office ,or from the treasurer of theWo\u003eman's Canadian Club, 270 Cooper Street, Ottawa. The need Ils urgent and contribu- tions.should be sent promptly. Wliere possible, the member should agree ta, give, say a dollar a montit, durlng the war, or until sucl i Ure as tliose who manage 'the fund say that sufficlent hias been reoelved. More Work to be Dune. M AJOR Doherty, M.D.,' of New Westminster, who bas just re- turnedta Canada fràm England, says that there shauld be no ces- sation of the work of supplying socks, bandages, clothlng and ta- bacco. The women' have dont, well, but lie wants tim ta realize that there is Iust as inucli ta be -done 1his winter as last winter. The Major is Assistant Director of Medical Supplies at the Head Office of the Canadian IVedicail F~orces in London, ,and is ýtherefore in a position ta speak with authorlty. Ris is a trumpeft cali ta further effort. Fali Faire Asulet Redi Cross A¶CING a leaf from the bock cf the T Torointo Red Cross Society, whose attractive bootl at the ýCanadian National Exhibition was a reminder to many thousands, of people of the4r duty to this Society, botli the Red Cross of bondon ýand -that cf Ottawa wiIl bie re- Presented at their respective Pairs. At the Western Pair tlie ýRed Cross will have a refreshment booth, whicl i Wli be supplie\u003ci dally by members. cf the Society with liome-made dainties in tlie form of cakes, sandwiches and tea. Every penny received w'ill contribute toward Red ýCross suppies, the nieed for which is stili a very urgent one. Àt the 'Centrai iExhbition at Ottawa, the Woinen's Canadian 'Club w.ill ce- cupy a large portion of the Fine Arts Building in which will be shown ex- hibits of patriotie work, soldler's com- forts, supplies for Red Cross work, outfits for men in thie trenches and hand and machine knitting. Thie amn- ECONOM) IN WAR TIMI Economy is to-day the duty Of 31\" ls~h People. Econormy means spend judielou5] and get value for your money. False Economy is to buY a shOdd article simpiy because the price iow. It means buying another ti r place it in a short time, and the gazI ment is flot worth repair. True Economy is to avoid extre1r fashion. Buy a good article, Of sou\" material, and well made, that m'Ill gis long wear, continuai cornfort and pIe' sure ta the wearer, and will look\u003c We ta the end. Such garments are wort taking care ofý and repairing. Jaeger Pure Wool Wear bas bee tested for 33 years, and has given i isfaction ta tbousands ail Over tli worid. Thjnk of thls when you n1ee Underwear 'and Knitted GoOds titi year. JAEGER GOODS ARE TRUE ECONOM A fully iiiustrated catalogue and Dr. Jaeget's U Culture\" will bie sent Ires on application to DR. JAEGER CO. îit- TORONTO MONTREAL WINNIPEG' Intcpe d in England iu 18, wfth BrtîlhCapital for the British xpito r By reason of jthe changing shape when lin ~motion this tire Scleans itself o f al a1mud .and ilime. T. 102 T3ie Ira Pour L UX on the troubled waters of the wash y 1îý",
         "THE COURIER. Courieriettes. n YAN wili lOse bis job on the Ohautauqua circuit when the .American iwar correspondents re- No;w thet HenrY James bas become uaturalized Briton he ýwill probabiy lite bis noiveis in Englisb. If MNr. James wrote about the waT 1 censor-5 would tbink bis stuif 'was cde, and migbt boid it up, anywny. Seemus as if the main crop this 'tiid 'Wll barvest lu *1915 la one of juble. P hbystcian told tbe Kaiser to lead 1111eV lffe. Yet tbey gay tbe H-uns l'e no sense of humour. ý1 ls Sadd that there is a decrease mou),ntaîn feuds in tbe U. S. Paos- y Vhs _feudists 'bave moived to the *cities. 'Ve note that Montenegrins aunibi- s\u003cl sOme fresh Austrian troops Some lago. rt ýdoesu't do to get fresb b the Miontenegrins. lryan's new volume Of lectures is \u003elilsbed at 30 cents. Tbe man wbo t\u003cl the price had a pecullar sense the fitness of tbings. ].lyncbing party iu tbe Southeru \"tes drowned a man instead cf talLY bang-ing hlm. Thus culture q4Uers rettY girl kissed a policeman, say Ppers, for directing ber te ber tination. Who said a policeman's i8 nlot a bappy eue? \"\"uy te fiud a man who wauts to 1 at Sblg Slng. But tbeu be's the, ernlor, sud wants to hold bis job. eddY Roosevelt says that the lest irole la that o! a mother. Tbat'e StLrenueus eahling the Colonel rinca bas sent millions o! herse- te the AllIes. NO, noV as lucky S, but as Merchandise. 'Y warrlng country.is praylng 2tory. Tbeiy cau't ail wln, but, aylng wonIt burt them. Kaiser bas given away thou- Oi! iron Crosses and lie ta ieav- Ilions more to Teutons yet un- i the forM cf, wur taxes. Asuilan- eage bas Vaken Lcourse (in International coolng 'Y Urne the Germans capture a nl scoldier tsy' aseo capture a appetite. our-A wilter iu a Milwau'kee Laserts that Vhe United States be protected frein invasion by ),mIarines and aero.pianes. Thiat sbeuld be working on space ir the comlc papers. 31 Teet....hÇbla's national hyinu )11g tihat iV Vakes bal! a day to It muet test the patrlotism ,Celestials te stand up tibat iere i8 no lmit to A ty. A man in the gri ported to have inveni h prlnited directions newspaper man which wouid be a genius, an anýgel and a slave, ail iu one. One editer man laid it dowu as bis view that the reporter sbould have a grounding in all the main branches of education, a good kno-wledge of ail the sciences, a comprehensive idea 0f political scienjee, rpoliticai economy, international law and relations, and s1ould ibe able to spreak at ieast two ilanguages. Thereupon oue of the hard-worklug newspaper men at the table passed a note over to one of the debaters. On the nots was 'written \"How mucli do you want for $6 a week?\" About Money.-Money talks. No- jbody cean shut it up. But it can shult most everyfbody no. WAR NOTES. lIow cean Uncle Sam be Sadd to be unprepared for war, wlth Roosevelt always ready? The Huns wi have a lot Of trouble wiping the Russians off the map. Tbere's tee mucl' anip. The Balkan States are bard put te it to decide just wbich is the under dog. Looks as if Davy Jones will have qulte a large suibmarine fleet wèleu the war le over. Sonne o! these days the Sul- tan of Turkey will be issulng a Mhue book-deep blue, or per- baps blacki and bine. it cogta $1j250,000 an hour if the Queen Elizabeth fires ber guns at capaclty. Gdves us sorne idea of the bigli cost o! flring. Somebody bas discovered that General Joffre is of noble de- sceut. F-rance ls More -inter-ý ested just no-w, bowever. In rwbere be la goiug than lu where he came from. ut ised to be the thin. red Hue or Britain, but nuw lt's the thIn bread line of Gejrmany. Descrlbed.-4We do not mesu to be unlclud te our Ainerican cousins, but tbe present vogue of~ \"sport shirts\" sud other eccentrlc styles for both Men ami 'Worneu aCrOas the line move us te the conclusion that the great U. S. le repIdiy becomlng \"the land a! the brave sud the borne 0f the freak?\" Joy For Them-Tbese are great days fur the smaîl boy lu the Ger- manie empire. The prieS o! soap la sosrlng skyblgti lu Huulaud. Her Alm.-.Chtcago man gave -up bis sat lu a gtreet 'car te a wonian. Mtsxwards sbe married hlm. She probalbly figured, on a permanent seat. et M U Very Likely.-\"Men are wbat they' est,\" sald the suedical sc4entist. \"Thon,\" retore-td Vhe cynlc, \"I sUP- pose cliltics ive chiefly on roaste.» eat b tu for Mlxed Metaphor.-Àid. Sari Me- Bride, the stoui»' petrel o! the To- ronto Gity KJeuncil, always speas te Vhe point rwhen le bas anythlug te t\u003e .say, and be never minces words, Hie (J language is at times rather pietures- que, and soinotIues lie even mixes hIs metapliors a bit. The other day lie was glving an ln- jnt terview on the matter- e! choosing a ffe Ju4ge te coduct the Investigation lu- i5- te certain charges made agalnst an a. alderman. \"Wo want a judge who will get the es facts out-who wlll dig sud dig, let a Vhe chips fali whee they iuay,\" as- serted Mr. MeBride, and then lie won- ,dered 'wby the reporter smi1ed.- - The Excuse. I'm very fond of exercise, I'm getting much too fat, And 1 would take some exercise If it were flot for that. Mistaken Identity.- \"A burgiar got into nay bouse about 3 o'ciock this morning, 'wheu I was on my way home from the cl-ab,\" sýaîd Jones. \"Did he get aniything?\" asked bis friend, Brown. \"I1 shouid say he did get somethting,\" repiied Jones. \"The poor beggar is in the bospital.now. My wif e thoulght it was I.\" Humour of the Battlefield.-Among tbe incidents of the flghting between tbe British and the Germans In Africa is recounted a rather humerons a!- ifair of the jw'reiess. 'It seems that the British and the Huns lndulged ln consideraible badin- age [by wireless, the British being a t Lilderîtzbuclit and the foe at Wind- buk. The German officer lu command wirelessed te the British commander: \"Stop your men pisying football, and teacli themn to drill instead; Kol- manskop will make a good parade greund.\" That niglit a reconnoitring Party went out froMý the British camp, rescbed Kemmanskop, and killed four 'Germans and wounded another. Next day the Britishi colonel wire- iessed to hie enemy: ' Tooli your advice; scored four goals and a try.\" Logic.-\"Mamiua, when people are lu mourning, do they rwear blacki nighl fiowns?\", \"No, of course not.\" \"Weil, don't they ifeel just as bad at niglit as lu the daytimne ?\" A DtscernùIýg CrltI.-\"Some tijmo ago, wben 'I was piayiug 'Drake,' My box-office keeper came te me lu great. pe rturlbation,\" raid Sir Herlbert Trec, the Eng'llsh actor-doeigbt. 1'I1 tblýk,' lie remrarked, 'you ouglit to recons1der your bills outside the theatre.' 'VWhy?l I sled. -'Wel, it leads to confusion,' lie proceeded. UAt thbe head of the bill ls prlnted, 'Troprietor and manager, Sir Herbert Beerhol1m Tree,\" wbile samonli the actors you are sirnply descrlbed as \"H1eiibert 'Tree.\" They tbiuik you are two differeut perseus. A gentle- mari came te the 'box-office after see- lng \"Drake\" last niglit, aud said: \"I 'want to jbuy more seas for to-niglit. That young flerbert Tree le a fine actor. 1 neyer could- stand bis father! \" p'y Track Athlete.-Secten baud on a rallway. Oh, to b. a ManI-Litt1e Willie wlshed lie wss a man. Hie klud-heart- ed unele asked why. \"Well,\" said Wiilie, \"I'm bossedl arounýd by Va sud ma and the teacher. A xnan's.only got bis wlfe te boss hlm, aroud.\"1 Thinga Vou Ought ta Know. A good way to Makte 'your wateb go? Let a pickpocket se IL. Yeu waut te know wbat a ýboue of ýcontention la? Offer your 'wlfe oue dollar out of yuur week's wages. Will heaven proteet the work- img girl? She doesn't need pro- teation as mueli as the movie ýplays make out. Are clothes ciosets convenieut lu a house? Wby yen. You can hide in them when the rent col- lector cells. le it a lie te Vell a woman she le as prstty as a plcture? No, there are all klu\u003e4s of Pictures, \u003cJeu you tell a womau's as. ? PerIhaps you can, ibut if you do You're taklng big chances. ACharningComplexion Preserves, beautifies and purifies the skin and complexion. The Gouiraud's Oriental Creqaam We will send a complexion cham- ois and book of Powder leaves for 15c. to cover cost of mailing and wrapping. Ai Druggists'and Depadtment Stores * FER!). T. HOPKINS \u0026 SON 474 St- Paul Street Montreal jW ý?EAL Caunada's Best In ý/2, 1 and 2 pound catis. Whole- ground pulverzed - also Fine Gr'ound f-orPe'rcolators. CHASE \u0026 SANBORN, MONTRB.AL 161 RO YAL VICTORIA COLLEGE MONTREAL THE RESIDENTIAI. COLLEGE FOR WOMEN 8TUDENTS 0F' McGILL UNIVERSITY m-",
         "THE COURIER. We own and offer a wide range of Can- adian City Bonds to Yield 5% to 6.30%. Particulau Upon Requcast COMPATIOn-IJMTED I4AD offcR; se lIu ST. HAST. TORONTO NONTUAL ONDN, 50..ENO Canada Permnanent, Mortgage Corporation TORONTO S8TREET, TORONTO. ESTA13LISHED 1855. PresidentÉ-W. G. Gooderham. First Vice-Pres!dent-W. D. Mat- thews. Second Vice-President - G. W. Monk. Joint General Ma.nagera - . S. Hudson, John Massey. Superintendent of Branches and Secretary-George H. Smnith. Pald-up Capital ...6,00,000.00 Reserve Fund \u003cearned) 4,500,000.00 Investmentu ..........32,496,M5.55 Deposits R\"ed Debentures Issued Cawtlira Mulock \u0026Co EMuboes of Tenaitostock, EXChaag. Brokers And Bankers 12 KING STREET EAST TORONTO, CANADA CAME AWURS3-CAWLOCK. TORONTO q MONEY1ANDq MAGNATLSi Manufacturing Mysteries EVR*Y company maklng war m~unitions or military supplies la anious to c7onceal its profits. In ordinary tirnea, a company daing big business la .proud. of It, and la willing to have the fact known. Just now it is difficuit. If a company ls maklng big profits, the tact is concealed lest lt shouid corne to the eara of those wbo place the contracts and prices sbould be reduced. Gov- ernment buyers are sbowing skill when the orders. are large and reductions iu price are not uncommon. Nevertbeleas, mere secrecy or silence are flot to beluterpreted as an evîdence of profits. Sorne companies'have loat money on their war contracta, aithough the majority have -made money. There la no doubt, whatever, that Dominion Iran andý Steel, Nova Scotia Steel, Canada Car and Foundry and Steel of Can- ada-the largeat of our steel companles-have ail been busy on profitable busi- ness. A balf dozen smaller companles are also doing weil. \u003eIndeed, ane may go so far as to su\u003e' that the war haa saved Canada's Iron and steel iniduatry, and a year, bence ail accumuiated dividende will be liquidated. A \"Punch\"' Joke ANY people ln Canada will appreclate a joke wblch appeared receut\u003e' ln M\"Punch.\" A well dresscd \"lloidy\"l and her weil dresscd youngster have juat paased on their way to, the \"movies.\" Two neighbauring women sec her go b\u003e' and one says to, the other: \"Y«n, ahe's off ta the cinema again, and 1 don't blame 'or. Make the moat of it, 1 say. Who. knows? W. may be 'aving peace upon us at any moment.\" Sa the Canadian manufacturera who are busy on war orders sbould \"1make the most 'of It'\" Peace znay corne sooner than thcy want it. House Rents Fali NOTHING was more remarkablelu our \"boom!\"conditions than the rise lu house and store renta. Roughiy the\u003e' rose thus: -/ ----- Durlng this fitteen year pcrlod rente rose more proportIonatel\u003e' than wages which in turn rose higiier than \"1retail prîces.\" Renta led the way. But since the outbreak of war, tbey have gone down. An apartment whlch rented at $50 to $60 before the war can now be secured in Toronto for $40. This la typical of wbat bas happencd all over Canada ln the rent of bouse, stores and fac- torilis. The chie! cause of the risc lu clty real estate and the lucrease lu renta was the growth of our urban population. Thia growth was as follows: increase in Urban Population. 1871-14 per cent. of populatin. 1881-14 per cent. of population. 1891-31 per cent. of population. 1901-37 per cent. of population. 1911-45.5 per cent. of population. Conversel\u003e' the chief cause in the f ail of renta is the decline lu urban popu- lation aud the movement \"back to the land.\" Financial Notes GREAT BRITAIN still holds 62.88 per cent of C.P.R. stock. The British in- Ca vestors have sold less ef their holdings than the Canadians. Our hold- ings have decllned fromn 23 per cent. ta 13.64 per cent. since June, 1913. Flour pricea have dropped $1.25 a barrel lu the past fortnlght. This does not mean that the mlIllng companies will bave icas profita. The\u003e' are now buylng grain mlghty cbeap. Laurentide Company', Llmlted, making paper at Grand Mere, sbowed lu- crcased profits for the year endlng June 3Otb. This la unusual for a Canadian industrial, and heuce speaks wcil for thc Laurentide management. The com- pan\u003e' la also selling power. Mr. George Cahoon la vîce-presîdent and manager. The risc lu the price of Russell Motor stocks reflects war ordera rather than an Improvement lu the motor trade. Toronto bas rejected an offer ta purchase its four million 5 and 10 year bond issue on a basîs of 53/ per cent. The cît\u003e' hopes to do better. Ottawa and Hamilton are paying 51/, ar a fraction over. Spanlsh River Pulp and 1aper Company' surplus for the yea.r endlng June 3Otb was $268,330, as compared wlth $45,820 last year. Sale of municipal bonda ln August wcre $1,807,415, as compared with $546,834) lu August, 1914. For the twelve montbs endlng Jul\u003e', tic Canadian Governxnent collected dutles amountlng to $78,784,427, as compared with $117,580,866 inu the. sme perlod two yearsa go. On thc other baud, exporta show an Inereauèmo! near\u003e' two hundred millioni dollars.",
         "THE COURIER. \"I thought y i1Thatý was )Ou~t the Urne diu't stay the \"Iwas expe LY,\" said Ms indow.ý 'Tht lu 5h'euld sta 'Beverley lau, lPerhaps nlot LY reason wh, There WaS si I'len the \u003eWl,'Y working Oughts revol' 'J3ut-*hy actice, Phii ? Beverley 100 d a flippancy Prancy that i sfeelings. \"rh4is trade st esidesthe ý, East, youn s k about.\", Rle saw 'Mac ýealed lm ni was the Invo ltwho hadl \u0026shrln.k frer ý's- At the b s the thougi ta weakli.ng. ý;11ea the bai Faid roughiy yon'l havei -e. Nina. seex st already.\"' lifc Cougteti, hie iookedcjat I don't see Èt 'elessîy. Il the m-orni illght Ehimm strlp of wat Y'n the street, hee narrow ai: Uine towards lOey's shop e.He was Skirts made la fresit and alw'ay., and Gantered hie d colour of aLlaInst the lSel behlnd hi 1 just thougit If feeling the3 E'm,\" saidE ~'I't seen al l'here'1l bo n' ail.\"' Welol, yos. 1 \u003e11 the boat dayýs ýthongli v went on Ë bis face ho as if carve tg te break 'sie sald. t's bardly ýquelY. «'Tb Sted ln four atIher a fine [orns 'have le of Nlue LtS Can',t get1 amn very l clon't iniow ,\" hoe ropiied. le Icoked at ý up thre vase )0You wisit s only bogun here?\" riait .îs the t to~ rernomb -Well lt'scD ait glati yo '011e salid si e looked et 0111 whiat la' andi nervous Xdt yenu mare lie iat. Nina A\u0026for me 1 THE, CHOI.CE (Continueti from page 7.) ou were in Maila,' lie worth pla.ying with for a n hour.\" She .saw that somehow tliey *had four years, ago. Just core te a deadlock, Driving back yon left off writing. * along the shore-front sýhe leant back re l ,ong.\" in lier rickshaw 'aud tried to thunk. cting yeu bnck every Was it.merely coquetry 'that had .looking out of the prompted lier -to seek hlm out that Ire was no reason why mýorning, and iad aihe divineti aright? y -out here.\" TJae restie6ss, crowd surgeti by lier in ghed. jnmble d disorder, fus-ing andi inter- .Buit nýeither was there mingling with lier own thoughts, tilt Y I shoniti corne home.\" lier mimd grew tired. lence for awhile. At lunch the next day on the bai- question that liad been cony hier fiather said snddeniy: in 2Mac's mnund formul- 'Il saw that Beverley this morning. ~as one on which ail his He useti to be a partner of yours, didn't ved. *he, !Mac?\" iid YOu .give up your Il AC seemeti a littho embarrassed 'ked at hlmi curiously, M and took a second helping hlmn- came to his manier, a self of fruit salad. eemed designeti to bide *\"Yes. We went through Our course togetther and s-har.eti a practice for uits me botter,\" hie said. about a year.\" S tory foibowed me. In Thero w'as a little -silence, and Nina ee, there Js so lutIle to lookati out to where the liner was ly- ing at anchor with the lglitors stilI wince, and that wince busy about hier. Hor father went on ore titan anything'else. eating, bis sihort-sigbted eyes fixoti On luntýary expression of a b is plate. corne to evade things 'IFItsnny how qnickly a man gocýs n loekilng raalty in the down blill as soon as he takes the first ack of Beverleyls mmnd step. Hec lookei ýbrokon andi worried t that 'Mac 'had turneti wlten I saw him, and triati te dotige me. 1 suppose hie reoognîsas that; ho's rad hati sto \u003eppati playing a fallure.\" \"Yeu're misitaken, 1 thuîk, dati,\" te take a practice bere, saiti Nina dîryiy. 'Il fancy he's beenl nis baif ln love with thte more succossful than mest.\"1 \"Oit, well, lt depends upon what you andi bis eyos.narrowod cail success. Most mon go to plecos his companion again. whaa Vihey've bungled things as hoe diti, le connection,\" hie sýaiti andi it's onily a question of Unme. I dion't suppose he's ever iikoly to for- ng when the burnlng gîtt what stranded hlm haro.\" eroti on -the roofs and Mac pushed bIs chair back, andi his or a rickshaw pattered faCel~lusilbed. .and iturned, the corner \"It was morely 'a mistake,\" lie salid ley. Thore was a -staep warmly, \"you exaggerate its. import- the shore-f ront, but ance, I titink. . Âny ýdocter la hiable to was et îthe top of the do the same thing In moments of idnsting ýsome vases stress, and besidos the child didn't lreds but the rustie ef roaily die ' f that: it wonld have dieti hlm tumn round. There allyhow. The tbing was taken tee witoiesomo graco about sorilously at thte time.\" nlov a olgbt. hesltancy Brtayne ýdabbed bis moustache witit r niannor, the heiglit- bis serviette. hoer cheeks showing \".Well, weil, Mac, Tl don't biama you bine miotor vol that fer dofendtng [Beverley, for you wero er. bis friand. It's the business or a doc- t I'd lýook'In.\" she saiti, tom te avoid mistakes, though If tltey way. occur hoe bas te pay thre penalty. if leveriey. \"Yeu suroîy you'd donce the sarne you'd be a good the sîgite aiready.\" ' ' onIa harder on yourself than you are pianty of time te see ont hii.\"' '.1 don't know that I voulti. There suppose so. I under- are worse crimes undor heaven than ras going on ln four or -for a Yonng tiocter ýte Put tonl grains of chlorai Insteati of oie in a mix- iustlng the bine vase, RIe rose, pale-faced and tight-IlPped, Lrd anti oxpressionless fnitbling a lIttIe namvously wihhbis, d out of steel. chair. Nina hati noýver îheard hlm de- lecIdeti whether we're fend Beverley beforo, Our Journoy hero or That afternoon Mac came up to ber on tho balcony Whon the suni vas tirop- Porth whiie,\" hoe saiti ping 10w. e place con, le ex- \"You're corning fer a dri-ve wlth me, or flve days. . . Titis -NIna?\" ho sald. bit of work.' The -\"ND-\" site repileti, \"Inot titis aftr- IOS 't thli particular noon.\" and ýail their expert- \"We may net have. many more [t back agaln.\" chances.\" noral\u003et cf china,\" sho Nina saw nothlng fnmthcr ol Bever- loy till one niglit when lier rickshaw Mucth about anything was patterlng along the shtore-front in the dusk. The bour beid a namelss him keenly, andi thon cherrn, andi thome was the unsteatiy in her hands. dance of stars on the water, andti1he te pretenti tliat yeu tinkie o! cottage-plonos on the belgirts to lilv sînce you came ebove. Ho bat! corne up behind ber, and their coolies trottoti along together ýniy part of my lite T instlnctlveiy; but thezo vas no real- er particuiarly. The ity in thoir firet few words. Thon hae ver anti doue wlth.\" [sant ovor, andi bis vOice was rasplng u llnd tItis se satIsfy. and uneven. owîy. \"Wliy do you s.tay haro so lot'g?- hiem as if trylng te Site crushed somae papers inlaiem Y behint iber finaheti banda, mevemeuts. «'I don't know. Wby did I coee re IY corne here to rake ait ail ?\" a?\" hae sslid tiryiy. \"r1 \"Don't ask me te fathoan a wen's aenght there vas aniy- roasons,\" hie seiti roughly. \"The peint Ple\"ant fom aimher oft s that this place von't iroip te recrit ,haven't got a memory your fatber's bealth.\" _DIVIDEND NOTICE. Notice îe hereby given that a dii'idend for the three monthe encling Sejptember 3Oth, ai the rate of TEN PER CENT. PER ANNUM has been declareêd upon the Capital Stock of the Company and thaï: saine will be payable on and after October 1 et next. The Transfer Books will be closed from the 2Oth to the 3Oth September, both days inclusive. Bly order of the Board W. E. RUNDLE.,General Manager. Tronto, September ist, 191 5. il] ~J. FORD OWNERS* will be Intereasted to know that they cam lmure their automnobiles agaInat lire \u003clnclud- Ing- explosion andi sel-ignitioni) at lower rates than the. owners of any other make, RATES AND CONDITIONS\u0026 1915 FPord Touring Car, $500................... e.00 for on. year. 1914 40 ....4....... .......... 5.50 1911 250 ..5........... «....... .75 Cars over three years old that have heen kept In specilly good repaIr will be insurta for amounts andi at rates m~ade to fit IndivIdual cases. - The. cars wii b. insured ile In any building or whist on the roat. THE LONDON MUTUAL FIRE INSURANCE COMPANY .aes ........... 83554.52 Suirplus to Poiceyholders.1433,61.40 Head Office, F. D. WILIAMS, 31 Scott St., Tor~onto. Manaing.Olrector OUR ADVERTISING POUICY We wiIi not, ktlbwingly or lnteni~tonally, insert advertisenients frei otiier than perfectly reliphie flrm8 or buswineus men. If suh.. scribora flnd 8417 of thern te b. othewise, w. wilI estesin it a favour If they will so advise us, glvlng full particul-ar. Adver6iing. aaeCnd ore",
         "TUIE COURIER. Thry Imethods permanontly rsoen C on v incing TestimoniaL, tural speech. Graduais pupili from ail parts of the worid: everywhere. WrIte for fr0. advIo. CU E over 1,000 ln one year. and literatore.naL 419 St. James Chambers, Toronto. Phone Main 4970. 11 \"MADE IN CANADA\"l Why flot buy the best beer when it çosts no more than the ordinary kind ? There is no doubt about the purity and quality of COSGRAVES (ChilI-Proof) PALE ALE $0 WHY TAKE ANY CHANCES. Scotd by good dealers everywhere --- aIso to behad at ail hotels anud licensed cafes. ,1Z5 '*He seems to ýthinli it will.\" \"I know better,*' lie'replied. ia the season that dengue cornes t and ail manner of fevers. If YoUi for hlm youl1 get him away at Ofl\u003c 'I don't believe you're well Y self.\" \"I-oh, I'm ail riglit. Thele any softness left lni me now.\" And hie drove off hastily tuirc ,the narrow, crooked streets wliere Bluff ecut into thLe purpie of the Wiien the clinib began -lie disii the ricksliaw and walked on with shut îtiglit. \"If she ýis capable of lýovlng anY she loves Mac,\" lie thouglit bitt \"Wliy lu Heaven's name Should try to stir up this in me again? li'aps she wouid like ýto flatter lier love by making me show miysel: weak.\" The bitterness showed its-elf r eniplatically every time lie met and often lie turned down side-sU' so that lie miglit avold lier eyes. 1I one evening when lie lay in lis 1 mock on the balcony lisa Chinese brouglit hlm a niote. He went d to ýthe liot-el s-lowly, and In the hall he methler. -Wliydid you send for me?. lie abruptly. She looked *at hlm, and the lac lier breast stirred. \"Dad lias laaten 11-a siglit t( of fever, I think. You were the dootor lie knew of here.\" \"I wisli you would forget I wi doctor once,\" lie sald impatientlY- IVI was lie who remembered,\" replled. He passed ln, and she went Il the baIcony to wait. The moonlight a path of s4lver on ýthe water h lier, the sky was prlcked wlth \"Weil?\" alie sald dul'ly when liec out. l'It's only a slighV toucli,\" lie 'ýHe ýought to have taken quinine 1v lie first fetit It coming on. W1Lý eartl didn't Mac, attend Vto hlm?\" She looked up'at him. \"Mac's gone. He left by the Francisco mail two daYs ago.\" 'ýWliy?\" \"There was no reason Vo mrake stay.\" \"You Vold hlm yoii did not love hl \"That wokuld! be notélng ne-, 1 told him so nearly every week for last flve years.\" \"Then why di lie go?\"' \"He told me one thing,' shie \"it was not you wbo made that take five years ago.\" His face twitched. \"There was no need for hlm VO itha t.\"I \"1No, It neyer reaýlly mattered, cept for the effeot 1V liad on your But why-did you pretend it was inistake 7\" '11MY career didu t matter. ItV W have rutned-thle other feilow.\" \"Mac?\" \"ýOne acts frcim romantie mil wben one la young,\" lie said brui ly'. \"You Vold me you loved hlmi, you?\"I \"That was five years ago.\" \"Yes-one's, feelings change quickly.\" Her eyes were smar4,Ing pp.ilf and she wondered if 1V had evel' in lier power to hurt hlmn as aile belng hurt now. \"ITt wasn't true even tlien,\" sIhe thickly. \"It liad ail the appearance Of truth.\" She Iooked at hlm, and lier lips' unst'eady, but she saw by the g10' lis- elves in Vhe dus!, that sonlPt stirred: \"Was 1V that made youl soCY0 \"Perliapa. One gatbera as cyniclam as one lias need for. mnade me need a lot then, Ninia.\" \"I waa just a girl.\" \"Aiid ~I was Vwenty-tive. It 50el very long Urne \u0026go.\" \"It Is a long trne, ago, but-tel Phll,-iave I grown so v'ery old?Il \"N.Ia,\" lie sad playfully-, \"YO\" very lke a oelyl I used to kinow be -the world' sopped rnvlflg awMle,\"' The Force f Mind Or the Mental Factor in Medcine By A. T. Schftoflld, M.D., M.R.C.S. .\u0026utilor of \"Nerves ln Dlaorder,\"",
         "THE COURIER. P Ioberf- mdiche1i CHAPTER VIII. An Open Verdict. IERE ls a wàdespread belle! in the truth of the saylug that \"1mur\u003ed-er widl oui,\" -but lit la not a ibelle! ii alw!ays or even oftena 3dstâtied, thre iit of unsolved ulurder mrys- 's1 ns s long as jr. is alarmang. Nor àere ire muchidouât that net a few 11S, u'eported as due ta naturai es psrtioularly r.,\u003e \",heat-falýlure,\" Ju meaUlty mu.rders. hiele niust 'be somnethlng soon,\" Peggy Willoughbby bopefully to Hiaurttou, as she bade hlm good- Élhat Sumday af.emnocn, andi sie Ut that some trace o! the mranu who Ienled Sylvia Chase muust bu ,,core rpo'n by tIhe police or ý5Sie irai een brougit up witb utire idea that \"inurder will Len shre returrned te -tie drawng tbis wss in bier mind, sud she 'lad the worrds to Hollander, wbo Itly agreed witb bier. 1, yes,\" Ire .said readily; \"aur de- es are very clever, I believe; villl speedlily ferret aut the trutb.\" Un't imagine wbo can have doue aid Colonel Wilaoughby, wholly lied ln this, tIre chie! probiem, Ited by the case. \"Nor can 1 see motive the murderer bad in de- 11g tire poor giri-that la what mie ýcomplet-eliy.\" doubt wiren the facts are 1,ad Holiander modcily, \"it e seen thnt there la very littie ry about thre affaîr.\" f acts, se far don't help us very do they?\"I ire must be something soýon,\" eggy again. à ve aîways t.bougbt travelling an 1lways was ýsa sate,\" said Mrs. gbby, speaking tram. another )f view, \"but after this I shaîl feel qulte comtartable unleas I t proper escort. There is noa 'ulcatrion between tlrese ftrst- ,oIpartments except tram ont- Whil you are lu aire of theur fl't tell wiat is happeninglin thre and lit inlglt ire inurder! Ini abroad you au ese f roai oe fltlireqt into anoliber.\" t la a sateguard,\" said bier bus- t Ile went on aseurlagly: \"But t tre very tew o! these murders t as; at least, lIn Eugland, they c ýeedingly rare. Rabbery bas ai- h e the motive, but tire was d of tire klud here. I carnot un-P .d thre affair at ail! Howv un- d L 1s tirat poor Sylvia Chase bed .b fliy-an enemy who was deter- a to kill lier, snd yet there must d L'en some ane juat lîke that- S fi Whbo sent that telegramn ta Fie turned ta Hallander as hae \"neyer was so puzzled lu aIl la SUMMARY 0F PREVIOUS CHAP- TE RS. P REVIOUS chapters Introduce chiefly Max Hamilton, edi- tor of \"The Day,\"P Peggy Willoughby, with whomn Hamilton is ln love, and Villiers Chase, an]- other friend of Peggy'sI Ail at supper together In London. Max leaves hurrledly ta catch a nlght train. Thinking of peggy he le roused by \"Ail Change\" and turne ta rouse a lady In the compart- ment who, upon investigation, turne out to be Sylvia Chase, sis- ter of Villiers Chase-mysterousîy murdered. Investigations are at once begun by Su perintendent Johnson, who, ta conflrm a state- ment made by Max H-amilton, Visita Colonel Willoughby. Peggy begins ta recagnize the tact that she loves Ma X. A telegramn Is faund ln Sylvia Chase's handbag sent from Charing.Cross, and maklng an ap- polntment at Hampetead Heath station. hlm. They had heard the news, andi now eagerly and excitedly asked him. ta tell them the whole story. Before lie could complY w.ith their request hie was rung up On the telephone by tire managing editar, who was still at bis bouse, which was situated ln one of the southeru suburbs o! the great city. -Max had been ln communication wlth hlm alrea 'dy, and they now arranged that Max was neot to write out the nar- rative, but ta dictate it, In the form. of an interview, ta another meinber of the-staff, and that a candensed copy of this, sbould be sent to any journal or uews agency that wished ta have Il * Max immiediately set ta work; and, whule one man took down bis wards in shorthand, the others listened. \"How lucky it was for yau,\" said o)ne of the latter, \"that you were able ta prove an alibi, and sa qulckly! If the constable or Superintendent, John- son had ar.rested yau, yen mlght have had noa end of trouble.\"$ M AX laughed a littie, but sald sab- erly enougb, \"it was very lucky ludeed fer me.\" \"'The thing ta be done is ta find the flan in the fur coat wba baught the .wo tickets at Hampstead Heath sta- jan-that la the Ireart of the mys- ery,\" said the news. editor. He was a lever Journalist, and ratlher prlded dmself on belng a succestul amateur letective, but, Iu the position hie oece- led hie cauld nlot make any Indepen- ent Investigation. That mustbe doue y sanie other man. Hie looked at Max ird asked: \"What would yau like ta o in connection with the case, Max? hall I leave It in yaur hands?\", \"«That is jest what I wishi,\" said Max. After the story-in newspaper par- nice it -,as a \"great story\" whlch was et forth lu The Day-was lu type and ad been revised, Maxrang up Scoýtlaud ard and had a short conversation lth Superintendent Johnson, who told ni that hie anrd another detective had een ta Sylvla's flat, bad gone aver verythlug inii t, and satlafied tlten- Ilves that it afforded theni absolutelY chie. '\"What seenims ta me most renark- )le,\" said Johnson, summlng up the sults af bis second vlsit ta the flat, s the total absence a! what mlght be Iled purely persanual th4ungs. You iuld thlnk tbat Miss Cha.se had no lends outside ber literary work. here are na photagraphbs ta speak of, Ld no letters of a purely personal aracter. It la so strange tiret I ain most lnclined ta Wonder If by auy suce all such thIngs ba~d been re- oved.\" \"You remnember that ber brother id she was absorbed lnulier work, d dldn't go very mrrch into socie- Isaid Max. \"I know lie sa4d se, but stIl It ems unnatural for a young and i lily la very strange Pasily, \"but wben explanetion mey b ,ersation la given b ýaI o! e. greet many ta wici toak place fiext day, Mauday, )ers gave tire stary ta tire world. Of ail ,e Day had, as wes tire cîreumstancet \"sald b e very w h ecause bi otirar e~ on tire se when n\u003c o! Syl- these al taire re s, tire q1 C'a iMax w paoer, fr culers T] ;eut iu an talned clh 1were a]: se far ch -bat It m11 body it as se an n arra- ty. thre round s e handsome woman ta cut hersel! off 50 ýcompletely fram the world, as ap- pears to have been tIre case,\" per- sisted the superîutendent. \"Have you any newsr? Max next asked. \"'Only this: Miss Chase dined at hier club, the Ladies' Mllitary, at 7.30 last nig'ht, and stopped tirere till sIrortly after ten. She walked out o! the club; thre porter asked If Ie should caîl a taxr for bier, but she said she did nlot want one, and bade hlm good-nigbt. Hie says sie was lu goad spirits, and was very well. And there for the present the matter stanids,\" sald Johnson lu -conclusion, \"for we have flot yet beau able ta Irear what sire did a!ter leaving bier club-wbetber she went by train or otherwlse ta Hampstead Heathr sta- tion, nor have we heard of anytbing out of thé way lu the shape of a sange vebicle et or near tiret sta- tion last nigbt about eleveu-evary- thing was quite o! a normal charac- ter.\" \"Ail very disappointing, Pi' atraid,\" said 'Max. \"But s'omatiring may turu up et-any moment.\" Tis was aneth- er echo o! Peggy's liopetul words. \"It's aiýl dowurlgir: mystery still,\" said Johnson. T HiE flrst -editlon of Thre Day went tpressa t oeo'clock Iu tire mornlng. Just betore tiret heur 'Max rang up tha superIutandent again, and was, lnformad by hlm. that there had beenl no furtîrer development - that, ln fact, there was fia tresh news, but tIret tire lnquest would be lreld on Tuesday. The \"Train Murder Mystery,\" as It ,came ta be calied, carused an immense sensation thiraughout London and the whole country. Thre youth, baauty, and social position a! the victini o! tire tragedy, as well as the extreardin- ary clrcumatances lu whlch It was en- veloped, excltad public intereat lu the higireat degree, and evaked tire pro- faundeat sympethy. ,Mrs. Willoug'hby irad raised a note ai! alarm wltir respect ta tire danger a! rallway travelling. It was by no means a ncw note, but Sylvla's fate gave It fresir point, and made It buflk lergely lu the public mmnd, so thet tirere was a genaral 'outer.y. There were lattera and suggestions on thre sebject in mast jaurnals. Ore result o! the murder was tIrat Max Hamilton came lu for a greet deal of promilience, but It waa a lelnd of prominence whIicI hae was far tram deslrlng. For a tew days, irawever, lie was tIre most talked of man lu Eng. lend. It was a inuge advertlaement, wiricl a!terwards was te serve Ulm well, tlrougir ire could net have fore- seen it, in a strenge and w'bollly un- expecedj annectiou w1ithb tieeime, but for thre time being it waa mot dis-- agreewbIe ani unpieasant Queer peo- 1 ple camne te s-ee hlm. HRe was iniun- dateid witir tire strangest letter, hae was inx scelle danger of ireving hia lite, made e iburden te him. Hoiwever, tire was one vital ques- tion, and everybody, lîke tire news edi- ter of Tire Dey, wui askJug it. Tire generel cansclousness fastened ltseît on lt-Wiro was the man lu tire fur eao.t tiret had been wlth Sylvia Chase Étt I urpstead Heathr station on tiret 19 Take your eue from these firms,' Mr. Purchasing Agnt United States Steel Corporation Westinghouse Electric Comnpany UJnited States Navy Western 'Union Telegraph Co. New York Central Raîlroad New York City Consider the nurnbcr of pencils that are used annually in con- ccrns of such size. Consider the niumber of people usinig these penci]s who are on the payroll. Viewed in this light buying pen- cils has considerable possibilities both far profit and for loss. This is recognized by thre great organi- zations named ahove. They go ýat their pencil buying like every- thing cise, scientffically. They make tests and comparisons. And they buy Blaisdell pencils in large quiantifies, with a flattering abundance of repeat orders. Jsn 't this your eue, Mr. Pur- chasing Agent? Doean't it mean that you should at least write ta us and -ask us to prove ta you that Ëlaisdells in your organjzatjon would be as satisfactary and' econonical as, in thre companies Iisted above 1 Blaisdells Will do your work casier, quieker, and at lawer cost. They posse6s features of conveni- ence (in sharpening, etc.) peculiar ta treur alone. The qualityý of thre leads tells in their smooth- ness, their splendid writing quli- tics, thcir rcmarkably long life, and their universal popu1arity. 1Quality, convenience, economy r Satisfaction, time, money! That is the'Blaisdcll story in six worde. They will save 1-3 ta 1-4 of your wvooden pencil costs, clerks' time, and temper, too. Blaisdeil 202 is a \"general utility\" office pencil with an eraser and a lead as smootlz as velvet. Price 55c per dozenl; $5.40 per gross. Order by number from, your 13ta- tioner. Blaisdell is a complete line af pencils-cvcry kind for evcry purpose, including Regular, Col- ored, Copyiing, Indeible, Extra Ihiek, China Mýarking, Metal M'arking, Lumberman 's and Rail- r'oad pencils. AIL grades and ail legrees (yf iardness. Sold by esding statianers everywhere.",
         "THE COURIER. \"Comfori be-cornes second nature Io gaciof C/C a la Qrace corsets.\" Forty Years Agon Corsets (Madle itn Canada) were renowned for their graceful and supple lines. To-day they are'just so much more graceful and s0 much more comf ort- able as fortyr yeard'experience tenables un to make themi. The Crompton Corset Companp Limtted 78 York1 Stree, Toronto mimim~ §Iim :TAKE the COOL ROUTE: - through the Green Islands of Georgian Bay, the n -ronuantic passage of Sault Ste. Marie, and the m majestic tide of Lake Superior- and Thunder Bay TO THE WEST m Ç Four splendid Canadian steamers, Assinibola, the newspapsr o! the Monday had irn- partsd every scrap o! -information that was possible. On1e thlng, liowsvsr, must be notedc a!resh. Villiers Chase, 111 giving a bio- graphical account o! ls sister, re- peatýed the sta.tement whlch lis had made Vo Superintendent Johinson with respect to Vhe annuity whlch she lad enjoyed from Vhs Von Nordhelrns. lie said lie did not know its amount, but lad alw ays. tllought -It was something substantial. He was under the im- pression that she had told hlm -thmt was the case, but could flot remember exactly. The coroner, an elderly gentleman of benevolsut aspect, but an extreme- ly shrswd judge of rnankind, asked both Villiers -Chase and Bertha Schmidt if Vhsy iad. no suspicion who lad k-llec 'Sylvia. , e put the ques- tion most polntedly te the maid,. Both replisd that tley -did flot suispect any- one; they -could .thinýk of no oe as likely to: be guilty o! sudh a crime. \"The evidence points VoMiss Chlisse havlng met a man, .a man .w-ho -wasl wesring a !ur icoat, a- Hampstead Heath station late at niglit,\"' ýsad\u0026the coroner to Villiers. \"ýOne ~Imagines ,that sie must have k-nown -this Man pretty well,,\" he observed, \"anýd, 'while I do not desire in the le-ast to pain you, Captain Chase, 1V is rny iduty Vo -en- quýire lnto this matter, and I muist ask if your, aister was, engagec to ýbe inar-' ried-dIUd ýshe have a -love aiffair?\" '-I shiould an-swer, csrtaiinly noV,\" said Villiers. \"I neyer bheard o! any- Vthlng o! Vhs klnd. She was ne-ver on- gaged, so far -as 1 k-now. If she lad been or was engaged surely I slould have been told o! iV. -She was noV the kInd o! wornan Vo have -love affaira. 'She was a proud girl, and not at ail the sort o! person Vo, faîl in love read- ily. Besides, she was too much Inter- estecl n lier work, whlcli was lier life.\" Thie coroner thanked Villiers, and thýen asked If he had ever heard o! ler havlng any love aifair dujring -ler resi- dance In Germany. Villiers lad liesi- o! nothing o! the sort, nor did lie belleve there had be-en any. Wltli âternness lie declared that lis -sister was noV a \"flirtattous -per- son.\" B ERTUA SCHMEDT was even more ýpuéltive than Captalu Chiase in ,assertlng that Mies Chaie b-ad bad ne lover. 'IShe was a cold, -e-servec womsn, rny niistress,\" sald Schidt. \"ýMen dld noýt corne very frequently -Vo see lier, and whien tiey dld It was generally ln ,cot\u0026con wi'th biusins-o 1 under- stood. Wlienever I -heard any part o! tihe oon-rersation, and ma-de it ont, àV was always on grave an-serions sub- ;ecte relating Vo Vhs !rauleln'a literary work.' \"You bave no notion wlio was the main lin the fui, coat?\" asked the cor- oner. \"No, sir; none,,\" e-aid Solridt. The coroner looked at Superinten- dent Johinson and then a-t the jury be- fore rnslrng bis charge. He was think-ing ie liad neyer corne across a more mysterlous case. Bers -was a young and pre-tty wumsn, -we11 con- nected~, hlglily educated, o! -orne lIter- ary distinction, meeting a Man laVe at niglit who had suflIilent influence over be\" to make lier \"do that k-lnd o! thlu-g,\" as the coroner pliraed lier ac- tion In bis thouglits. Had tliere bee-a soins clandestine love affaîr, unkncwii Vo lier brother or lier msald? But wliat nee tliat It e-boulc be clandestine? 80 lie ask-ed hlmself. IV was a perfect puzzle. He e-ndedc by dlre-eting ths jury Vo re-turil an open ve-rdict, remnarking that neo doubt the police would con- tinue Vo, prosecute theIr investigations w4hthiVle utrnost assiduitY. \"TIhat a cruel and dastardly murde«' bas bee-n -oommltted tliere, is ne -doubt whatever,\" lie sald. \"What e-vidence there Is le-ados us to suppose that it was perpe-trated by the manuin the fur coat wlio bmiglit the-tiekets at Hamip- ste-ad Heath station, but thex'e 18 ne0 direct evidence. An open v'erdict, therefore, will le be-st ln the aircum- stances of this inost mYsteriQus case.\" After the Inquest Max and4 the su- peritede3± exchaigeld a'few 'words. «\"What do yen think?\" \u00268kod Max. \"I -don't know wliat Vo think,\" Joinson, simply. \"Still, lt'S earlY yet! I don't admitthat I arn beatE CHAPTER IX. A Startling Development. F TJLJaccýouIts of h nus o! that TuÜesday; the mrnider a siJbect o! universal ânterest, the journals were bouglit in eflorfl quantîties and eagerly read; folOW 'were they more eagerly read -ti the house, of the Willoughbys. 1' o! them had been present at the qiumt whioh, itbey sýoon saw, liad closec little or nothing that -was k-nown to thern already. \u0026Sill,» as PerfectIY natural, tliey diecussed . It ail cornes just to Vths,\" said colonel; \"ýan open 'verdict, with a suiuptioei against the man in Vhs coat, but no clue as Vo wio, lie ~wa is. The coroner rathex hinted love miglit enter lato tlie trag but IV seerns a mere guess, withl n ing to -warrant it.\" \"Yes,\" sald. Mms. Willoughby, how unlikely it is in itself! If hail a lover, wlly sho-uld he kfill Prom jealouzy? But jealousy whom? But even if she liad ha lover, and had made hlm jealous, s'hould ýhe have murdered lier? Teads of that sort o! ýthing haiPpe amrOThg the passionate races o ,Sou-th, but surely neyer in Enil'giS \"Thajt'ýs exacetly what I think,\" Colonel Willoughby. \"'I du no-tbe the 'solution of tVhe riystery 1154 that -dIrectIon at ail; it must be 1 ed for elsew'liere.\"1 \"I agree with 'whlat Villiers C sald,\" remac'ked Peggy, wlio lid 1 lis-tening tu the conversation o! paren;ts. \"Syl-via wasý tee prou 'woMs te have love affaira, and tainly fax too proud to haive so1flE -crt love affalr.\" 1\"Too pnoud for love!\", exclal Mrs. Wlllougfby. '1wdat anl Peggy!\"' 11 did, fot perliaps express im wýel-l,\" repliecl Peggy, aml\u0026ig. cours, love Is a far greater thlng pride. 1 meant that ohle was a creaiture, a;bsortbed In lier werk lier brother sald., She did not mu0hli nterest ln -men. I neyer of ber naine belng coupled with of any mnan.\" \"That conflrms wliat Villiers the rnadd igtated,\" sald Colonl loughbY. \"But dIon't you see 10 that adds Vo -the myste'ry? For -t 'was a mau-we k-now Vhat; the shie Met, and -wVo minst have had's hold over ber.\"' \"I have Ibeen wondering if it c have -anyVhlng Vo do wlVi lier i Germanty,\" said Peggy. \"-Witb ler ife in Gerxnany-ý an idea if you 11k-e!\" said WIIIoug \"ýWîaà, ýthe -police, we may be ] wlll make ail sorts of inquirie-E -apectlng it.\"1 \"But it's nearly five years %90\u003e she le! t Germany ani came Vo J Loýndon,\u003e sald Mns. WilloughtY way of proýte-st Colonel Willoughbby madle no0 r and at tihait momuent Captain 11o1le was shown ln, and was ad corne. \"We we-re talking of poor Chase,\" sald Willoughby. ýh queet bas disclosed nothuiig there's no hint even of ,wlo e de-rer was.\" \"So I understauýd,\" sald 1-01H brlefly. \"I have seen thepae «'Tbere ese-ms te be no cu ever,\" e-aid Willoughby. \"ýBu was saving a moment azo that e notion,\" italien. ,~nfni i",
         "THE COURIER. Ordheims were very kcind tohler, aild [e ILPPeared tu ie perfectly happy [tii thean.\" Ile addressed thle lust srds, to peggy. Oh,\"' sald tbat ryoung lady, \"II was at turning thlngs love.r in rny mind, ei 1t Ocurred to nie that Sylvia's te gnight lie traced ultimately to have ýlPelnded on something or soine one Gerniany.\"1 1101lamider shook bis head. \"It 18 such an inexplicable niurder,\" e said, \"lfldeed, IVit, i agreed, and his Uiner injplied that it was idie to 2k Of It, since that was thle case. sides, lie had soiethiag else to talk Adt rivas a mûere pretext, forhle liad 33e rea\u0026llY Vo see Peggy, and if op- rtU-nlty faVoUred him to malle love lier. Re had liy ne means forgotten aPeclial interest sdie had exlùited Max Hamilton',s conversation -tio \"'s ýbeôTre as *well as that she liad \u003eWn 'iithl regard to thle Journaist 'selft, and lie wias anxious Vo find if lit was Possible, what, that ope- Iilftereet ma1glht mean, particularly h respect to bis e'wn prospects. 7'HAT lie llad to, speak about rwas \u003c Iteel! a splendid pretext-so eplendid that 'le was certain * it'Weuld net appear a pretext at to the Willeughtby. lieTe ivas prevalent at tihis time, liere had, been for a consideraible 0(1 before, In Britishi military cir- the deepest distrust et the do- 8 of Germany. The colossal sIze er argmy, thle menwimig growth ef fleet,1 thle vast expansion of lier ujerce, 'the ma.gnificent, develop- t ef lier Industries, suld, what ivas t asiguifleant, thle steady increase 18r population were facts wltl 'il' every one was well acquaiuted; bthese facts iniglit portend se far à'e Bîish Emipire was concerned 'lot understood, emcept by naval a1my people, wlie vlewed thexa scarcely ceucealed alarm. Preme dn the continent et Eu- Gerniany's ouly real rival was t RIritain, still the greatert power le we\u003erldý, and àt mas often sald tile eogiquest, or ait heast tile bun- 4tion, of 'Englaad was thle real 't tbait lay- behind the onermous ities of Genrmany. Frei tUme Vo tihere was a general \"sacare\" In \u003eres-s and icuglieut the country the \"Germon Menace,\" but these s fhad been short llved, and thelr 'lative effect had boen te make \u003euihk of! tihe population somewhat ereut-the cry of ,,Woit welt\" ri\u0026sed sel frequeatly, aud appar- ~with se litte Justiftcatiou, thlat m1e te lie heard rwith sometlling 0,01temipt. But thcugi Vhs wft5 tate ef affaire wltll the maJoitY D public; lit wias not se, wlVl men 'oloriel Wlloeughîby. To hlm the aaln Menace\" was thle rmost real 'as of! ths ltlait Hollander vpoire. refereucee uwhloh lied already miade to thle lite ot Sylv4a Cliase rmauy muade easy thle passing et 3i11-versation tel tile general -sub- ,f Germnuy, and -wlien lie began Baak eof a certaiu rumeur whldll iadlled 'hiW eairs, thle loubJeot was erestilug tilat Willoughby torgot, e time at any rate, te, speculate tihe niurder ot Sylvia Chasse; fis thle suliject much less inter- to 'Mrs. Willo.ughby aud Peggy, BY, tee, thlrougli the Colonel a-ud rl~iy men with wihom tihey came 'iOnsltant contact, were imlbued 1018tiulity te Germauy. If thie suibjeut was luterestîng, 'ide2r, th~e mnan -who now lutaio- itwu also interestine-gmre âUY beeause lie lied bis own 18 of information; In other It wiais tadtly understood by «1lu tihe knew\" thlat his poitioni ) 3eneral Staff of thei Britishl IVa_ minî',s1v la nn nyif3 tliat tliese vIsits were a cloak, as it ivere, covering up a protound and 'widespread. systeni of International es- plenage, of wlhieh lie was the centre and the inspiration. Naturally' such bhings were flot shoute-d froni the liousetops; they were whispered. amongst service men. Col- onel Willoughby, for one, knew; even Mixa. Willoughiby and Peggy llad more than a espiclon, and Hoilander ra- ther rose thoin f ei in their estimation by reason of it, for they judged tihat his, vocation wias oue of thle utmost danger and, called for ail manner of ânue qualities-devetion, courage, cool- neas, patience, foresiglit and a con- summate Mcill. \"H1ave you heard wliat thley are say- ing about the new gun?\" lie asked Colonel Willoughby. There was a report current tihat'thle Argmy Council had adopted a new kind of camnon ot great *ize and power. In wiat way it differed f ro-m the can- non then generally in use was flot -4pecified; indeed, 'there *was, a great deal of mnystery about li, but It was tihouglit tihat a process llad been in- vented iy whioh It was no0 longer ne- cessary toe have guns \"wired.\" INo,\" sald Willoughiby, îwith quick Interest; ithere waz that ln thle tone et tile other whldll st once excited bis attention. \"lIt la belng said,\"' Hollander con- tinued, \"that some 'plans of thle new ,gun have found tiheir way acrosse 'the Northl Sei\" \"oh, I hope that's net true,\" crled the Colonel. III fancy it is,\" Hollander answered. 'II heard of it in a round-about waY, but for ai that 1 't5hinik the rumeour le probably triie.\" \"1We have been betrayed \u0026gain, ýthen?\" \"liV muet ie. se.\"1 menV\" said Willoeughby, inrdig- IV is difficult te believe tihat auy EnglIshman weuld lie a 'traitor!\" ex- claimed Peggy. \"It le far more llkely, ls it not, that the Germans have got the plains of thle new gun, If they've ,really goýt them, Vlrough semne apy?» \"'They thawe spies everywhere,\" said Mr\u0026. Willoughbly. \"Fver\u003ebody 15 aware ot 121\" \"lYes, Germans,\" sald tihe Colonel. As lie spolie lu an aimost lierce velues, Max Hamilton entered the cdrawIugirom. \"'Rave yeu any news 7\" \u0026oked I\u003eeggy, ais aille eiook hande with hlm. \"lAbout thle murder?\" lie asked, and as she nodded assent, lie went on, lTllere'o nothing, I believe, tllat's not la thle evenIng papers.\" \"lWel have seen tllem; îtileY tell US oui-y what rwe already knew,» she oald. 'I hoped you miglit have somef freeli news.\" \"lThere may lie somne to-night yet,\" sald Max. \"Treseutly 1 shall ring uP the office, If yon will permit me, andl ' oh, thacik yen, yes, Max,\" sall 'Mrs. Wiloughiby, whe h\"e been l.istening. \"'We were wondering if the murder couldhave cogne eut o! anyting deal- ing withl ,Sylvia's lif e iu GermanY- audthen rwe were ýtalklug et the suc- ceass of! German spies. ln England.\" '\"I doun% quite see thle eosunectieii,» 8sald Max, wlth a dllarmiug smile that deprived éis remarli o! ail rudeness. \"TIhere lsn't, any,\" elle retiurned, aise smilling, \"First wie talked of POOr Sylvia, andl týhn eof sonehng Capt-al Hollauder had heard, Ibut wlid lhad no.thlng to dûe wlth Sylvia.\u003e \"Have yen heard ot lut, Max?\" broke ini Colonel Wlloughlby. \"'Have Y011 lieaird the rumeur thait Germia» apies have conthived te steal senie of the plans 01 tihe new gun?\" \"'No, air,\" Max replied tC\u003e thle 'Col- onel. Thon addressing Hollander lie sid, \"Do yen thinli the rumeur le rue?\"- \"f1 thinki jt quite .lkely to lie t1 11 bhat copies of the plans are in tihe h'nsud of thle Gerinan Staff; seoner ~r laiter, and it generaily 18 sooner, 5hey hear of everythIng we do,\" HIIo- ander aieswered. \"The country le fIlled 'wit their The World's Finest Tea g'1 w - - -- - -87 Tea out-rivals and out-seils ail others, solely through its deliclous f lavour and down-right ail-rou nd goodness. Perfected by Canadians, Continent--and daily in use in thousands of Canachan homes. Table Sait is flot affected by climate or weather changes. It never gets damp-never clogs the shaker- but is always dry and free running. ASK YOUR DEALER! 150A \" B -O -Rm-D -O CHOCOLATES ONE FLAVOR ONLY--IT'S EXQUIS ITE Your dealer eau suPP1Y you B-O-lt-f-O -in daint'y iOc.\u003e packages-half or oDe pound.boxes or -in bulk. The quality is always the sanie and there is but one flavor-it tickles the palate and calis for more! See the name on each piece-it'8 your safeguard. MADE ONLY 13Y The Montreal Bi8C uÜit Company MONTREAL -QUEBEC",
         "THE COURIER. spies,\" crieti Colonel Wullougliby, pas- sionately, \"andi we are not hli care- ful enougli ot our se\u003ecrets.\" lie moea- tioned several \"secTets\" whicli liat passeti into thie possession o! the Ger- mans-tow, Itat never been ascer- taineti. H1e thon went ou to aay lie coulti nat poasibly Ibelieve tliat Eing- lialimen coixlt be traitera. This led te soine conversation on spies andi espionage wnhAi Max thouglit some- wliat duill About hlf!.paet ten lie telephoueti te the office of has paper, as lie liat auggested, te zeo if there was any !tlier 110ws respecting thie murder, anti receiveti a message iu re- ply announcing vit lie saw at once was a startling deveioprnent. \"'A teleglamn lias just corne froni Siniles, our correspondent in berieu, said the voies ait the otlier end of th( 'phione,' \"lanti lie vires that the Von Nortilelins tate that tliey paiti no an- nuity te Sylvia Chiase - tlie denial ,cornes £reon the Gxia. Von Nordhein blinseif.*\", Max'a face vas a etrange study at that moment. After a short pause lie inquiret if there was auything more. '\"Nobhing,\" sali the voice. CHÂPTER X. A Strange Love Qucat. e\u0026SHALL 1 ring off?\" asket thle Jvoice teleplioning tram 'The Day\" to Max Hamilton. \"Not iyet, le.,\"Max .returnexi. \"lWalt a moment, or, botter Uati, put me on to the managing editor, 1 sup- pose lie lu An.\" \"Yes, lie la; 1'il counect you at 'la that you, Max ?\" inquired a dl!- ,feront voice-that of the greait man \"Yes. 11ae yeu heard a rumour that the Germian Armiy Staff have sue- ceeded inl getting some plans of the new S=n we've been conipllmeuting oureeves one înventing 7\" \"'Tite nev \u0026un! You've boeard that albout At, Max\"' \"I have, to-niglt, anti f rom a pretty gooti soure, I thougbt you anlght le to ascertain Af there's any trulli lu t\"$ \"All iglit. l'il ses vit ca= be founti out. la that ail?\" \"lYes, fofld nlglit.\" \"-Gooti nlglit.\" Miax rang off, but lie diti not Arn- inediately beave the teleplioue-box, a sort of cupboard, wieh stootiý An tlie -hall; lie was thlnblng, net of tlie runi- our about the nev gun, but of the etartling development la the story of the iurder of Sylvia Chise. That unfortunate, voman, At Dov vae certain, bad nover ha\u0026% an',4n- nulrty itron tlie Von Nortihelma. If sihe liat actually toli lier brother, Viliers, that alie vas pald thLt an- nuitiy, she vas intentlonally tiecelvlng 'hlm. it miglit b. that sIte Itat flot detiteiy tolti Villiers that, 'but lis.t led hlm to supipose At was the case. Even se, ehe liad de-eived hlm. SWhat titi ls nov fact inean? What light, If an, didiAt thro.w upýon the murder? -Max asketi hinaseif. Now, while going over lier flat wlth thie Superintentient, Villiers Chase andi Bertha Schidt, Max lad seen;am- milstakoable evitences that Sylvia vas, lu very prosperous circumstances. The finely furniabeti flat, the beautlful clothea, the costly ýfurs, andi the rare an\" expenislve jewellery ail apoke of lier belng in the enjoynent of a con- sitierable inoome. Hie renenabereti thet it liat cocurred te hlm, as lie liat noteti these signa of lier being very, coenfortably off, that as a iterary vo- man, even of some standing, alie coulti sca.rcely have niate enougit rnney te aceunt for lier laiavng ail these things, espiaclally the jewellery, anti even the aauiuity, of vhicli lier brother hat spoken, liartly seemedto explain everything. But there bad been ne aniiulty! Wlieuee, ýtheni, liat ale tierivet lier Inone-tlie Ancoine wliel paiti fer the flat, the ebethes, 'the fure, Vhe jewels? Instantly another question aTose An has mmnd. Couli lte Ancome have corne te lier frein the man, vIte, lie be- liev;EJ, bad killei lier? He liat been present 4througliout the iuquest, anti liad follewed à1l the pro- ceedings thereat witli the mrlst sedul- ou, care. He bad board thes coroner ask Villiers Chaise if Sylvia had be -engaget to Ibe niarried-if she 1USd love ail air. Max had thouglit t question rather a cruel one, bu1Jt st poseti the -coroner deeniet it neoeffl to put It. He had listeneti wliile _v hoers lad. replieti confidently, \"ýI sholt anaiwer, certainly not,\" andi lad 90 on1 to state that Jais sis ter liat n0M beeli engageti, andi jiat nover hld, far as lie knew, a love aif air. ~M recalleti perfectly ail thlat Villiers a point. Were Villiers and thé inaid Wrofl Hati there been a love affair alter --one o! whicli botli of themi 'w Ignorant? It was possible, but soenehowM diti not believe that thlere baid be a love affair. What lie bat bue' andi observeti of ýSylvia Cbaze a\u00261r5 with the statenients of lier brtI anti of the m4aid; as Villiers lia marketi o! ler, site was not a \"'fit' tiens woman.\" And If love liat net beeon the whcli bounti ler to this ufllIiQ man, whIt hati the tie been? ,But Max coulti fot stand any bI01 ln the teleplion\u0026box; the WlllOUhti woulti notice how inany miunute3 had been out o! the drawing-ro«f, a mlghit be surpriseti; lie couit Olot »t lu the -box andi go on malting vag guesses as te, thie connection Gietwe Sylvia Chiase and the man vWI10 I given lier the money, andi prOle 'had inurdoreti her. tei, 'Il suppose I mlust tellihw neya is, thougli lt's perhapp 110t actly nies. SURl, it!s ne goot S pressing it, for lt ýwill be ln 'The Po to-morrow and, very likely, 1lu etl papers tee.\" So wlien lie returneti to the dre ing-roosn, andi was asdeed If lie bi Iteard anythlng, lie tolti thon'l V clsely wiat had i been saiti to hl 01 tlie 'phone. - \"She liat no annulty frem the Nortilelme!\" exclairne4 »Cxlonel V lougblby. l'Viliers dstinctIV isait \"11é mnust have been mistakefi,\" 8; Max. M1e went on te speaký Of 1 evidences lie liat ioted of sylv proasterlty, andi laow le liati tb01\" thaît the amount ste, anade 'bY -ha erary wooek couli liardly acoou31t it. l'If alie didn't have thisa-ni'11i I can't account for At at ail,\" lie 'WOI up by saying. IWliat oue eaw'n that sIte bad, a !alrly large 1aicOle really good lncome.'e lýWliere tîd At corne frein?\" as WlblougbJby. \"Ye«, tliat lu the question,\" Max. \"I don't lcnow wliat the as te At can be unleas YOU BaY sorneting te do witli the Mal' kIllet lier, anti yet the anavwer 51 net lie tlipre at all. StiAU, that iB Idea that cernes naturallY Au1tO heat. Wb.at lu sure la that theG tery steaduly deepeus.\" \"1 arn not se sure of thlat,\" ol\u003ejec Hollander. \"ThOlere was a int il evonlng papoTa--or was At ýthe iOro' _wli gave ît? auggestlng tha5t N Gl0ase may have liat a love affS'r- ,*The coroner a.sked viiers 01 if Sylvia liat been engageti te b was It, biut rl look at one ofth pera-please vait a -meIft.\" H E wn nohs\"e, n 1 paper. Thte ColoneluîuaII3' W a icheerful andi even conftident alr; wa\u0026s the sort of man' who isdIP te see andi te aae the best OfDo andi things, whiol.is a very ecl way of going tbrougli tlie WOI'14' lie came Auto theba injfgýr0Wu face was clouded. ,,It was just tilat,\" lie said. Coroner asibet Villiers Clisse if Itat been eihgaged or had iad 9 love affair, andi Viirs ,eplied olie hiad never been engage'dan xiever bat a love affar--thQUh lie coiild make the latter sttOuo don't quite see, for sheie il had several leve affaJrs Withu knowing anrything aiboult thbGi\"",
         "THE COURIER. 8.rd of Vihomx,\" persisted the Colonel. \"That le true, but there was ber aracter, and You can't pass by what r lnald said; elle was positive that ez Obasehlad no loyers, and she was elY to kuow.\" 'Witli the ordinary run of mis- s9ee, that rnlgbt and pro'bUly would le lieen the case, i\u003eut Sylvia Chase ,8 flt an ordinary mistress,\" sald 1lonel Willoughby. \"You see, lVs Bthie-.\" Willougliby hesitated, Ithen resumed. \"Lets be ýfrank. seeme to mie that if ;Sylvia bad a tl loer, yen ýcan accouýnt for ber in- n-fýor the flat, the clothes, the S, and the jewellery of whlch yen ,ke, Max; le it neot ýso?\" lie asked, rLiiigto Hoilander. 1 agree, with yen entlIrely,\" said 1lander. Oh, no!\" exclaimeed. Peggy, In a ce that quivered rwlth. Indignant lung. I[don't believe lt, either,\" said Mrs. 101ugbby earnestly. Yet -the Colonel's supposition of re b\u003eelng, or of there liaving (béen, leh lover in the case appears, as ý1lggested, to explain part of the 3terY,\" sald Hollander, in a grave ,cia;l toue. \"That là wliat 1 meant ýnt Isaid to Max a'minute ago that àîSnot se sure that the mystery had 'fIre greater; thocughhle thouglit lt If the detectives can discover main, thie rlch lover, the naystery, el certain, wIllanson lie solved.\" )LONEL WILLOUGIIBY nodded aPlproval, but his wife sliook her bead diseentlngly. Peggy sat up 'straiglit, and lier colour liad risen tIs; It was éhe who now spoke. tbilnk yu 'are qui-te rnistaken, 'fln Roliander,\" she said, and ber B ^wae very firm; there was indig- )u In It atill, but eomething that n'ore like angry resentiment, for Wae greatiy vexed and moived. I Ot Ibleve that Sylvia baal a lover Il. The Idea tliat she bad a rlih ''Who gave lier ail these luxuries ýsurd, besides beiag very #cruel and unJust-I, -for one, can never De- or V,\" echoed Mre. Willough.by. was mnerely a su-pposition,\" prof- the Colonel, \"'wbich we were dis- 1ag.\" (He thouglt R \"qulte nIce\", bis womenfolk eliould stand up Yl.vla, but as a mian o! the world luglit lie knew better ýthan tliey the world was. \"We were try- \u003e f11 up thie 'gaps In tlie case.\" bat other tlieory can tliere be ?\" 1I Hollander, looklag wIthi open ration at Peggy, wboes lielght- collou wau vastiy becoming. bave nons,\" sald Peggy, \"tut I never accept yourz.\" She w-as, ring to Hollander net to lier there le a good de t,\" Hollander un'w it te tblamk o! a eeci 1, graat you It w-a ,lo'w the sur-face, sO lase's mald knew not a-ver, andi tben. 'thât, )ng tIn laail prob base's pnosperlty r yesterday but hall le years, thene w-as an-el, ýfollow-sd blyt Smin'der Ini the t nmelodrama, but It ILife Js really fu -o happenings ever mnal. Yeu mustr is adidrsslag -Po, .you kaw very littl iase's life.\" cIte ln the saine gisa before. The Colon ewr had spolten ýveny Ilouglhby began to hi É thee 'was somethux . ut Poggy w-as s ,nd elle iMsliIked -ii or dome before. ew ber at school,\" v'aimny, \"and w-bat a e0 she le in alter I1 1 of lier at the. In\u003c e was a cold (proud a cold xn'oud woxmau Maxc had been sittin\u0026 ietening to the conversation; býe thouglit Peggy was splendid in lier defence o! the dead girl, and bis whole heart w-ont out to aie r-peihaps. it w-as sblning ia his eyes, eloquent of bils love for ber, for when shle turned frein Hollander and (looked at hlm, ber face suddenly tooýk on a stili deeper colour-she was blusbing like a red, red rose! \"What do you thimk, Max?\" she asked. \"You are sa.ying nothing!\" -There was a faint note of reproacli ini lier accents, 'Il tliink just as you do,\" lie replied *at once, to lier great deliglit. 'Il don't think thls je a love affair at al-Mliss Cbase came by ber income in seins other way; what lt was 1 don't know -and lier bhrother did not kno.w, -but 1 suppoise the wbole trutli w-Il De *brought into the liglit before long..' \"IBy ths detectives ?\" asked Hollan- -der, with a sneering sile. ,Obser- vant always, lie hall seen tbe.llttls by- play that had taken place between Max and Peggy, and lt was gaIl and w-ormw-ood to hlm; lie aise bad seen that the line he lied taken Up had been in the nature of a faise mnove, se far as sbe wzai concerned, but there had beenother reouos for It. Besides lie lad been annoyed, that Max liad come in-that evenIng. -perliajps,\" eald Max, tranquilly. \"Oh, ,Max,\" Pig-,y ârioke in excit- ed!ly; \"couldn't -sou lielp? Couldr.'t you do somet.hlng 1? It almost looks ais if you ougbt toil Juet tlink bhow you came IaVa lier \u0026tory--and frein tbis bouse too! Cannot yotm malle At yonr businessl te find out thie truth? Oli, If 1 were you, 1 slioid! \" Max gazed lnto lier eyes-wore tliey not eiaying to hLm, \"Will you not do thie for me?\" Rer father lauglied at luis daugliter's ouIburst, and said, \"Max, dear Peg, liais hie w-ork to do.\" «Yes,\" said Max, smlling, happily, albeit tbe mono.syllabls seemed enig- miatical, but Peggy seemed te under- stand. ,Wlat next took pllace filled the rest with wonder--one of thera with a di- vine joy, and anotber w-itl iblackest rage. For acitinrg on an impulse elle could not witlbstaind, and It may te hadl nu w-ish to withstand, Peggy* rose frei fier clair, walksd acroes to Max Ham- ilton, put ber liande on'bis shoulders, kiseed hlm, and ithen went sily out of the rouin. \"lWell, 1 deolars!\" sald the Coclonel. and iaugled, aloud; lie added, p1ail- fuly, 'to, Max, \"YQu've recslved your commission, M'Y boy\", \"'Yes,\" sald Max, sand could say no more! (Te, be Continueti). ,ai to coin- ÀSONG FOR RECRUITs. ýred. \",We NEW recruiting song, \"Kltch- ret love af- A ener's Question,\" lias corne te à very wel hand; w-ords and music by tiat even Muriel Bruce. The w-ords are very :lilg about direct and simple, as xnay Ils judged after last- by the chorus:- abillty, for 'Wiy ar,,'t you In khlakit\" vas flot a Sa\"s Kitchener, this ins you. contlaued Wliy arsn't you In kliaki? some vio An oid excuse won't do. âhs violent \"For I want flve million mnen,\" Saya aln. It le Ktlinr 15 ofosin- \"Brave and strong and trme.\"1 ,y w-bit as WIhy aremit You In kbk? emnember,\" And t.his means y'ou. ~gy-»\"tbat The tunle is a stlrrlns marcdi, qulte e rsally o! effective, easy and tunsful. It should become popular. Publlslied by the ve JIudiciwl Empire Music and Travel Club. el thouglit 'seseily; A PICK-M E-IP4 BATH. ave a balf- A noteti Amerlecan wUtter and ora, ig la w-hat ter llkes the prairies, and goes West 1maply en- every simmer. flurig a rainent trip m as he lie w-as overtaklen by nigbt in a littie village of Nebraska. H-e istayed at the retorted local liotel. Ini thie mnorning lie w-aated girl LB ait to take a bath, andi consulted the fe. What laindlord about it. just was- The lamidlerd sbouted~ b'aclt te the girl, and kitclien-\"Hey, Jim, this bore gent n. I abli w-ente to take a bath. Brlng the 3^ry is the fLûin's.\"- r, never!\" Seanl afterwards a boy appeareci Bliould51\"8 oarrylng a cake of yellow eoap, a eyes ex towei, aind a ploleaxe. rausemeuit \"Wbat's thle p'lokaxe for?\" asiced the a pretty visiter. her s~im- \"Wliyv,\" saiti the lantilord, \"you'Il have te dam up thie creek,'\" WHITE with your Lunch or Dinner coaxes an indifférent appetite into pleasurable anticipation of the meal. Try it.. At Dealers and Hotels. Broed and Rottled by DOMINION BREWERY COMPANY,, LIMITED, Toronto SHOPPER'S GUIDE PRINTING. ICE TICKETS tha.t sell thie 500dm. 411Al prieu lin StockL F1fty- cents per huntjre1. Saires for staunp. 1;rank H. Barnard, 35 Dundas St., Toronto. STAMPS AND COINS. PACKAGES free to collectors for 2 cents Postage; aiso offer hundred different foreign stamnps; catalogue; hinges- live conte. We buy stamups. Marks Stamnp Co., Toronto. A8 SSIIL 1'IVE MEMORY. OR 110W TO ATTEND AND NEVEU F'OR- GET. Prof. A. Loisette tells heu yen may streng-then the power of your meln. ory.A pef a. mronymen lnerea-aed caPblltle ad alarerIncorne. iSmno, cloth, 3.00, pc\u003et-paid. University Book C. ekA.. 8 University Ave., Toronto. HOTEL DIRECTORY THE NEW FREEMAN'8 MOTEL. (European Plan\u003e On, Hundred and Fifty Rocm. Single mrone, w1thout bath $150 and $2.00 per day; roins with bath, $i.00 per day and upwards. et. James and Notre Dame StU., Montres;, KING EDWARD HOTEL. Toronto. Canada. -Firepreof- Accenxnoclatlon fekr 750 guests, $1.50 tmP. Axuerican and Europgaz, Plans\u0026 MOSSOp HOTEL. (Limited) TORONTO, CANADA. Europan Plan. Absolutely Flreproof. Roomas wlth or wlthout bath from 1.n GOOD HUNTING on Canadian Northern Lines for Moose and Deer North of Quebec, in Central Ontario and north of Parry Sound. Also along the south shore of Nova Scotia. Further particulars are obtainable in our bookiet \" Where to Fish and Hunt\" or from the General Passenger Departments 68 King St E., Toronto, Oat.; 5flEM 226 St. James St., Montreal, Que.; 123 Hollis St., Halifax, N.S.",
         "F ind the Woman's Letter!. 25 Men and\" .1 Woman Wrote -this Advertisemeint IF YOU can find the woman's letter below, clip it and mail it to, us with your name and address. We will sepd you a free trial size of Colgate's Shaving Stick, Pow- der or Cream-whichever you wish. If you cannot find the woman's letter, send 4c in stamps for the trial size. Within each pair of quotation marks (in the body of the advertisement below) is a portion of an unsolicited letter from a satisfied user of Colgate's Stick, Powder or Cream. The name of any one of the writers will be given on request. COLGATE \u0026 CO. Dept. C. Drulimoud BIdg., Montreal Makers of Cashmere Bouquet Soap-luxurous, lasting, refined W. G. N. Shophord, Montreal, Solo Agent for Canada CwOLQATýE STICK -To show that one can get the money's worth front your Shaving Stick, I enclose what ls ieft of mine.* i an sending it to show the 'corn- pleto satisfaction of an old eus- tomer.\" , Colgate's 1leaves no smarting sensation.\" \"I sent for a samnple of Colgate's and 1 want nothing better for my use.\" \"Makes the skin smooth and coin- fortable with a most delightful and cool feeling not obtained with other soaps.\" \"Colgate's superi- ority is larticularly pronounced In the point of net drying on thie face. My experience 18 by no means lsolated, for I have yet to find a man who having tried Colgate's'would go bak to the soap he for- merly used,\" \"Tours ha-, a heavier and firiner lather than any other I have used.\" \"To any man wlth a wiry beard and tender skIn I most heartily commend Colgate's.\" \"Shaviaig has been a bug- bear to me-but since 1 used Colgate's a real plea- sure.\" \"In ail the Urne that 1 have been ushbg POWDER .dts comlina marked the beginning of shav- i ng comfort for me. 1 arn delighted with it. My skin le so tender that shaving usualiy leaves It Irrltated and more, but your Rapld-ShavO.PowdOr la soothlnig.\"1 Colgate's I have neyer had my face smart though 1 have used duli razors, cold water and ail the other drawbace. 1 have a very tender skn.\" - .11 is so far superior in smoothness, freshness of scent and otherwise, that 1 wonder how 1 ever remairned a slave to another s0 long.\" \"Have been trou bled with stInging sensation after shaving and bl am ed my razor. With your soap and the samie razor 1 enjoy a fine, quick shave.\" \"Tou must try lt--lt makes your skin look wonderful, so clear and alive. 1 massage with lather and brush about twice aL vyeek. Tour skin will respond almost at once and you will have people raving about your complexion as thev have about milne this Winter.\" - CREAI\u003e \"Vour ShavIng Cream baVes that smn comfortabie, veivçty feeling and r leaves the skmn with the sensation having been stretchect and the hair p out.,, \"shaved with Calgate's to-day and had the delightful shave since 1 began shavlng myý \"Have purchased several sticks for friends are as much Pleased with it as 1 amn.\" -Yeu say enough for it.\" \"It is absolutely the 1 know, for I have tried thei ail.\" lit fi best 1 ever used and I have been shaving f years.\" \"With its soothing and softening q ties It ls now a pleasure to sha-ve.\" -I fini lather continues moist until 1 have finished.\" have more than my mnoney's 'worth.\" handiest, cleanest and best soap I ever u \"My morning shave Is a luxury since using soap.\" \"It is aIl and more than you clair lt.\"1 \"It ls a better lather and lasts longer * Les. than 2 grains ieft. Ev en this ho couid have stuck on a now stick-no waste with Colgate's. Colgate's Zveeds No Mussy \"Rubbing In\"1 u"
      ],
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
      "published" : [
         "Toronto : Courier Press, Limited, [1915]"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Biweekly Feb. 2, 1918-Oct. 15, 1920"
      ],
      "type" : "document",
      "title" : [
         "The Canadian courier. : Vol. XVIII. No. 16 (September 18th, 1915)"
      ],
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06911_460",
      "label" : "Vol. XVIII. No. 16 (September 18th, 1915)",
      "source" : [
         "Library and Archives Canada."
      ],
      "contributor" : "oocihm",
      "pkey" : "oocihm.8_06911",
      "key" : "oocihm.8_06911_460",
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ]
   },
   "version" : "0.4"
}
{
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06911_406/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1",
   "doc" : {
      "key" : "oocihm.8_06911_406",
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ],
      "pkey" : "oocihm.8_06911",
      "contributor" : "oocihm",
      "source" : [
         "Library and Archives Canada."
      ],
      "label" : "Vol. XVI. No. 14 (September 5th, 1914)",
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06911_406",
      "type" : "document",
      "title" : [
         "The Canadian courier. : Vol. XVI. No. 14 (September 5th, 1914)"
      ],
      "published" : [
         "Toronto : Courier Press, Limited, [1914]"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Biweekly Feb. 2, 1918-Oct. 15, 1920"
      ],
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "FOCUSSING THE WAR S EPTEMBER, A. D. 1914, Cossacks, Uhlans and Africanders, black as ebony, are on the firing lines of war among infuriated Serbs, bewildered Austrians, gallant Frenchmen, cool-headed Bnitishers and soon-to-be-plucky \u003canadians, Australians and New Zealanders. ThUe regiments, of the Maharajah of Bilkanir and the Nizam of Hyderabad are muster- igfrom India. japanese gunners are pouanding at the forts of Kiao-Chau. Battalions of aviators and dirigible-ballooners are skirmishing in the clouds and dropping bombs into cities. Wireless messages are stuttering of victories and defeats, through the intan- gible ether which has' been harnessed for 'war as neyer it was for peace. For the first time in the evo- lution'of the world towards what used to, be known as the millennium, every continent in. the world and ffiree-fourths of the world's civilized inhabitants are in a state of unparalleled impact of armaments, which, for want of a better word, is stili described by the pitiful littie monosyllable \" War.\" On every sea of the seven seas at once the gunboat pickets of the world are in action. The Great Bear joins with the Southemn Cross and the red visage of Mars to watch ithis terrific upheaval of explosives. Wherefore thisissue is* given over to the human, super- human and sub-humnan interest Pf war..e",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. The Best Way bo Muskoka Boat sîde Stations at Lake joseph and o Bala Park give quick connections for ail Points. The best Way to the Maganetawan New Resorts at Bolger and South Maganetawan. The besi Way to the Rideau Lakes Direct Access to Principal Points is via CA NA DIA N NOR THERN RAIL WA Y Through Tourisi and Excursion Raies Now in El,7f.ect. Drink the Aie that 's Purest--i-rt's WHITE You can get it at your own dealers i ts and quarts, just right for at healthy, satîstying -thirst-quencher that neyer fails to please. Try it to-day Br.wed and BottI.d by DOMINION BREWERY COMPANY, LIMITED, Toronto N EW -FA.ST ,EXPRESS. SERVICE Through Michigan Centrai TwIn Tubes via Windsor now lni Efleat DaIIY- ~~é -Yeu £-Tt. P41...4\u003eTLj.u~,; r Lv. Montremi (WinIr St.) 8.46 a.ni \u003cE.T.\u003e Lv. Chicago (Cent. Sta. 8.80 *Mai. Ar. Toronto...........65.40 p.m. (ETY.) Ar. DoUaPit (Midi. Ce.) 5.86 11am. Lv. Toronto..........6.10 p.m. (E.T.\u003e Lv. Detroit \u003cMidi. Con.) 5.06 p.m. Lv. London........... 9.311 p.m. \u003cXLT.) Lv. London............ 8.08 P.M. Ar. Detroit \u003cMidi. Cen.) 12.35 a.m. (LT.r) Ar. Toronto ...........1. P.m. Lv. Detroit \u003cMidi. Cen.) 11.55 p.m. (C.. Lv. Toronito......... ...11.40 p.M. Ar. Chicago (Cent. eta.). 7.48 a.m. (C.- )Ar. Montruai (Wl.\"r St.) 8u a.. Only One Niglit on thie Road in Eacli Direction Solid ]Electrte-ilghted Trains with Buffet-Llbrsry-Comnpartmet-Ob»r\" Cars, Standard and Tourist Sleepers and Viret-cIsiE Coaches betweefl Moi, anid Chicago ln eaci direction Standard Sleeping Cars wlU. almo, be operated. between Montreal, Tor Detrit nd Cic~viaCanadian Psacific and )Mchigan Central RaI' tbrogh ichganCenralTunnel via Windsor, on Trans No. 21 Wemtb lealngTornto8.0 a.n.dally, and No. 20 Flatbound leaving Chicago, Partcuiaa fom Cnafan Paciflc Ticket Agents, or write M. G. MUNtI District Passenger Agent, Cor. King and Vonge Stu., Toronto. ALGONQUIN PROVINIAL (Ontario) PARK, Cart A Thoroughly Universal Vacation Terrltory, reached only by ti GRAND TRUNK -RAI1JLWulAY \u0026SYSTEM THE NEW CAMP HOTEL \"CAMP NOMINIGAN\"9 Ideal Cance Trlps--a Paradise For Camper@. 285 miles west of Montreal, 170 miles weet of Ot.tawa, 200 miles nor Toronto, 2,000 feet above sea level. The v\u003eark covers an area of 2,600,000 acres. Over 1,500 lakes rivers ln its boundawies. FInest flehlng ini the \"HiMghlands of Onti Speckled Trout, Salmon Trout and omall-moiithed Black Baes. THE IGHLAND INN Furnishes splendid hotel accommodation. Rates, $2.50 to $3.00 per $16.00 ti $18.00 per week. In addition Camps Nominigan and Mlnneaing offer novel and fortable accommodation at moder\u003eato rates. Write for full particulars, illustrated description matter, etc., t J. Moffatt, cor. Ring and Yoase Stireets, Toronto. G. T. BELL,' H. G. ELLIOTT, Passenger Traffle Manager, General Paueonger A Montreal, Que. Montreal, Que. TOURIST SEASONRi IN FULL SWING tw the \"Summer Provinces by the Sea.. SEE CANADAFIRST Reserve berths early for trains leaving %en yu vaaino h Bonaventure Union Depot, Montrent. hitic and picturesque S\u0026 OCEAN LIMITED-7.80 p.m. daily.Larne M4ARITIME EXPRSSB-8.40 a.m. dally, Lakte Ontaio - Tiosand ezcept Saturday, for Quebec, St. John, iimu\u0026d- apid. 0f the St. Hall! ax, the Sydneys, Prince Edward Lawrmncr--Mooir.ak-Qw. Island, Newfoundlsid. b-Mua yBar-Tadousme Samu.na River- Capoe ST. L.AWRENCE 8PECiAIL-8.30 p.mn., Trinit su Eternity-L*,. Monday,Wfidnl05day, Wri6aT, for Muîr- estia Momtiu. tay ayCacouna. Metisi Beach, Matefe, et~ (flER DELIGHTFUL 7111 Sofld Trsln of Vestibule Sleeping Cars. Along theo o.uh .aoe ofte uf fS E. TIFFXN, General Western Agent, toPcoNS King Edward Hotel Block, Toronto. :aper. . Or uist or$ fi",
         "CANADlAN COURINEE Apointer .for pencil We are buyers coflstâtlyin. ve3tigating the pencil item of bigP concerne (without cost to thecui) and poving frthoe tIrd(o that Biaisdeil paper penlcils cnt their vo 1- en pencil costs one- lb mention. the lime of whittiing save,1). Blaîieeis are \"the best bay\" fcoin OverY Fitandpoint of econoxny, conven- lenne and cleanliness, iAn inquiry wil1 brIng you thse same kjnd of proof. Blai#telI 7.0 t (bird or soft) is au in leohîble copyies: Seita! withoa qat .qs. It yieId, saoen copie$ , d i% a 'seiler ho, *IAsti.g\" qu.hity. Order by aumber Iros ur s~tationer. e-There are Blaiqsdells of esterju kind for hterY Pnr1sose. Pencils specially imprinted for ad- Tertising purposes. Solnr Solidb 690 a Prsarresfsve C.aooian ilots .5, A thin coating of pure, refined POured over the tops of the jars will keep out mould and fermentation indefinitely. It's the easiest way and the safest way. Put ni\u003e In handy one pound cartons. Four cakes te a carton. Your grocer keepe Parowox. TIE IMPERIAL OIL COMPANY, Limited .ot Moantroal Winnpeg Vancotivea Ottla Quobec caIfrEdmlofltofl Ial.xSt John ReiaSakatoon The Canadian Co uriÎer A National Weekly Published ai 12 Wellington Si. East, hg the Courier Press, Limiied VOL. XVI TORONTO NO. 14 Editor's Talk N EVER as journalism been confronted with a war thaf. so taxed the resources of the press and at the sainA time gave it relatively s0 littie from which to construct interesting stories. This is the first great war ever waged without military correspondents. England lias several jiien who mnighit try to replace the late lamented G. W. Steevens, who wrote sucli remarkable war letters £rom Ladysmith to a London journal. The United States has a few that iniglit rival the late Stephen Crane, who constructed sucli a vivid imaginary picture of the American Civil War. Even in Can- ada there are a few writers who expeted to he sent to the front with the Canadian troops. But the colour and feature service of the special corre- spondent near the firing fine is completely eut ont of this war. The world must be satisfied with syndicated news. Readers have no recourse but to depend upon the services of the weekly paper, which lias time to sift ail things, to arrange its matter, and to give colour where it belongs. This issue of the Courier is our first frank treatment of the war as a world-wide topie, obliterating everything else. It coiitains nothing but infornma- tion ivhich is absolutely authentie, presented from as many angles as possible. It contains no pictures but those rnost carefully chosen to illustrate the outstanding toie of the war. And it gives the war material a sane, orderly treatment which, in face of 'sucli a profound disturbance of everything under the sun, is now one of the necessities of life. KEEP Absorbine, Jr. Il means promflpt re- lief froni aches and pains-it kcep., lit'Ie cut, and bruises from beconiing more seri- I ous '-protects sensi- tive throats frmn tufectton. la more thon a liniment- it fa a positive antiseptic and g. reicide This doubles lis efficiency and ils uses. Absorhine, J r., la especially gond for ehildreut hurts because it ta so hariffless std e afe taouse- made of pure herbs ansd eontains nu minerais andi is flan dest ructive of ti isue. For Toothache. A les, drops of Absorbine, Jr., ruhbed on the gunts, or applied on cDtton to casity will prompt y stop the ach.ng. But dont lot the re- lief front pain keep yuu front your dentist. For ote, Bruis.-s. Absorbione.,Jr.,tukeseut sure- ness, kijis the germa, makes the part aseptica ly dlean and promotes rapid hea-ing. For Spraine and Sweltinge. fl alisys psitn gopt rdures inflammation sud swelling. 1.o0ns42ti per hottie et dealers or delivered. Send 10 cents fer liberaI trial bot!, or pro- eure regular aise Irons yeur druggist today W. F. YOUNG, P. D. F. 282 Lyman\u0026 Bldg. . : - Mentreal, Cale. IRISHLINEN, y SYou know from \"H-ear- Yeay\"l that It ie unrivalled, but you can know by Ex- perlence, by writing to a House that has a record for straight tradIng of almost a century. MURPHY \u0026 ORR'S name associated with DAMASK TABLE LINEN, BED LINEN, HOUSE LINEN, LINEN CA MBIRIC HANI)KERCHIEFS. DRES'S LINENS, I~RISH LACES, etc., ls an absolute warranty. Illustrated Price Lists Free. MURPHY \u0026 ORR. Box 18. Belf at IRELAND encil /tý?ftî,iSôeý-/fcpop'm'pany PH [-LAD EL PH LA",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. rn Liquid Granite is a1 tough elastic floor var- nish that resists hard wear to an unusual degree. Scrub- bing with soap and hot water serves merely to brighten its beautiful lustre. These two finishes, like ail Berry Brothers Products, are of the highest quality. This qualîty is the resuit of over 56 years experience in varnish manufacture. Berry Brothers Varnishes are sold by tl'e leading dealer in every city. Ask him which \" Berry\" Varnish wil1 meet your requircmc nts best--and use It. *-ERY BROTHE\u003e EaAr1d.-s LaidestVarnishMaoer The range with pure- -whil-îte enamelled steel reservoir stamped from one piece. The 'i\u003eaadereservoir is s(;;mIes __d cean ~ enough te use in cooking,-. qnd preserving-. See th-e McClary dealer.'e Talk Correctly and You WMI Think Correctly Sl-hod FE, lilh promotes sUpul\" thoegt. Cet into the habit of careleu se eof word. andyou. wiII tom be carle in thaught. To tbink cor\"ty and talk cwercty, t. talk efflectly and tbink coerectly yoS wiI Wd A DESK-BOOK 0F ERRORS IN ENGLJSH A very seiceable liul book. *Right to the. Point.\" lZmo. cloth. 24 pe% $ 1. p p. Noran,, Rchadson, 12 E. Wellington St., Toronto IN ANWEI SEMENTS MENTION \"THE CANADIAN COURIER.\" A White En- amel Finish ujL that will-Not turn yellow In your home you want a white enamel finish that will not turn yellow. fade nor check. You want a finish that will always look bright and new--a finish that is unharmed by frequent cleaning with soap and hot water. Luxberry White Enamel Whitest White-Berry Quality is such a finish. .hl gives Ai woodwork a IastiDgly beauti- fui porcelain white finish. For your Lors, stair-treads and other in- terior woodwork subjected to severe wear use Liquid Gýranite. V The Scrap Book Advance Notice.-At the club the other night a member of the Seventh Regiment found himself the centre of a group who were dIscussing the likelihood or an in- vasi on of Mexico by the National Guard. Cheerful remarks about the penetrative powers of Mauser bullets peppered about hlm. Everybody bad kindly suggestions to make--such, for Instance, as that a medal neatly adjusted over, each bullet- hole wouid make hlm look as good as new. The victim took it very well. 'I'd like to contribute just one remark to this discussion,\" he said. -If l'in reported shot in the back, remember that 1 May have turned around to encourage my n',en. ' -New York Call. A Warnlflg.-Womafl Is certainly cam- lng into her own. Even in tender ro- mance she is exerting an influence. The young man had Just been accepted. In bis rapture he exclaimed, \"But do you think. my love, I am good enough for you?\" His strong-minded fiancee looked sternly at hlm for a moment and replied, \"Good enough for me? You've got to be!\"- Judge. Vouthful Egotlsm.-Stimson (ta Wilie. reading the Paper)-\"What are you look- ing so cheerful about, Willie?\" Willie-' 'I see a lot of Scheel teachers are detained indeflnitely la Europe.\"- Lif e. li 1%M0 Far tram Home.-First Artist-\"The umnbrella you lent Me? I have lent it to a friend.\" Second Artist-' That is very awkward. The man who lent it to my friend tells hlmn that the owner wants it.\"-Le Rire. Attacklng School System.-Smnall Boy- \"Father, what is an equinox?\" Fond Parent-' What in the world do you go to school for? Don't you study niythologY? An etluinox is a mythical animal, haîf horse, haîf ex. The name Is derived from. the Latin 'equine' horse, and 'ox.' Dear me, they teach you abso- lutely nothing that is useful nowadays!- London Evening Standard. A Useful Comblne.-A Poiish couple camne before a ,Justice of the Peace to be mnarried. The young man presented his marriage license, and the pair stood up for the ceremofly. -Join hands,\" said the Justice of the peace. They did so, and the Justice looked a, thse document, which authorized hlm to unite in matrimony Zacbarewitz Perzyu- ski ,rnd Leokowards Jeulinskl. \"Ahem!\" he said. \"Zach-h'm-ski, do you take this womnan\"-and so f ortis. \"yes, sir,\" responded the young man. \"Leo r'm-h'm-ski, do you take thîs man to be\" and sO forth. \"Yes, sir,\" replied the wvoman. \"Then I pronounce you mlan and wif e,\" said thse Justice, glad to find somethîng he could pronounce. \"And I heartily con- gratulate you bath on having reduced those two nafles ta one.\"-Weekly Scots- man. btM9li out of Stock.-Young Blood (wishing ta purchase a pîneapple)-' I sye,ý._tw-have you got a pine?' Stout Woman (enjoylng good health\u003e- -Pine? Lor' bless yer, guv'ner, do I look like it? Neyer 'ad no illness in me life!\" -Priflter's Pie. XMMMli DIfficult ta Explaln.-While admittlng the general usefulness of the genus \"flap-' per, as correspondence clerks a braker tells of a terrible happening, caused by hs sigflifg a letter lIn a hurry. Thse let- tel' was duly dispatched, but was speed- lly returned by the client with some rather sarcastlc remarks. On ioaking at the concluding sentence ho faund the typlat had wrItten, \"busIness hore bas been on a more moral basis to-day.\"1 0f course what he said was \"normal.\" 11% t 1 A Good Reason.-A certain Territorial offîcer was much dislîked by his men. One evenlng, as he was'returning home, he slipped Into some deep water. A pri- vate In bis regiment, however, happened to see hlm, and after some trouble suc- ooueded In pulllng hlm out. Thse offIcer w s very profuse In his thanks, and asked itrescuer the best way he could reward hlm. '.Tie best way you can rewaf'd me,\". aid tise Boldier, \"is ta say nathing about 'Why, my dear fellow,\" said the as- tonished officer, \"why do you wish Me ta Say nothing about it?\" \"B1ecause, If the other fe,11ows knew I'd puied you .out,,they'd chiick me In!\"' 1-'% ANSWFI",
         "Vol XVL September 5, 1914 No. 14 Halifax an Time of War The Warden of the H-onour of the North, Sleepless But Veiled arn I à\u0026I Haîl1fax and Harbour tram the Citadel. The modern fortificationse are on the Islande betweei, the two \"arme\" which connect the H-arbour wlth the open sea. Bedford Basin, the inner harbour, le to the left and flot shown in the photograph. \"The Warden of the Honour of the North, Sleepî1ess but veiled arn I.\" 0 Wrote Kipling of Halifax, more than flfteen Years ago, in bis stirring \"Song of the Cities.\" To-day, Halifax is the capital, of ail Dominion cities, which is nearest the throb o! EuroPe's are. Yet It would flot be true to present aspects, SScribe the capital o! Nova Scotia as being agi- ' vWith War fever or lu tbe throes o! a tumultuous ;elnlnt. Halifax: is too oid a grey Sea Mother leld, at this moment, to bellIgerent bysterîa. 'e i,9 n0 sbrinkîng from tbe warfare, but ýthere grave realization.o! tbe vastness of tbe struggle. ('ce the declaration by Great Brîtain on August 4t elevell p.m. that a state o! warfare existe \u003eeeu the Empire and Germany, Hallifax bas found t\" cOnsiat o! one British cruiser after another. t ou the list was the \"Suffolk,\" tbe fiagship of Aditiiraî Craddýock, commanding tbe Fourth \"er Squadron. The information given out In on,01 the arrivai o! this sbip on the l3th showed for ten days, the ships o! tbe Fourth Cruiser Ldron were occupied In making the North D1l ractlcaiiy a Britis~h miii pond. The \"S.u!- a8.lse brOught news o! tbe chase o! the \"Karls- flear Bermuda. The \"Suffolk\" had made an ~eap)ture when she took the German oll tanker, au\"ad sent ber loto Bermuda under a prize r, tfd Halifax shared the interest 'l \"SuffOlW~s\" men, few o! them Sthat prize money had been ),ST iuteresting feature of the uffolk's\" stay was the Volun- er Coallng Movement. The the flagship were In sore need tand a happy Inspiration sent Of the 63rd Rifles Volunteers rards, audý the sailors rested, LO nillitiamien struggled under baskets, to the tune of \"Rule a\"as piayed by the \"Suffolk\" D'itizens Joined In the move- 'Orolughly enjoying this prao- ýriGtismn, a business flrm sent ýnl and the City Works Depart- 80 geuierously' contributed a Villing toilers. The last bag 0tous of coal was thrown into k~sbefore midnight and the ,Wsready for sea. Rear Ad- addock wrote a hearty letter of an1d the saJiors clieered the 'r CoalIrg Force as the be- and happy citizens took their 1 he city, ais nearly ail navy, to-ay,\" The revenue cutter \"ýCanada,\"1 which, before the advent of the \"Niobe\"l and the \"dRalnbow,\" was the \"4flagehlp\"l of the Canadian Atlantic fleet. The aada warsl uob\"alRnave servieq at Halifax after a long perlod of.,idliess. said a bright girl, who ls working for the hospital shîp funds. Everywhere, there is the evidence of naval acttvity, and, at night, the oid-time sailor songs which Britons have sung for generations ring out over the waters. The patriotIsm of the whole province ls ma.nIfest every day in messages of enrolment from towns which have seen historie figbts. Digby (named. for an Engiisb admirai); Annapolis, Royal, the oldest town In Canada; Windsor, Truro and ail the others are daily sending news or volunteers, and Halifax takes ail this tidings giadly but soberly, with a sedate pride iu ber sons. T HE Hospital Sbip Fund, in wbicb the women of Canada are deepiy interested. bas won the speclal enthusiasm of Nova Scotia women, who have contributed aiready much more than the original flve thousand dollars expected. In this work, the Halifax women have been especially active, and everywhere one sees a feminine interest In this essentially womanly undertaking dis-played In un- mistakable fashion. Mrs. McGregor, wife of the Lieutenant-Governor of Nova Scotia, la at the head of the Fundýs Committee for this province. The ordinary summer social life of Hall!fax go\"s on-with a difference. Bebind and beneath It ail, there is a sense of eternal vigilance. Five young midshipmen, graduates, of Halifax Naval Coilege, _________salled with the \"Suffolk\"' when It went out, and the comlng of the 'Good Hope\", and the \"Glory\" emphasized the quiet but effective work the ships o! the Fourth Cruiser Squadron are doing Iu the North Atlantic. The silence which bas fallen upon Britain's military and naval ife ls brooding, too, over citadel and harbour In Canada's oid point. Yet it ls a quiet of intense activity and deadly preparation, and tbe Canadien who bas hitherto been an inlander, re- gards it wIth a sudden appreciation of Kipling's Halifax verse- \"Sâleepiess but velled arn I. H cties In Canada. Its magnificent harbour was discovered by the French, who, were keenly on the alert for good harbours and strateglc situa- tions. It was the Frenchi who dis- covered Loulsbourg, Quebec,. Moutreal, Chicago, and St. Louis. They used Halifax as a basis for their attempt to retake Louisbourg aiter Its capture by the New Engiand forces Iu 1745. It was lu 1749, that' the British took up the work of making Halifax a naval",
         "('ANADIAN COURIERI. base. The British Government sent out 2,500 people, soldiers and settlers, under Colonel Cornwallis, first- Gover- for of tbe colony, te lay the early foun- dations. It was from Halifax tbat a naval force was sent for tbe second capture of Louisbourg and for tbe final attack upon Quebec. During tbe Re- volutionary War, 1776-1783, expeditions were sent tbence against Boston and New York. In 1812, it was again tbe rendezvous for the warsbips engaged in active operations against the United States. For nearly a century after- wards it was tbe base of supplies and a harbour of refuge for Britain's North Atlantic squadron. It is one of the most important coaling stations which Great Britain possesses, thougli the North At- lantic squadron and tbe British garrison bave passed into bisitory, and tbe whole military and naval equipment is now under the direct control of the Canadian military authorities.\" Besides its milltary and naval bistory, It bas an equally long and important commercial history. From its docks merchant vessels have come and gone H. M. S. \"Good Hope,\" one of the squadran of cruisers sent ta safeguard aur Atlantic coast. for one bundred and fifty years. J'e trade bas been internatiofal-wil Europe, tbe West Indies, and Uflite\u003c States ports. To-day, especialiy durifli the winter months, tbe largest Canadia-' vessels running ln the Atlantic miak, Halifax their 'first and la-st port of cal]1 As Canada's foreigil trade lias growl) Halifax bas sbared in the developmrel with St. John, Quebec, and Montreal. Politically, aiso. the city bas badil notable history. Many famous 'Île] have lived there. Prince Edward, DUIt of Kent, fatber of Queen Victoria, wa twice stationed tbere. Lord Nels0l visited it in bis wanderings. Prill William Henry, afterwards William IV knew the harbour well. Sir John Ingle and Sir Fenwick Williams, of Kent, bot Nova Scotians, served in the gafliso: in the later years of their careers. S Samuel Cunard, founder of the fainou Cunard Line, tbe firat line of steamer to run between Europe and Amnerloý got bis shipping inspiration in tbis, I native City. It bas produced a long liii of famous politiciafis, statesulen, an churchmefl. The Devil, the Machine and the Deep Seîr The Point Tbe Temple, London, Fr, Aug. 14tb, 1914. NO T since Napoleonic times bas one man earned universai batred as has Wiiheim II. Like Napoleon, bis ambition is insatiable, but tbere tbe resemblance ends. Napoleon was the lord of a nation that worsbipped bim; Wilhelm rules by tbe wblp and tbere is not infrequent snari- ing. Napoleon was a master o! tbe art of war; Wii- belm is the bero o! dress parades. Because lie was a man Napoleon became an Emperor; Wilbelmn was born an Emperor and bas not yet proved hlmself a man, but tbis sailow, sbrunken Prussian,-rendered savage by a tortured liver and cruel by a witbered arm, bas revlved, ln Europe, tbe bellef in a personai de-vil of tyranny; and tbe hatred of oppression is fiercer to-day tban it was a bundred years ago. Then, it nerved a vanquisbed Europe te turn and destroy tbe victor o! a bundred batties; stili more, now, will It nerve, a Europe strengtbened by a century of free- dom to crusb tbe ornament of a tbousand parades. A phrase coimnonly used of tbe German general onset at tbis time beginnîng in Nortb Lorraine and Beigium is: \"The war macbine now moves forward.\" Tbat is a figurative phrase wbicb in tbe case of tbe German army Is literally true. The past few days -of concentration on Brueseis and tbe accompanying detail attacks bave confirmed tbie strIklng exemplar of Liege. Tbe one element tbat influences most sud- denly and most vltally tbe fate of fbatties Is tbe buman element, and that la just what tbe German army-bullders bave striven to eliminate. A German regiment on parade gives one tbe Impression of dlock- work, only, If I may bie forgiven tbe twist of words, there la no spring in It. A British regiment is as supple and responsive as an Intelligent horse under its -rider, but German troops are about as manage- able as a motor bicycle. Power and speed tbey bave, and on a level and straiglit course all is weli, but In an armed duel In rougb country mechanice are o! littie avail. A German prisoner bas summed up the wbole situation: \"Das ist nlcbt ein Volkskrieg, das Ist eln Offizierkrleg,\" bie says (\"this is not a people's war, It-is an officers' war\"). And witb their mechanicai military creed, tbe officers set their machine againet men, and the cogs of the wheel are eplit in pieces-sucli wae Liege, and such, yesterday, was Dlest; and ail the valley o! the Meuse Is littered wltb tbese offerings ta tbe Mechanical Deity. But there are women and littie children wbo Cannet se tbat tbese are only littie pleces o! machinery brokell ta tbe greater glory o! Wllbeim. STEAMSHIPS RUN FREELY. N 0W for tbe deep sea. Little is known about the movements, on the waters, but there Must be some control of the North Sea In our bande for trade with the Scandinavian counitries and Den- mark ls once mare in motion and regular 'Unes o! steamsbips are running, se one May conjecture tbat the German navy le for tbe momne nt bottled up. The \"Gaieben\" and \"Breslau\" bave been cornered at last. The former Is o! the Dreadnought cruiser type, and the latter le a protected cruiser o! the second class. After bavlng sacrificed tbe merchant traffic o! the Mediterranean tbey were driven ta take refuge In the Dardanelles, wbere by the rules af International law tbey should be dismantled and lnterred. But tbe allies are met wlth the impudent assertion'tbat Tur- key bas purcbased tbem. A Cbange o! plumage for tbe German eagle, wbieh may. result ln Turkey meet- ing wltb tbe usual fate of bier kind befare Christmas. Bulgarla, it- la suggested by observera a! Balkan affairs, wlll be \"flung back Inta tbe SIav fold\" by of View of an English By HAROLD TRACY POOLEY tbis barefaced ac tion on tbe part of the Ottoman Em- pire. Tbat wiil complete the Balkan Chain and render stili more Important the magnificent deeds of Servia and fiery littIe Montenegro against Austria. SECRECY AND THE STATE 0F THE WAR. 'TAT no movements are prematurely knowfl speaks very well botb for the control of the forces and the reticenice of the press. 0f tbe Fleet in the Nortb Sea we know nothlng direct, and may only judge of its movernents by the effect upon trade ln that area-wblchb ly the way no one ever calîs the Gerinan Ocean nowadays. This is, of course, as it shouid be; premature disclosures can do no good and might produce mucli barm, so tbe publc must needs bave patience and trust to tbe Admiralty. The War Office, too, bas handied Its affairs witb a like delicacy, and no one o! tbe public bears of tbe movements o! troops. Already a great expeditionary force must bie on tbe Continent, but no sign of its landing bas appeared in the Engllsb press. And let us say at dnce tbat were It neot for tbe admirable reticence of that body, tbe authorities wouid not bave been able to mnaintain. the silence wbicb is so necessary, and has ibeen, tbanks ta tbe press, sO complete. i Actuai attacks run s0 far abead of formai deciara- tiens in this International melee, that It Is difficuit to extricate tbe \"Notes\" and \"Ultimatýa\" and \"Re- calis of Ambassadors\" from the acramble. Austria is now formaliy at war wlth England and France. Tbe Balkan States 'are ail. trembllng on the brink of sometblng, but wbat wlll actually bappen tbere it is difficuit to foreteli. One's experlence of tbem, bow- ever, leads one.to 'be sure of one thing only, tbat wbatever bappens It will be the qulte unexpected and the entirely Impossible. Russia Is moving, slow and terrible, toward ber western boundaries, and Italy is in a ferment o! popular excitemelit wbicb may at any moment direct bier course Into an active channel. Shouid she side wltb bier whilom allies, tbere wili, 1 am told on competetit authority, bue great popular anti-Teuton uprisiflgs ail over tbe country. But I cannot thlnk tbat there is any longer any posslbility o! Italy joining Germany and Austria. Neutrality Is ber raie as long as she can play it, but If the external pressure becomes too great, she muet play ber part witb the police and aid in bringing the Mad Dag of Europe ta the letbal cbarnber. Nortbern France wlll ble tbe central point of tbe great attaik. As far as can be ascertained tbe Ger- man army corps are belng focused upon that part fram the eas 't. Tbere is no doubt, o! course, tbat tbe attack farther sauth wlll be a strong effort as well, for the Austrian reInforcemente are now ln a position to take part ln it. Aise tbe fan-sbaped ar- rangement o! the advance from centrai Germany to the frontier allows of a rapld reinforcement. by reserves. If Ruesia can throw ber enormous forces forward at an early date, tbe German principle o! relees sacrifice of men will begin ta exbaust ber great reservoirs, af reinforcemnt, and tben the end wlll no longer lie far off. But Ruàssia moves, of necessity, slowly, and wbatever she 15 dolng Is kept strletly'secret, St. Peteraburgb le dumbý-truly this Io nat, a correspondentB' war. THE PAPER 10AMiNE. NOT only are tbe newsp)apers deprlved of the Ngreater part af their advertleement Incomes, but tbey are unable ta enjoy the compensatory advantages to lie had by lssulng speclals and lste f ou r na ls t specials and war editions and ail the usual self- ducing four-page extras o! journaistic enterPI Paper is very scarce and supplies must be caref treated. Even the portly \"Times\" looks emacia and the \"Mornlng Post\" is a baggard spectre eigbt flimsy pages. Now that Scandinavia is 0 ta us once more, supplies should be more plent but in any event there is a golden opportuiintY Canada and New!oundland ta build up a paper mal for berseif ln Great Britain on a larger scale t bier present modest supply. By the way, it le od, read on one's Toronto letters at this time the 8 tionai postmark \"Peace Year.\" MYSTERIOUS LIEGE. 'T'HE fascinatlng problem, o! Liege is difficuli ..keep away from for any time in any discus o! the war. At the present moment the tow occupied by German troops and it is ringed rc by a close line o! forts-odd littie places theY too, bal! underground, and walled witb six-foot crete cased ln tbree-lnch steel. The forts Cal command the town, but tbey can, it Is to be supPc prevent tbe egress o! German troope in a b How, then, dld tbe Germans get in? Tbe puzzle sents ail the difficuities o! the fully-rigged ehli a narrow necked bottie familiar ta ail chlldrefl sailor friends-aId wbat cbild bas not? THE OUTY 0F THE CITIZEN. VERYONE bas remarked bow wonderfullY E people o! this country have risen ta the sion and bow accurately those who have def qualifications are findlng their proper levele. rf bas now been establiebed a clearlng.house, 0 were, ta deal wltb the enormous number o! ulne1 fied applications whicb are now pouring in. National Service League, lnspired by its Presi4 Lord Roberts, and acting ln conjunction wlth Cavendish Club, le performing this valuable 1' and tbrougb Its means, It le ta be boped an adeq food contrai wîlll be equlpped. I cannot help thilS tbat this is the vital bome question at pree1t, I bave no doubt, with the extraordinary opportlir o! selection that the'Volunteer Social Service Bu wlll bave, this equipment will bie epeedily prav The behaviotir o! the people o! this country ln a a! unparaileled national anxiety is excellent lie pralse, and thiB spirit o! quiet determixiatiofI strenuoue effort ta belp lun every way, mlltary civil, prove ta the pessimiet that tbese Que wbîcb made Britain great are stili present ta bier sa. THE L.IGHTER SIDE 0F WAR. SOME Incidents occur ta relleve the gl' monotony o! anxiety that bolds the Wi1\"( most people at a time like this. Tbe fOl'c incident accurred ln the eettIng o! wlre eIaU mtnts ln one o! the eastern caunties (yes, V;, even prepared ta the extent o! efltanglemnents) A sturdy Territorial was buey unrolllflg10 o! wire whlcb bie straigbtened and paesed ta rade who wae maklng an ugly-looklng cat84 o! them among the bracken. Suddenly an eý tion from the man at the wire-drum. \"Stri\u003ce 1 that aln't a rum gaw.\" \"Wot's the matter, ye're alwiys gailn' Inter lits over sutthlnk9\" \"Bý If these lere wires ain't labelled 'made in Gerlu, -and'so, Indeed, they were. Even ln the recesees o! terrible tooting the In spirit animates the British breaet; chalked l8Xa a. little ironmonger's shop Is the legend, ' %harpened, Bayalleta pointed.\"1",
         "CANADIAN COURIIER. M4ARS AND HIS KALEIDOSCOPE What'the Red God of War Sees Day by Day -as the Hand of Fate Spins the Globe to His View Foôreword VAR i5 fi'OW the universal»passion of man- k1ld. Tbe nerve systeml o! the world, built itito a sbuddering organism in times Of Peace, can no longer be kept unconsciouS 'ents by the band o! tbe censor. Tbe story o! the Dan),alyzlng tumuit ever known in the aif airs of warid, the twenty-years' wars o! Napoleon coin- ted iit-o a terrible tabioid of explosives, bas ni ta be written. Tbe world at large 15 getting 'tany as it neyer got a wax story before. Up in ilnterlanids of Ungava, back in the ice-fields o! Artic and down aliong the barren lands 'of tbe ,t near Lake, Eskimos and yellow-Knlves are Ignorant that the world wbich put tbe furpoats he great rivers is plunged inta a cataciysmn o! Stefanissan, kuows nothing o! It. The MaP O! \u003epe rnaY be cbanged before bie knows that a b'as been fiired In tbe war o! 1914. Somewhereý 'e iunrmost wllds o! Putumayo. wbere the naked 'e 1tnips the rubber trees for the tires and boots vilzatian, there may be as yet no news o! tbis 1t cbapter in the book ef destruction. But tbe ler the negro gathers ta-day may yet find its way the tires Of an armoured motor-car that will the Il l!e.bladed chariots o! Boadicea resemble ' lo'ers b)y camparison. 1111t hour by hour tbe story shifts and tbe focus 11 Wa aliong wlth it. Wbat is calledl \"Arma- 'r»'J( b5gan ta came to a bead not far fram tbe ~If a Waterloo. The line o! battie was sud- Y ahfted southward ta Mons and ýCharlerai; and tb' 'anld waited ta hear what the legions of \"'\"\"I Warfare, o! war tbat for generations bas 1 kpt in -cold starage in that vast barbarismi \" ' as Russia, Was yet ta do on tbp #\u003eastern side le War Machina that bas its brain a- Berlin. At t'ieO wrltlng, wbile the \"anvil\" in France and rl'n' la holding back tbe ogrse-_shoe a! tbe Ger- ,advaxtee upnParis, the \"hammer\" o! Russia Is rIl !eçv prellmlnary mavemants. It was on d'y~-the day a! Thor, the god a! the hammer- t'le news a! tbe Russian impact upofi East ý),awOka the world !rom its unaasy slumbars. il.'eest civilization in tbe world rapresantad 'nlIdand France are now actively in league, he eatb-ral l the borders o! Russia, with tha Of the world's mosit colossal banbarism ill the Slav, ta twist the great war machine ii -Europe eut o! gear. Tbe cool-haaded 0- ln bis trench, the rampant Uhlan, the rest- le defendlng bis native giebe, the ebony- el fllcander deliriaus for death-these are now 'W the bumian. side o! the struggle that Is being hl' up to vast superbuman moving pictures ae a !eo the mysteriaus Slav. teý1\"d wben it will ail end there Is no om r philosopher or dipiomat ta say. , e\u003e' bas ganle out o! business. Stjrategy re- let lable ta be shattened out a! Its boots any 1 lloapby, that once had its headquarters ,ernY, has no' théories o! human betterment teoution , andoi analysis o! the humain mmnd ]oeXIin wheu t at it ail meansý. The Devil blmself atat sit tlght, knawing that for a whiie th 1Worid bas no room, for him. f e 'rId that is nlot actively at wan ls thrown Oo el1Igteninent upan the newepapars wbicb 1 w Owrl 0 ltouof facus; whQn the daath t t ereor woldstatesman somewbare else es seal o! a mouse in a voicana of eartb* ' tories and poems, and novels are belng ebyi t] j8 confiict wbichr, !rom Its most cosmic e tOi ta the lock o! a maiden's hair a troaper's lqcket, traverses the wbole e man experience and expression. Ol viual was nieyer s0 nelatlveIv small in 01 no ; and neyer s0 sensitive ta w,,hat et l the warld, Libe neyer meant at the terI e eUch and sao lIttie. Tragedy was neyer teflz ea camnedv neyer se strange. In the red ý f! details sucddaniy fiung at the wonld rea rew8IPars, fia mlnd is capable a! traclng be' n ellce and sum e! events. The best that t s ta select thase beatunes o! interest rt te n-ord fIgbting upaon the side a! human t a-galnst militar\u003e' despotlsm contain the O hefl and enligbtening information. eei 'Pa2e the !ollowlng nages a! this paper th anki' !napped aut; that the reader wba fo aily fiewsPapers bas no chance ta get Of aweek on world events at a time when qt*liný bas been put out of joint ma\u003e' be able Qeque1Ydwn and as fan as poFýqlb1e get il \"\"leO th~e situation. The articles in these 1110 Pantiaular sequenco. The\u003e' are niat intended to furnish opinions. They do nlot ciass as expert evidence on the war. Tbey are merely side- ligbts that from the wingS o! the stage illuminate as far as possible the strange weëb o! events se swi!tly woven in the looms of headlong buman history. Three Shrewd Spies What the Krupp lnterests Saw and Why-In Guileless Albion Wy ILLIAM WILE, Berlin correspondent o! the NY London \"Daily Mail,\" writes a dramatic remin- iscence o! an episode wbicb to bis way of tbink- ing tbrows ligbt on the warlike intentions af Ger- many. It concerna the visit -te England only two months ago of the bead of the Krilpp iron interests in Germafly, accompanied bY bis wi!e, to give it an THE MAN BEHIND THE ARMY. Lord KitchOflSr's latdit plcture-taken as h. left the War Office ta attend hie8 firot Cabinet meeting as Minlater for War. Infermal turfi, by Dr. Ehrellsberger, the Krupps' cbief technlc'al expert at Essen, and b\u003e' Her Van Buiaw, once the Krupp representative Ini London, This trio o! gun and aniiwun-plate experts lu the aniplay o! the Kaiser visited Birkenhead, Newcastle- on-Tyne, Glasgow, Barrow-n-Furnless and Sheffield. The visit was said ta 'be \"pnivate and unofficl.\", It was made wlth tha Intentionl o! inspectlng establish- menits in Great Bnitaili makiiig articles o! destruc-. tion anid defense similar ta thase Mada by the Krupps. Request for ths nformali privilege was made, net ta tl~e British Gaverniment, but to the inidividuai firms iu tae Goverflflelt's elpl\u003ey. The requasts wera banded an ta the naval and4 mlltary authorities, wha replled that snob informal hosPltalîty need flot be denlied ta the GermoU experts. The trio made a shrewd inspection o! the varions warks, and wlth their trained habits a! oIbservationi, in spite a! the mast diligent pre0autio1is by the managers a! the works, they saw-well, a million times more thani sucb a passe qf experts !nom any country, jet ahane Germany, ever would be permitted to see in Great Britain again. Engiand was kind to the visitors. England ls always bospitable. She is not-deeply versed in the spy system. That tbe door wus locked after the herse was stolen is given somne air of likelihood by wbat happened afterwards. Hlerr Krupp Von Bohien went direct from bis tour o! Inspection to Kiel, where by accident bie met the Kaiser just tben extending one o! those giad-hand receptions for which bie bas been so fanious, to th.ý battiesbip and ligbt cruiser squadron o! Vice-Admirai Sir George Warrenden, now second in command of tbe Home Fleet ambusbed in the North Sea and awaiting to give tbe s'hips o! the Kaiser an altogether different reception. By tbe saine kind o! accident the Master of Essen and of deatb-deaiin-g machlnery met at Kiel tbat very day the Grand Admirai Von Tirpitz, wbo at present ls walting on bis flagsbip near Wilhelmshaven to see what the British fleet intends to do. The Ad- mirai listened very Intently to wbat H-err Krupp had to say to the Kaiser. The day before Gabriel Princip shot the Archduke Ferdinand at Saravejo, Mr. Wile, tbe \"Mail\" Berlin correspondent, asked for an Interview witb Herr Krupp Von Bobien at Kiel, concerning tbe Krupp visitation ta England. At that time the corres- pondent knew nothlng o! what was In the air. He did not see Herr Krupp. Instead, bie got a message !romn a polite young secretary to say tbat \"the nature o! H-err Krupp Von Bohien's visit to Engiand made It quite Inapprapriate for hlmi to discuss it in public.\" When the war brake out HIerr Krupp went bur- riediy from Essen to Berlin to take part In the grand conclave o! the Kaiser witb bis military and naval chieftains. Wbat bie had to say at that counicl bas neyer been made public. But by that time-well perhaps hie bad forgotten England. A Guest and a Foe An Englisb Poet's View of the Kaiser on His Visits to, Eng-land K AISER WILHELM bas been a frequent visiter ta England. Hle was present at the Diamond Jubléee of bis grandmather, Queen Victoria, In 1897, again at the Queen's funeral In 1901; at the Coronation and funerai o! King Edward In 1901 and 1908; and again at the Coronation o! King George in 1911. He bas aiways bean made as weicome as any other monarcli or prince or potentate at the centre o! the world's greatest Imperil splectacles. Less tban a year ago King George paid a frlendly visit to Berlin and rode In the samle carnlage with tbe Kaiser at the weddlng o! the German Crown Princess. But If the word of a British paet ls ta be belleved, neyer again wli the Kaiser, fia matter wbat be the outcome o! the present war, be welcomed- as a guest Ini England. In a poemn publlsbed on August l4th, In the London \"Daiiy Chronicle,\" William Watson says: \"'When ta yon fabric grey In famle, Tbat Windsor lifts against the sky, In martial cloak the Kaiser came, We dld net dream, it cioaked a spy;, Yet there be sat, as now we know, A, guest, a kinaman, and a foe. \"France was a gallant foe and fain, That looked us proudly In the face, Witb her frank eyes and freeborn air, And valour half-concealed In grace. Nobiest o! ail wltb whom we strove, At last alhe glves us noble love. \"But ha that took aur pnoffered band, Tbinking to take aur birthright too, He, In t'bis bespitabie land, Bore hlm as anly dastards do. H-erej whene the Earth stlill nurtures men, HI-s band shall sol nlot ours again.\" Fear olf the Rus sians Thie Slav Machine May lie Hlardei' on Gxermany than the Allies' Power ONLY one enemy reaily stnikes fear into tho beart o! Germany. France is anly a worthy autagonlst on land, but not at sea; BrItain Is a dangerous foe on the sea. but flot ou land; Servia and Beigiumn are merply mrosquito",
         "s states--but,, oh, the rolling Muscovite hordes! If the British and the French Invaded Germnany, tbey would treat the Germ4ns well. They would be more lenient and more humane tban the Germans bave been in Belgiurn. But what Germans fear, is a Russian army, with Its sterner bureaucratie metbods, and with Its lower standard of private rights. A million Russian[s in Fair Prussia, the central gem of the German diadem, is a tragedy In itself. Belgium bas, been torn by shot and sheli; ber splendid littie figbting army, the wonder of the world, bas been cut in two; many of ber villages h ave been destroyed and ber farm buildings; ber fields bave been drenched with the blood o! citizen and foe-but this Als notbing to what wlll bappen in Pair Prussla wben t~he buge Russian army sweeps over It. Germany's army is wonderful. It cau match those of, France and Britain combined. In mobllity and daring, it stands first lu the world. But the finest army the world ever saw must inevltably succumb to the military forces of France, Britain and Russia. combined. And Iu the boum o! defeat, if it sboulid come, the Germans tremble most at the price o! peace with their Eastern enemy. The E-mpire Self.- Wh- Con tained WihOpen Trade' Routes, Great Britain Cail be WeII-Fed NO W tbat the trade routes are clear for British ~Nsbips, the problem of Britain's food supply la one that vitally affecte this country as well as otter food-exportIllg countries as never before. The normai Imports o! meat and cereals are enormous. In 1913 Great Britain unloaded on ber docks for bomne consumpvtIon 22,831,000 buudred-weigbt of ineat valued at $330,000,000. This was an increase o! $35,000 over the amount paid for impomted meat lu 1912. Argentins sent 8,500,000 cwt.; Auatralia 3,- 500,000 cwt.;- the United States 3,000 000 cwt.; Den- mark 2,500,000 cwt., anll New Zealand 2,500,000 ewt. Canada's quota In this vast total of ment was almost a negligible, quantlty. Our exports of meat to Eug- land are almoet exclusively o! pork, bacon and hams. In this clase we sent five per cent. of the total. amount imported.by Great Britain, wbile the United States fmoim its vast droves o! comn-fed bogs sent 41 per cent., Denmark 39 per 'cent., tbe Netherlands 10 Per cent. and Russia 3 per cent. More than 27 per cent. o! the total Importe of meat to great Britain is supplIed by the Dominion; whIle tbe home Production of meat bas Increased to about 60 Per cent of the total. Wheat, foeur, oats anid barley are our principal items lu the grand aggregnte o! keeping England fed. In 1913 the British consumer paid te foreigfl countries and overseas dominions the price o! 122,- 514,000 cwt., or just about 200j000,000 bushels of wbeat. 0f this the Empire outside of Great BrItain suPplie-d 57,000,000 cwt., or about 110,000,000 bugbeis. Canada contriibutedl 27,500,000 c wt., or about 45j- 000,000 bushels. Tbe remainder of the 110,000,000 busheis weut from India and Australia. Barley and oats were second iu tbe total of cereal exporta front Can~ada to Great Britain. From ail that eau at preseut be gathered o! the state of the crops lu Canada it looks as though tbe amount of whent exported this year will be rather less than usual, though the straigbt gif t'of a million bags o! fleur frein the Canadien Government wili inake up for niucb of the decrease, and the gift o! Alberta lu sending 500,000 bushels o! oats will be a good auxfliary te tbe probable incremse lu our ex- ports o! barley, whicb is rela.tively a better crop lu Canada tbis year than wbeat. The Ontario Goverii- rient bacs donated 250,000 bags of fleur as an addi- tion te the million bags given by the Goverimuent c! Canada. The Standard of Empire, taklug stock o! the food situation, discovers that at this crisis of food supplies thie Empire la practically self-supportlng for all the necessaries of life. It maya: \"One useful effect o! the war wlll be to show plainly just wbat products must be produced Oversea to mnike the Empire entireiy self-contained. More but- ter, bacon, eggs, and ment are required, se that we shall net have te rely upon the United States, Argeni- tina, and the countries of Nortbern Europe. Thus one more illustration o! tbe superiority o! mixed farm- iug over mere wbeat-growluig bas been aff orded. The Oversea Empire can supply us witb practically ail the ebeese we require. India and Ceylon are, of course, the main sources of our tes. Coffee, cocon, and sugar are aise produced In great quantities Iu the tropical portions of the Empire. Our command of the sea enables us te go on sendiug our mnuifactured gcods; to the Dominions and Coloies te pay for our food liports, and by taking advantage of tbe opportunity te step Auto the shoes of Germany, wbese industriel l! e miust inevitably be strangled by the war and particularly by the operations o! our Navy, a large volume o! new business should be secured by British firms net niene Ini the Empire, but in ail parts of the world. Tl.e Rig'?it lIon. Joseph Cook, Prime Minister CANADIAN COURIER. o! Austmalia, struck the iglit note lu bis advice te bis countrymen lu the criais: 'Let us therefore continue te grow commodities and expert tbem te the Old Tand, taking in exchange these o! ber manufactures wbicb we are accustomed to import, manlfestlug tbereby our absolute and unwaveriug confidence lu- the result o! the great struggle in wbicb the nation la engaged.' If this advice is genemally followed the BrItannie peoples will emerge frem this buman up- beaval as tbey dId from the Napeleenic wars stronger by reasort o! baving b\u0026ýn.united by a common danger, and ready to enter upon a period o! greater prosperlty than any that tbey bave bitherto kuown. Musie ýand War Sideliglîts on thec Grand Opera now Being Staged by the. Art Nations of Europe M USIC and war bave always been closely asse- ciated. Tbe present war began lu the two great music centres o! tbe world, Berlin and Vienna. -Musiciens bave gone back into the manka. Fritz Kreisler, the great Hungarian violiniat, la witb the Austrian cavalry. Walther Kiracbbauma, a bril- liant Young Austrian pianiat, for the past two years lu Canada, bas gene back te the celours as a reserviat. Mauy o! the Mest célebrated -singera, players and couductors wbo next season would bave been beard lu Amnerica are now detaiued in Europe by the war. Mauy bave rejoined the ammies o! Germany, Austria and France. Among the abseutees thus far are Dm. Karl Muck, specially released by tbe Kaiser te con- duet the Boston ýSympbony, and Otto Umac'k, bis Hun- The Russian \"lsteam relier\" Is now In full1 progress to- wards Berlin. The Russians are marching In three divisions. The north division,1 havlng lpvested Konlgs- berg, la marching on Danzig, and It ha. beaten back the Germans te \u003cisterode, which is 72 miles fromn Dan- zig, and therefore 312 miles from Berlin. The Central Russian lin. Is probably headlig for Posen. Posen 18 180 miles from Berlli, se that the Ruseian main line la wlthin 200 miles of Berlin. Another Russian column Us heading for Lemberg, Austria, which i., .roughly, 690 milies romi Berlin. garian assoclate; Josef Stmanski, conductor o! the New York Philharmionie; Gatti-Casazza, musical director o! the Metrepolitan Opera lIeuse lu New York-and most e! the great artista engaged for the comiug season O! Opera and concert lu Amerien. The Europeau trip o! the Mendelssohn Choir la cancelled and the money o! the guarantors wlll be me! uuded. Dr. Williams, conductor o! the Grenadier Guards Band, wbo were to bave played at the Canae- dieu National tbls year, la with bis regimeut, or as niear It ns may bo, sAuce the Guards have gene te the front. Among thoso Frenebmen sure te bie on the firing lino wl be HIuberty, the. great French basse, beard for two sesapus lu Canada. And nmoug Canadien singera lu Paris whien the war broke eut was Edmuud Burke, formerly o! Montreal, wbe wrote for the Montreal Star a letter ýdescriptive o! Paris, lu wblch be bas e vividly expertpassage on music as affected by the war. lIe says: \"I was dlulng wltb a party e! French friendsa at a cafo ou the Gravel boulevard, Saturday uigbt. The orchestra began te play the Ruasian national anthom, a9i i mmedlateiy the dîners rose en masse from. their tables. \"Some oue called for the Marseillaise, aud the demonstration was continued witb renewed vigeur. The crowds on tbe sidewalks surged into the place, snd the waiters sud dîners were soon Jammed te- gether lu a molid mass, everyoiO alnging-witb al bis migbt. \"Tbe familier mensures were stillInl the air wheu the opeuing bar o! 'God Save the King' was 'Played. The Frencbmen knew but a single lime-'Dieu le Roi'-and tbey Sang the same phrase tbroul the bymn. Tbey sang it again and agalu. \"I heard the British National Hymu lu West1n at the Coronatien of King George, and thoi sbould neyer again feel the same emotion the miý of that selection inspired lu me. But lu a French cafe lu Paris, I was te feel the full ME o! its sublimity. It was a prayer as weli as ternai bomage. England had not even intt wbat attitude she could be expected to assulfl the French people seemed to know wflat col] expected o! ber in sucb a crisis. \"The penchant for siuging, bhowever, seelil attacb especially to the troops. They have faces turned towamd the sun, and nothlug è their bigla Spirits. From memning to nigbt thE raising their voices lu song. It may be the lnei of a patriotic autbem, or the catchy phrases ribald dîtty. \"Iu the Avenue du Bois a regiment bas juat P Tbey had been mamcbing fer heurs lu a broillu The heat was terrifie, but tbey seemied to feri wearineaa of 11mb and discomforts o! a soldiez lu singing. 0f course the Marseillaise w3.ý favoumite, with the Chant du Depart a close s, Popular songs were by no meana overIoOIk5c a new one, evidently. coxnposed for the oc( found special favour witb soldiers and spec alike. It bas as its subject the Kaiser, and, r( translated, it migbt be eutitled, 'Bembastie, b: ing Bill., What of the Slmav The Cosmie lrony of Euipir( S LAVDOM, vast, somnolent, cold-storaging b Jreekonable stmengtb tbese many years si\" far-away defeat by Japan, ils now lu With the kingdom o! the Mikado worklng the way round across the meidians. o! longitude tc run Germany. It la but aý year or se since e were wmiting lu magazines te prove that the R menace'to India was the worst bugaboo confr the British Empire. New Tommie Atkiuis treucb saves bis fire and bolds fast as far a Bible to watt for the sweeping sea o! Slav that iu tbree main divisions are opemating Germany and Austria. War makes strange .bedfellows. Almnost the If not the most efficient bureaucracy lu the la up lu arma againat the most efficient If Il werst; lu league witb the first Republi3 o! 1 and the greatest democracy lu the world, Gre8 ain and ber empire. Such 18 the cosmnie Ir' empires. The nortberu division o! the Rusein arriT ting from the military base, Vilna, close te tl ders o! Poland, la now lu command o! easterl P aud pressing bard on Kouigsberg, whlcb la the o! Eat Prussia. Tbe centre division bas tbrougb Polaud, and Is now worklng tuiwards which ils one bundred and fifty miles fr0131 and contalus the Fiftb German army corPs garA~son. The siege o! Posen wlll become s F te that o! Liege; perbaps even more Stubbor It is hoped that before the Kaiser le able te euougb o! bis dIsorgaulziug machine te buri te Berlin aud Posen, the Russian reserveg, terrific and implacable, wlll be around POS' pressing on to Berlin. The thIiý4 division of the Russin le11 Austrib, wtlch, having been baffled, If not 12Wi beaten by the Serbe, la uow treatiug the l campalgn as merely a \"punitive expeditioni\" luI týil gigautie acceleration, o! the great glacier o! baud-grenades aud Cosc sbe guna and terrible cavalry,, the gchodule lv.w for the Russian advànce bv tbe wl, se war lords* lin bas been surprislugiy sbattered. Berlin lu\"' regn.rded, Russia, wlth considerable contenlPt iuvading force, even thougb she knew tb2' defense force the Russian army was e5 preguable. England and the other pvr always megnrded Russia. as a pouderous lei8l slow speed; but tbe editor of! the Londen Dai' writing ou August 14th, before much was i theý actuel mobîlization lu Russia badl this tW \"Their movemneut may best be compared o! a glacier, flow but sure, aud irresistibl force. The dIfficuIties whlcb they bave te 811 are very great. Rua sia is a country o! irne tances. Promi Kazan, the beadàquarters of0\" Russian nrmy corps, te tb.e nearest Peint German froutier la a tbousand miles.Th mailway systemr does nlot lend itself te a e centration, and t0,e ronds, are still o! a P character. Tbe Pttack on Germanv muet be d througb the marp'es and mnud o! Polasiid a region wbere t\"e rrovisiouiug o! eiuor'DOUO ils an exceptioualiy, ardueus task. But Ru1g' have absoluto confidence iu the en-ergy Oif tbE commanders. \"4The earleat date et which the ni armies eau enter Germany bas been pae Frencb authorities ou the twenti\u0026bh or te day from tbe beginnIng- e! mobiiizatien. le ber flrst steps te mobilize about Julv 28, s SAugust 17 or 18 ber flrst army, witb a tr",
         "('ANADIAN C'OURIER. SCE-NES THAT WILL STAND OUT IN OUR HISTORY lirg of Canada's War Parliament-the historical scene in the Senate Chamber. The Duke (in khaki) and the Duchess of Connaught are seated on Dais, with Princeas Patricia and the Ladie5.ifl-Waitiflg on their left. On both Bides of the Dais are the \"1officers cf honour.\" in the centre, the es of' the Supreme Court. In the seats are the Senators. The members cf the House cf Gommons stand at \"the Bar,\" which is below the camera. H. Ponley, flamked by the Australl'an and Canadian flags, addrC55îflg a meeting cf Anglo-Canadians In London, on Auguat 14th, when \"The n War Contingent Association\" was formed. On the comnmittee are Mr. George McLaren Brown, Bir Max Aitken, Mr. Allen Baker, Mr. Periey !fit), Lord Grey, Mr. 1J. E. Colmfan, Mr. Howard, Dr. Pankin, Mn. W. L. GrIffith. (secr .etar y), and Mr. Cassels (treasunen). The meeting was the famous \"Canada\"' room In the Westminster Palace Hotei, where nearly 1fifty yeans ago the Fathers of Confederation irafted the \"B8. N. A. Act,«' which contaifis Canada's constitution.",
         "(2ANADIAN COURIER. about 180),000 men, sbonld begin its march into Easternl Prussia. A second arxny wlth a force of 200,000 mon sbould reacb tbe German frontier to- wards Berlin about Augu.st 28. By September 1 a million Russian trooPs sbould ho la Eastern Ger- many. At tbe saine time other Russian armies will strike against Austrîn, tbough it may bie conjectured tbat the principal Russian attaclt wlll be delivered against Germai' territory. Ail the evidence tbat bas as yet been obtained points to the conclusion tbat Germany bas left none but reservo trooxis la tbe east. Tbese bave beon able to make some head againat tbe raids of the Russian cavalry, but it is most improbable that tbey wlll ho able to bring the attack o! tbe Russian army corps to a standstill.\" Japs at Tsing,-Tau Bombardiflg a Fortification s O f ar the only definite t'hing undertakOn by- Japan owing to ber alliance with Groat Brit- ain, is tbe bombardmOflt of Tsing-T8.u, on the Bay of Kiao-Chau. At prosent tbere las little danger of Germaily attemptIflg any hostile actions on our Pacific Coaat. We are iooked a! ter there by French cruisers an~d tbe RainbQw well able to operate againat tbe Leipzig andý the Nuremberg. A Monday despaitch, uncoufirmpd, states as a probabiiity that the Leipzig haee aptured by the Rainbow and the French cruiser Montcalm. Australin, wltb ber fleet o! four cruisers, tbree destroyers and two submarlnies, la in a position to guard lier own coasts. The reductioxi of the German'base on the Bay o! Kiao-Chau la the immediate business of Japani, wbo la so dolng wlsbos the United States to unders'tand that sbe bas no aggraiidlsing inten- tions la that part o'! the Pacific. Foara were expressedl, a few days ago, tbat In sendlng ber ultimatum to GermnaIy, Jal}an was go4ng too far; that she might operate toithe disad- vantage of tbe United States, wblch bas nlot yet rocovered from tbe troubles over Oriental Immigra- tion. Japan pledgea' ber word that the naval base taken forclbly by Germany fromn China Is 1898 as reprisais for tbe murder of two Germain misslonarles la China, wlll 11e reitored -to China. Japai' at pre- sent, la interosted la tbe Integnlty of China, wblcb, untIl the war la over, seema to bie pretty well assured. The district occupled by the naval base Tsing-Tau covers 200 square miles. 350 miles southeat o! Pekin, almnost opposite the southern extremity o! Korea and faclng the Yellow Sea. The bay is about two miles wlde at the mnouth. It extends over an ares. o! about 150 squlare miles o! deep water on- vlroned by bills 400 to 600 foot hlgh. Tslng-Tau conmands a region rlcb la coal and las tberfolr blghly important to Germany, wbicb bas no other coallng station la the Pacific. It is strongiy forti- fied, and is garrlsoned by 5,000 German marines 'witb a smaîl force o! Chirnese soldions. It la thought that ail the German warshlps aew la Chimiose waters aad a large number o! German mercantile marines are shelternig under tbe Tsilng-1Tau helghts, where the guns o! the Mikado are now poundbflg away ait the fortifications.- No Prize Money Au A-ncient Customn Out of Vogue AFEW daya after the deciaration o! war by Great Britain the cruiser Essex, whbch wae la Quebec Harbour, it will bo rememnbered, a!ter the Emn- rosa disaster, sent a wbreless to the Admiralty stating that a \"nbch prise\" had been secured wben the Essex overbauled the Germafi liner Cap Ortegal. For whom was the rlcb prize intended? Whea the Kronprlnzsaen Ceollie, witb lier $10,000,000 bullion was forced to put into Bar Harbour, Maiae-wbo got tbe 1ten mnillis Âssuredly not tbe offîcers and crew o! the British cruisors that effected the capture. No, tbe gold bocamne government booty and bas been sbbpped to Ottawa as the mnost convenlent place to make use o! It as coxtraband o! war, But the officors o! the Essex tho'ugbt, as their fathers and grandfatbBrs and generations before tbom bad tbought, that the troasure on board the Cap Ortegai would, as sncb ýbooties always did, go to the officers and the crew o! the cruiser that made the capture. But 1h didn't. Almost at the ver\u003e' moment that the Essex was corailng the Cap Ortegal, the British Honse o! Commuons hurriodly passeil an Act abolisisng the distribution o! prize mono\u003e' la this fashiomi beQueathed b\u003e' the customs o! pirno\u003e' and elevated lato a legltimate practico la marine warfaro, B\u003e' this Act, latrodncod by the First Lord o! the Adm~ira,lty, a custorn as old as the British navy waa swept ont o! vogue. Many and lavlsh are the fortunes that revortedl to British officors and crewa -in times of war. In~ 1761, wben the British frigates Actaeon and Favourite captnred a Spanisb vesel, the two captains got $330,000 betweeli theru, the lieutenants $15,000, tbe warrant officera $20,400, petty officers $9,000, and the soamen and marines $2,400. In 1799, wben four British frigates seized two Spanish gaI- leons, it took sixty-four artillery waggons to haul the booty to tbe citadel over Plymouth Hoes. The four captains got $50,000 eacb and the officers and men $45,000 la ail. But such booties as tbese are mere bagatelles coin- paredl to the prises that must fail into the bauds o! tbe British navy before tbis war is over. Wben a single German liner carried $10,500,000 la buliion, the amouat o! treasure afloat la the bolda o! belli- gerent liners must Irua into bundreds of millions. Now that prise money bas been abolisbed tbese prises o! war will go lite tbe Governiment offices. The morale o! the navy will undoubtedlly be lm- proved, even tbough an officer'aad a bluejacket mlgbt take more desperate chances for the sake o! a belt packed witb gulden and thalers tban for tbe cold caîl o! duty. However, there is no sbadow o! doubt that tbe abolition of tbis genial practice of Col. Wiliarrs (left), Commanidant of thie Camp at Valc-artier, talking with Lieut.-Col. Mercer, of the Q. 0. R., who i8 flow in charge of a Brigade o! I nfantry. spolia based upon the motte \"To the- victors boiong and fightbag courage and nerve of the mon at sea., The Act o! abolition does not preclude the grantlng o! bounties. And the mea o! the Davy are morally sure o! belng graated substantial, bountios by the Goverament whatever the vaine o! the bundreda o! Germai' bottoms aow chased off the seas lis estlmated b\u003e' the authonitios. Naval Episodes M~editerranean Fleets Comlpared U P tUll Satnrday at week a polar silence bad fallen over the two greatest fooets la the world up ln the North Soa. Thon came the starting news from the silence of Helbgoland, that a saxal squadron o! British cruisers and destroyers under Admirai Beatty 1154 crept up behlnd a squadron Of Germa cruisers and destroyers whbch bad come ont to reconnoltre. Two German warships were sunk wlthln gua range of the Hellgoland forts, whlcb were ineffective owlng to fog. 0f a total crew o! 1200 Germana, oniy 330 escaped. The British bast oni\u003e' 67. Bofore that there badl been conideiable newspaper activlty among the war vessels la the Mediterranean. Nowhore as yet bas thore beell an\u003e' serions naval en- gagement. The sinklng o! the great $4,000,000 aux- ilan\u003e' cruiser, Kaiser Wilbelm den Grosse, o! the North Germa-Lloyd lino, b\u003e' tbe British cruiser Higa- flyer, off the West Afrîcan coat at week, la the miost sensational engagement yet roported. But French and Austrian sbips bave been la hostile action, and there bave been reports o! \u0026 few sunkea Austrian sbîpa. The affair o~f the tWo Gorman cruis- ors la the Moditorranean, the Goobon and the Breslau, now owned by Turke\u003e', bas not yet beenl settied to the satisfaction o! Great Britaln and Franco. The settloment o! this and all other naval disputes la that part o! tbe wonid must hoe le! t mmmi\u003e' to tho French and the Austrian fleets-unless by tbat t Italy, wlth ber powerful second-rate navy, bas g over to tbe Entente. Austria-Hungary bas flfteen battieships, of wl three axe Dreadnoughts, armed witb 12-4nch gu two armoured cruisers, with aine four-inch g1 fine light cruisers, flfteen destroyers, six submari and flfty-eight torpedo boats armed w'ith t1iree-pol ers. Six of the battleships are under 10,000 tons eu and nine of tbem, are armed with aine four-incb g each. But tbis fleet, capable as it la, bas neyer, s real action. Austria is not a sea, power. Her access to the seaboard is along the Adriatic. France now bas ail bier greatest sbips in the 'M terranean, witb only a cruiser squadron Ia the 1 lish Channel. To oppose Austria she bas thIri battlesbips, ten of wbich are of tbe Dreadnot era. The smnallest of these la 11,088 tons. Ail ýci 12-inch guns. Tbese beavyweigbts are backed ni twenty armoured and protected cruisers.- In 1 cruisers France sla is efficient. She bas elgb tbese, somes of tbem being la tbe Channel. 11, pedo craft she la among tbe four Ia the first i Most of ber elght destroyers are la the MediterraIl She bas 140 torpedo boats and 50 submarInes, r of wbicb are in the Medllterrai-,ean. Tbe t greatest fleet la tbe world la not a xnere moi invention like tbe German gavy. It bas naval ditions based upon great sea fIgbts almost as hi4 as those o! tbe British aavy. History teems the atonles of Frencb marines vying witb tbe s of Spain, wblch used to gîve the sbips of Elg sO mucb of théir llgbting. France and Italy Spain, the Latin maritime nations, were leader -naval warfare. ItaIy is now among the second ( navies, as France is well Up amoag tbe firat. Italy sbould be drawn into tbe war, ber four battlesbips and ber aine pre-Dreadaougbts of il tons eacb, bier armoured and ligbt cruisers and stroyers will be an aliost superfluous addltio, the. naval force opposlng the Austrian navy. At the samne time, la -tbe grand -total o! tbe wo war craf t now massed along tbat trade rol\\ti Great Britain from the Atlantic to tbe Suez C2 we must not omit the compact remnant o! tbe 9 Britisb navy stili kept In those waters. Under Berkeley Mimne tbere are now tbe four sblps- flexible, Indomitabie-tbe sbip on wbich tbe pre King crossedto Canada durlag tbe Tercentena tbe Invincible and the Indefatigable; witb armiO cruisers, light cruisers, destroyers and submar Ail tbese British sbips are based upon Malta. Germany bas only tbe great 22,600-ton battIe' the Goeben, accompanied by tbe scout cri Breslau, both o! whlcb are aow under Turkish tection and were probably, intended as f ar as sibie. to barrass the British trade routes in Mediterranean. Russia la practically \"non est those waters. Her Black Sea fleet Is now bo upla the Black Sea, since Turkey, declarlnig neutrality, has closed tbe Dardanelles, at the' time taklng under ber wlng the two German vei Now tbat Turkey may be drawn loto the Gel alliance, tbe Turkish fleet may yet lie e]lg against the combined fooets of the alles now c~ command of Vice-Admirai de Lapayrere. TbE trance, of Turkey Into Armageddon will proi draw Italy and ber fleet Into it on the side pi alles. Ar-my Aris.tocri British Nobility at the Fro ANOTABLE foature o! tbe war las the o! nobilit\u003e' who, fnom ail tbe mi nations engaged, bave gone to the fr( Prince o! Wales bas Jolned the Grenadier as he la the yonngost offîcer in that regir a war that vîndicates Brbtisb Honour an nations the beir-apparent to the tbrone o! la an baspbing exaniple to the troopa o! wbetber at home or abroad. The Crown 1 Germany la at the bond o! the army dils4 tlng la Alsace-Lorraine, as bis Imperial at tbe beadquarters of the Generai Staff mander-bn-chie! o! the army. Ail the otber o! the Germa Emperor are wlth the army. T, o! Walos la not a mblltary prince, and bis fi King, la not a mlltarist. The Kaiser and hi Prince and bis brother and ahl the list o! grand ducal officiers la the Genman an\u003e' are at the front ia a war 1111e this becanse thE army la a conscription force whose authorit\u003e' la the Emperor. The King o! though nominaîlly commandor-in-ebief o! 1 and the navy, does, not take the field. HIE rul la not basod upon the sword, but upon wlll o! a democratic people whose ar\u003e' la tary army, When the Prince o! Wales go( o! bis own free will, it mens more to th troopsi than the placiag o! an army divisi the Crown Prince ineans to German\u003e'. The Britishb nobilit\u003e' la ropresentod la as It neyer was before la the ranks o! The very first ane on the casuait\u003e' liat through from tbe front la that o! the Earl and Melville, a lieutenant la the Royal SK\u003c Ho was dangerousl\u003e' wouadod la the battle",
         "CANADJAN COURIER. engaged British 'troops on the Franco-Belgian George Sylvester Viereck sets the Pace. Ris the second Uine \"Thy.\" He cails France \"the harlot Alnteveyharfa ua.os poemn on \"Wilhelm II., Prince of Peace,\" reads like of the world,\" and England \"the Serpent of the ý,111Ot eer hed o a ucl buseisrepresented a good sequel to \"Meinseif und Gott,\" by the Kaiser. Sea.\" AUl this prayer to Wilhelm lacks is to be set the first expeditionary forces drafted and no h opig qari to music. Judged by the sentiment of this poem, the belng organized for service Germans know flot the iiFrance and Belgium. îneaning of bumanity. The Duke 0f Portland, for- iflerly in the Coidstream. Gar, 18 Presidpnt ofM a s heNüttinghamshire Ter-M a s ritoriaIs3. Ris eldest son, the 'Marquis of Titchfield,M e s g 'l a subaltern In the RoyalM e s g 0f1 the Duke 0f~ERMANY'S Compli Iiold ofWellington ~êjments to Paris are comx Ojns in the lete oigamtcr the Duke of Richmond and dially curt. When an air Gordon aeGa-smnpostman drops an open The Duke 0f Roxburgh tagged witb a Ger- and4 hi brother, Lord man fiag and announces eare both in the i stm ostu n that' ad served with ita nstice. T e smesupand regilflent ln South fromn Mars read: fre a fTrer luenanted \"The Germnan army is at O~t~Clrea tieetenanrs of Paris. Ail you hoids severa Teruoas can do is surrender. 0f Suhrl,,àd sen.\" a\" th Yuc'Oungest Of The bombs were merely lau e,1 a late afew of the fireworka wlth Drelan 0f the 2nd wlbGray Intends to th6 anPresident of aeI ai h Suhrad Terri- memnorable scenes of 44 hefr '~r Dalenyyears ago. Tbey dld very ouI the Ielrl tf ittle damage. ge~~eaî stff minsored despatches ad- nobiliy baswedge of the German dit rJked its Place of notenadvance la crush- \"lte British arrny. beener' tîmes there ha Paris; that whether fýom ls tlcl58M of the Brit- necesslty or strategy, or hot bei0er ilat both combined. the French 'loS8elY beund up The Prince of Waies' fi ,2ocial life of the taken as the regiment But when real Joined. As a junior of the Bitlah The Grenadier Guards r!oot teBish ment of foot guards. ýy are a neces- \"1SPlulg factor la tbe 11f e of the army. 'ence On the field of battle, whlle not memely the example of the Prince' of Wales, la a t the arxny of England Is net a separate Ilicludes every kind of man lu the country Collier lu Nortbumberland and \"Hi \u003cIooligan,'l to the beada of tand floblest familles lu the SCause of ie Teuton n-Amierieau Writers 1 nela Pro-Gernian Weekly ýTE1D to FaIr Play for Gem- R~oos anY and Austria\"' Ia the VZIR \u003elirageous motto on the caver Pte f paPer calle \"The Fatherland,' in' New York aud deslgued tlht the news.papers of Arn- Ve~ry largely anti-German. ý'%zile, Copies of which have ýa1i4, 1. flot abtogether a rabld 'wo eminent professors of Ii0g Muenaterberg and Kuno lOi-iiann Schoenfeld, profes- tOry at the George Washington y, a5d Hans Heluz Ewers, a rSovll5t and play-wmlter, are \u003ee dOf1tlbutorsa Mueustemberg \"Pa0ir Play\" and \"Where the lin2- e laya blame for the li CQ0fllic betweeu Clermanic [e Cltuare and says Germany \"lOt8 the Kaiser. From a mass \",,hi1C lie bas mecelved lie tikthat the sanest people ca ae gadullytakiug this Lt he bmbeaters are on the LIlaxis Ewera has a really fle \"The Shadow of the ýear-\"Ile bames ussia anid Geray will 1e earved Up, unaytakeni off the map, and W'0o114 bave a womse probberu 11(1 thai ever before; whereas l'y soh ahe wlll mag- [y supprt the \"statuo quo\" ltaldwlth havlng taught This map a 'e'8n The tbree editors aofLI IV hndi the articles, anid perlenc Cr\" aed lfire the sixty-pounders. able. rst appearance with hi. new regiment, the lut Grenadier Gu returned from the flrst route march Trom Brentwood Barra ficer the Prince was at the head of the regiment and was th was first ralsed ln 1660 as a bodyguard ta Charles Il. The Mis Majesty 1s Coionei.in-Chief, end the Duke of Connaug '10 Prince of Peace,,O Lord of War, Unirbeath thy blade wltbout a stain, Tby hoby wrath sall scatter far The bloodhouiids fmom'thy-couutry's fane.\" The only omission bere is net wrltlng \"thy\" lu Iows cieariy why the Germnans crossed Belg Iwn and entered e and Valenciennes. Otherwlàe they weuld have 1usd corne ossing the heaviiY fortified frotler between Belfort anti Ver :hwest to the Engilh Channel, the French fortifications are The. severest flghting has talcen place between Longwy and ards. This picture was and British lunes are acks after the Prince sol aln ako e first ta take the salute. sol aln ako y are the premier regi- stronger positions. In ht 18 Colonel. spite of artillery and rifle slaugliter ln the close for- mations of the Germans, the Kaiser aPParently bas no end of mnen; \"a force nuxuberless as the beaves of the trees,\" says the London Times writer; who goes on to remark: \"Our artlllery mows long lanes tbrough the centre of sections so frequently that notblng is left but its outsldes; but no eooner la this done -thon more, men double up, rushlng over the beape of the dead and remake the section.\" R E.SSfSThe ponderous weig4t of is lIm- RESSE5 l:îum acrosa the Ues of fortifica- tions crumnples up the Unes of the allies. It la lke a mob crowdlng froma a wbarf pen to board a steamer; the weight be- f'r F-RS indmaires It Irreaistible. And the welght la stîll there; although ad- mlttedly one army corps bas been taken off the reserves In the west on slxty t raina to meet the «ateaxu roller\" froxu Russia around Koulgsberg. Can this mornentum of an Indestruct- Iil maso of cavalry, lnfantry and ai- tillery juggernaut Its way to the walls of Paris? If se, when? And wben the German bordes are encamped ln the anvirons of Paris, how long wlll It takre tobatter -down the fortifications? Granted that a siege of Paris is possible -ow long will It be before Hessiaus agalu sit smoking ou the boulevards and Uhlans ploket their borses on the Champs d'Elysee? That depends upon resIstance.. In 1871 It took the Germans 132 daya ta break tbrough the slege. Then the French had 2,600 pleces 0f artIllery, 200 o f whlch were of the heavlest doasa jr * known at that Urnie. Von Moltke esti- mated that to overcome this by an lm- pact of artillery by the Napoleonle method would bave taken 300 heavy siege guns wlth 600 rounds for each iLFS APT gun, that the' transports for these ordnanceg would have taken 4,500 four- waggonis and 10,000 horsea, since the i4i~ Germans had ne rallways under their ý4't!àý coutrol. It may be exacted that when- D.ACHZ: ever the siege of Paris lu 1914 becomes ce a faot, if it dees, the French 'wIll ses F-pi s- tat the rallway lines are blown up. s-t T bat wlll make the German artlllery transport relatlvely as slow as It was 'IRin 1871. t Agaînot is the defences of Paris wilI be put to, the severeat test known to modemn machine warfare. Wbat are France by the defences? -They consist of three severe e x- lues. Firot, beginnulag at the centre, dun. Froni the solid waIl of masonry, eld style, 18 rot forrnld- cilvet. feet hlgh, for 22 muiles of a ring round",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. DOES ANYONE DOUBT TH-E EMPIRE PATRIOTISM 0F 1HE WEST? ciety. It is the lean man in a pair of Governfl boots who will save the Empire. The men were wont to parade their wealtli on King and James streets and to liog the highway are 110W gated to tbeir proper obscurity. Another thing war lias done-it lias proved insignificance of the stock excbanges. The br is sometimes inclined to dlaim that his busileE the most sacred on earth, next to that of tlie for misýsionary. Yet the world iýs gettrng along Pl well, whîle botli of tliem take a holiday. Canada sliould neyer forget lier debt of grati to the United States for tliemanifestations of pathy during these trying days. The journai and publicists have supported the Britishi cause ferveur. Tliat the Britisb-born are outnumJ by the German-boril in tlie United Statesý makeý pro-Britisli attitude even more significant. This war Is so tierce that it cannot last. Air, in one montli, tlie losses exceed those of the Boer whicli lasted two years. The Gerinan losses are placed at 60,000 killed and 130,000 wounded. those of the Austrians, Servians, Russians, FI and Britishi and we must be well on the way tù balf million mark. Figure out for yourself bow the nations can stand that pace. On the moneY there la less -difflculty. Sir George Paisb, il \"Statist,\" dlaims that Britain can raise a thol million dollars a year, indefinitely for war Puri s0 long as the fleet rules the sea. On August 2lst, 1,000 rough-and-reaiy lOlst Fusiliers massed in front of the Parliament Buildings in Edmonton ta hear addresses from Premier Sifton,, Archbishop Gray and Mayor MacNanara before en- training for Valcartier. the old sections of Paris. Second, the 17 detaclied forts witliout tlie inuer wall in a circuit of 34 miles lu leugtli or about il miles across. Third, au outer ring of forts ln a circle of 25 miles diameter ou the helghts commanding the valley o! the Seine. Each of these units is self-complote. Tlie outer forts are llnked together witli redoubts, bastions sud miner fortifications mucli more compactly than the Uineo f forts ou the Franco-German froutier. They are of modern design, equlpped wltli ahl the mecliai- ismn and resistauce-macélnery that made the capture of Liege so dlfficult. It is lu this outer ring of forts S OME pseudo-politicau las suggested that 'tlie Conservatîve, party appeal to the country and get a five-years' renewal of power. It is ai- most Incredible, but several picayuue parliamfen- tarlaus bo'sst of having thouglit of ItL They cannot see that sucli action would be poîlticai suicide. For- tunately Sir Robert Borden, Mr. Rogersand their asseciates bave a bigli sense of tlir duty tg thie Emi- pire ut this moment sud they would not barbour such an unpatriotic thougbt for a moment. \"Britaiu's mette: Business as Usual,\" Is dis- played iu every financlal and commercial newspaper in the United Klngdom. This is tIe supreme test of the man wlie stays at home. Toronto's city corporation, Instead of cutting sal- aries, dlsdhlarged one-third of its employees la thie works departmneut. The Commissioner protosted without avail. Foi'tunately tlere are not many cases lu Canada of such lnhumaulty. Some employers o! labour would be more patrlotic if they speut their 'time ftghtiag business depregssln in their own offices insteud of golag arouud cellect- Lng \"funds\" sud sîoutlng \"Coura.ge!\" Whlle you are pr!aylng for the \"boy\" s.t the front, do not forget tIe «\"boy\" uoxt door. Ho may need mobre than your prayers. Haul to the Conservation Commission! W hile others are talklug, it sends out a circular to the farmers, via thse press, urglug them to increase \u003ctheir wlieat acreage, for 1915. This le tIe ounce of prac- tice whieh La woirth more than a pound of theory. If Germany wus fair before the war, the opposite bas sluee been the case, Her army bas violated th1e Genovu aud Hague agreements as rutblessly as Austria t-ore up the. Treaty o! Berln five years ago. This is barbarismu. Patrietie citizens lu Toronto gave $900,000 in four days. There are oaly three reliable \"fuuds\"-the that the German concentration must flnd its first tremeadous setbaok. Tlie second Uine of forts Is mainly an--improvemeut on tlie old lines of 1871. The inner wall la a reinforcemnt o! the ancient wall of that time. Paris is probably the best fortlfied clty Ln Europe. The siege o! Paris ln 1914, If, It happons, should be a longer and more dlfflcult siege than that of 1871. But that again depends a great deal upon the size and strengtli of the batterlug ram that can be brouglit to bear upon it in mass at any one point, accordlug to the Napoleoulc metliod of attack. Patriotic Funid, tlie Hospital Slip Fund and the Red. Cross Society Fund. Thero are no otliers, sd shouldý be ne -others. Furtlier, the Patriotlc Fund should be incorporated sud somie reputable people made responsible. Not every one who cries \"Give, Give,\" is a patrict. Toronto's fains eiiition Is being lield this week as usual. The directors are, to be congratu. lated upon both their courage and their wlsdoni. R, may bo nocossary for the Canladian'Govermmot to take, over the gold mines sud see what Is lu tliem. Gold is scarce sud we caunot ýborrow lu war-thme. There Is no Canadian- navy now. Tlie Niobe, tlie Rlaiubow and the s'ubmarlues bave been handed over to thse Britiali Âdmiralty. What a sillY fuas some statesmen made as to \"how\" it should ho doue. There are no Nova Scotian, or Ontario, or British Coluribian soldiers at Valcartier camp.. Tliey are all Canadiaus. Let us not forget that Australia sud New Zealand sud Southi Africa are ail 'glviug men aud ships. Canada is doing no more than the otliers--only her fair share. This is really *'the grand Ixuperlal \"Sucb as 1 hav~e, giy.e 1 unto tliee,\" Ls, the metto instiffctively adopted by Canada in this war. Up to the preseint the Federal and Provincial Govern- monts o! 4111e country have voted te Great Britalu, besides bier citizen armny, the followlng practical gif te: Dominion: 1,000,000 bags o! fleur. On'tario: 250,000 bags fleur. Quebec: 4,000,000 pou4s of cheese. Neva Scotia: 500,000 tons coul. P. E. 1.: 100,000 bus. oats te the Dominion Gov- ernment for Canadian herses. Alberta: 500,000 bags oats. And there are more to folIow. One thlng the war las doue, it has reduced the fat ma lu the limousine to bis proper place in su- War Chronicle Tuesday, Augùst 25th.-Details of suuday Monday's battle aýt Neufchateau showed that maus repulsed the attack of the Allies. The 13 lield tlieir linos at Mous, but lest 2,000 meu. A Zeppelin dropped bombs on Autwerp. Beigians issued from Antwerp sud defeated maus at Malines. Wednesday, August 26th.-Briteh army figli third day against a superior -force. The troo] baved well, and retired ou Armas. Thursday, August 27th.-The Kaiser Wilhell Grosse sunk by H. M. S. Hlighflyer off ûoý Africa. She had beeu couverted into, an amI cruiser sud liad escapod to ses. Longwy, an old fortress la Nortliern Frani reudered after tweuty-four days' bombardmel German cruiser Magdeburg sunk by Russian in Baltic. Russian troops occupled Konigsburg, 388 freim Berlin. German army invested lu cltaffi Information let out that British army l911( Havre sud Boulogne, August 1Otl to l5th- British Parilament met sud sent 'a messî congratulation to the King o! the Belgians noble part tbey played lu the war, assuring tl gian. people o! \"our whole-bearted and unfailiSl port.\" Friday, August 28th.-F'irst, important i\u0026 gagement. A Britisli equadron enterod Rieli Biglit and' sunk three cruisers sud -twô des-] Several other vessels are reported ilisabled. Britishi veesel w*as lost sud onlY 'two Injui'ed \"New Zealand\" was lu the battle. Princess Patricia LIght Iufantry, 1,100 stl'o exeservico meu, left for Montreal, wliellc saled on tbhe Megautic. Saturday, August 29th.-Reported that Swe mobiliziug, sud that Italian mobilization is complete. Russians reported advancing rapidly on L GalIcia, sud driving back the Austriaus. Britain received. details o! the wantou i tien o! the Belgian towa o! Louvain. Last. portion of Toronto's 4,800 troop510 Valcartior. Sunday, August 3th.-.6 reviow o! the shows the Allies drîven eut o! BelgiuXI, O Antwerp sud Osteud, but Germnans bave Lille and are near to Boulogne. ýGeril 10 the advance -have been enormous. The t\u003c1tý August 3rd to date muet be at least 200 Russial p)rogress hia» been satlsfactorY ai rapld. General French's report shows th Britishi army lost 5,000 or 6,'000 duringth but bas been relnforced sud brougbt %trength. Monday, August 31st.-That Lille -w-as abS\u003e lntentlonally Ls confirmod. Tlere le a fairly authentlc rumeur t1iat~- loads o! Gamme-n seldiers have been wiVl4ie'ý the nortî o! France te me-et the RusSi5 s Prussia. The occuipation of Germnan Samoa by a r pediýtion fromn New Zealand on the 29411 ,firined. Reports continue to come lu Wndcl5#t Germe-ns are still mioving around the Al flanl\u003c sud have meached Ls,!ore, about yt f rom Paris. Thie R'usslans are close te Lemiberg, sud it la reporte«d that Austrian 515-v soldi«ers are deserting te the invaders- Germans admit naval basaes at n:lio August 28th.",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. AT VALCARTIER MOBILIZATION CAMP vleW of the Valcartier Camp, infantry section, taken just after a large body of troops had de trained and before they had been asaigned to their varicua quarters. The Camp cavera about tWentY thousand acres of land and la on both aides of the Jacques Cartier River. D -SPITE ail the diffi- cuities, the miitia authorit ie s h a ve shown Considerable r e - source and SI in mobiliz- ing the troups. On August 4th the Governmlent did flot even own the property which is now laid out as a training ground and fitted Up with a waterworks sys- tem, rifle ranges and artil- iery ranges. in one month the impossible has been Performed and more than twentyý tbousand men are under canvas. By Septem- ber l5tb the equipment of the division should bc complete. Any deiay thýat there h as been wiii be benellcil in that l bas given more tîme for sea- sonlng and training. Wtien the men leave Quebec Ahey wili be' better sol- iers than If tbeY had. bçen dispatched a montli ear- lier. This wll have a pro- found effect upon their health, since they will be better prepared to taire care of, tbemselves Iwhen they arrive on the' other side of the ocean and enter UPOIl war conditions. P ICTURES .shown on th hs page. Indicate that the -Canadianq at Vaicartier are cheerful and adaptable. Ail the re- ports from the camp îndi- cate that the men are earnest and entbusiastic ini their work. The usual sports of camp life, suca a.s football and basebali, are proceeding as usual lu the spare hours. Refresh- ment booths have been estabiished and ail sorts of stores eau be bought f r om enterprising mer- chants wha bave estab- lished themselves at the camp. \u003cThe ýgreatest attention Is being given to rifle shootlng, and so, extensive are the ranges provided tbat it is possible fir nleariy every man in ther camp to shoot. This Is of prime importance. ast 4th, when Ls clear that iawas at war at Britain was ,Ottawa corre- the Toronto Wired to bis Is foliows: eriament is in as f ar as the Mn ch inery 'rtation facili- ened, to em- nY division of MYuasnd men Weeks.\" led to send a Onslstung of Ity thousand ),rresp;Iondent's bad elapsed 20th. if the been sbipped bY Septemb,,r a wîîî have \"ell. We are li'tarY nation Ottawa corre- lasking in the the Military ed the people The twenty ellwere easy ý1iforms, rifles. , waggous and s were not in From diling at first-clasa restaurants and hi clown to standing in a Une wlth .a. mess tin. then handed a portion of a loaf.of bread and grass USa'- -sx u h nhsatcslir tVlate r olie Washlng dishes was rpaver popular with the nial* e ,btth etusat sderat alrirae we learnlng how te keep their mess tins, cla with the assistance of tome cold water from the taps. [y. This picture shiows that the operation cari ba performed wlth considerable cheerfulness.",
         "14 CANADIAN COURIER. IlThrough a- Monocle Our Boys--What Next ? OUR boys are off for \"the front.\" That is exactly where they are off for, unlesa the war suifera. a sudden and whoiiy unlikely coilapse. As I write, there la no indication as ta what wiii be donewith the Canadian regimenta -that is another of the countless milîtary secrets. But my guesa la that, as soon as they can be licked inta shape, they will be forwarded ta a post of banour. Everything pointa ta the existence of a settled pollcy on the part of the British Governmeilt ta hurry every ounce of fighting strength ahe can collect ta the criticai pointa in this terrific land struggle. We dld not know when hier fIrat expedi- tionary farce went, or how many it contained. We do not know how rapidly it la belng auppiemented. But we do know that aur farce has heen In action and bast heavliy-that the \"reservists\" are beiflg called out-that the Channel parts are shrouded In secrecy-that there la every Indication that the British Gevernment reahizes that It la In a battis for the life of the Empire, and that no effort will be neglected which can possIbly tura that battie In aur favaur. 0 F c ourse, aur hastilY assembied regiments will n. fot be sent under lire until they have iearned co-operatian and the necessary details of drill ta inake them effective figbters. But the 'Iburry up\" messages fromn London show that, la a war Ilke this, every day counits; and that gond materia, like aur contingent, wili nat be s4jbowed ta waste Itseif ln Idlenes when It la so Imperativeiy needed In the un- ceasing battie la progreas. The enormaus casualty figures that are comIng in are sO colossal that we can hardly realize wbat tbey mean. The Germafla do not spare human 11f e in their effort ta win de- cisive victories. The inaw af war was neyer s0 glutted with blood. Only by the greatest sacrifices are the Allies able to hold thelr positions; and th.ls frlghtful destruction of, buman \"war machines\" mneans that they must be constantiy and swiftiy re- placed if the contest la ta continue. It la nu case BRITISH SOLDIERS L.ANOINQ IN BOULOGNE. of the pictures of whioh there lsa scarcity owing to the poticy of nlYstery which ha. covred the traneportation of troops from France. The waggons arc ioaded with \"floatal» for temnporary, bridges. L of waiting ta see if they may be needed-more men are needed now than can bie got. THAT aur boys wiil prefer ta see active service 1 Tknow perfectly well. They have eniated for war. Most of thema realize, far better than do thase of us who are staying at home, what tre- mendous Issues are at stake in this war; and they have came forward ta do réai fighting on behaif of the flag, the cause and the country whose safety they see menaced. But it is just as Weil for us ta understafld naw that, barrlng an unexpected peace, they wili get their wish and find themnselvesaside by side with the embattled troopa of Britain, France and Belglum. This will mean castly casualty lista for us to read-and bear. This wlll mean laconle messages ta Canadian homes that a son, a brother, a husband, even a father, has \"falien upon the fieid of hanour.\" Tbey may not know In what part of the horrible welter of blaod that \"field of honaur\"l lies. They cannot even imagine their dead as near this or that namne an the map. But they wlll know that they died for their country, as Britans have died before ail along this war-swept field of conflici. U NLESS the war goes early lu our faveur, I loak to Bée many mare men leave fram Canada for its traglc scenes. The pramptuesa with which the British Goverliment ceased ta trim and twitter about wbether or flot It would, send an \"lexpeditlanary force\" ta the Continent-whether Its treaty obliga- tions would campel It ta help France-whether that \"expeditionary force,\" If the \"pacifiats\" wouid let us send one, wouid be 120,000 or o nly 80,000-shawed us that It realized that thia was no business of stand- ing an the letter of aur obligations, but a grim necessity ta fight with all our atrength far the life af aur Empire. Britain la nat an outside cantributor ta this war, niceiy Woighlng \"underata,'ndings'\" and \"ententes.\" She la one o! the inoat deeply engaged principals; and she bas staked hier existence, anid ail she bolda dear, an the outcome of the canfiict. That being true, she will rush every man she can-into the 11ght In these flrat and decisive stages of the con- ,eit while it is stili possible to Win victories- nlot merely to cover retreats. ERY important it ls for us to feel the r, V Eand the gravity of the struggle. We S6 cannot afford ta lose thîs war. If every and every dollar in the country must be poure to Win, we must malte the sacrifice. Some of us bave feit, to begin with, that the professional of Britain could quite sufflciently represefit t the Continent; and that ail Canada need do be to aupply garrisons for the British ports a] release that army. That was be ,fore we fuilY 0 ciated the enormous task before us, and thE limited nature of our rlak. Now It ls only s: justice ta the men who bave voiunteered ta go, the theory that tbey will see actual service, t Alves plainly that they wili bie under th4 of German guns as soon as they are drilled efficiency. They should get the full credit of courage, and their familles the full appreciatic L ORD KITCHENER as given the Empire a Lplain hInt of what it can do, and muat the atruggle prove a long one. By av( conscription and depending upon a profesi army, supported by volunteers, wehave pari our miiitary arm at the autset of bostîliles. is, we have nat been able ta put in the fieid ai' at ail appraaching the strength of the coni armies which the ather combatants have buted. This ia neot the time ta debate the and \"cons\" o! that poicy. But Its effects are us. And one of the effecta Is that we a Immense untouched reserve ta draw upon whi\u003c military nations lack. This is a mighty poor faction ta thase of us who realize that Britaifi have prevented this war if she had had a large but we shouid make the moat of aur position,~ worthy or unworthy. And ta make the mllO shouid start at once ta enlist and drill and that reserve. If we have nlot been able ta arri the first battie-4eids with a mlltary strengtb expected of a first-ciass Power, let us get reg arrive on later battie-fielda with fresh troaps- war iast long enaugh for 'us to get them readY can at ieast pay the trling- Insurance preli' getting thema ready as 'rapldly as possible;5 should do this In Canada as surciy as In the laies. THE MONOCLE 1",
         "CANADIAN COUTRIER. Courierettes. 1MIRICA boasts that it spends S$600,000,000 every year on Music. Uncle Sam seems to U.ure everything by the $ mile. kt the saine timé it ls rather pe- iar that some clever miliionaire flot yet succeeded in cornering mutsIC Mnarkiet. \"armers complain whenever we get long sPeli of dry w-ather. Thev i tlie roads too dusty for comfort- e mnotoring. ~~flooks who dlaim to have de- ýflded from great familles are evi- 't'y fitiil descending. )ne thling to be raid for the war is Lt 't is keeping the -suffragettes out the newspapers. 30fInetlimes the cliap who wftt' the '8 Doet at coilege gets a job later li0 $Canning meters for the gas 1upany. PW0 moen crosse d the Atlantic in a Y müotOr boat. Tliat's our Idea of lXi'Ost unnecesuary thing to do. iVilliam Jennings Bryan declares r1se1f in favour of votes for woflefl. turally onougli. Tliree times tlie 4t have refused to make hlm presi- IL. tAI Jenniings, the reformed outlaw, lnot lie governor of Oklalioma, wliy SIllake. Iim a Supreme Court judge? 18i big War seemis to be one of 's rare occasions on whlcli the ?vpaper n'au lsn't of mucli account. i'fi rad that tlie Russians beat tlie \"41 t tlie City of Lyck. Quite ýrPriate that our foes sliould be edat Lyck. rýers\"n9 the coiumns that suifer 1088 ln this war are tlie ad- 't8lgCQiumns of tlie newspapers. 1-nsntr made six a ýece8 11 n hur.Rapid firing for ~4drn SOng-Writing.-One of tlie et riarkable tliings of modemn le1 l the~ decadence of popular 19 i!o railler 0f tlý, art of wvrit- thul Audiences stili appiaud areciate the good old songs of 361rtio11 or two ago, but the men 1 nIethe songe of to-day seem \" t9 reach the lgb levai. 'oýn1lig on this, a man Who 1s lgh in the 'musical woDrld of ~Cted thse other day a version eVer-poPular \"ýAnnie Laurie,\" I, h8aid, 'would be the style lu tLdtePresent-day song-iscrîbbiei! hi.hv done tlie great Scotch Litefl to miy story. kld! ,,ot An1nie Laurle, kid! Sbe01 the Maxwelton river,' \"0o flivver; lier eck'lie thse swan, ý1eYuon? Are you on? Se8a bear, slie's a bea?, S's Wolf, she'a an otter, SI , weil turkey-trotter! es80nio dancer, Oh, Owlien I squeeze lier, 1 lieage r, oh, Caesar! 01 ht Annie Laurie i'Sg! i1\"1etorU bugs are bunny; 4 lt t uTny? Ain't it funny? Mgrab me, taxicab me; tht gloriaus,' \"\"ni La,10-ous Rag! leeelgt of Tlm.-In, thse lght of LD vltS, thse following para- fli e New York Telograpli 0'e 16 11, la rallier amusing: elllrnt about to bulld new fortifications whlch Winl cost $62,8,00, 000. Another example of maximum expenditure witli minimum return.\"i it merelv goes to show that para- graphers, like other people, are prone to err. It's Often That Way. He' may be a 'brave band-master When hie plays at the hippodrome, But the chances are that lie's forcedl to play The second fiddle at home. Discretion and Valour.-Ifl other seasons theatrical managers liad no hesitation In producing ail kindýs Of shows. Tliey are going slowiy this vear. an-d Dutting on very few new i.attractions.i Tliey realize that in xvar time tlie public ls not iikelY to be keen to spend $2 for a 20 cent show. Words on the War. Quite fittlng that the Germai' advance on 'Brussels should be described as a dlean swOOp. The restaurant cynlo says that those Frenchi and Austrian waitefls wlio have enlisted should know liow to charge. European monarclis, for the time being, have abandoned their usual customi of klssing eacli other. The employer who koops lits sliop open nowadays la doing lis share for tise Empire. 'Now, if somebody could get Mrs. Pankbu!5tto go tO the front as a sweet-faced nure %Sounds heard at, sea, are eajsily converted by the tele- grapli editor Into a great: naval battie. According to tise papers a fleet at anchor le \"bottled,\" and an army in camp is \"trapped.\" Kaiser Wilbelm lias six sons, all grown up and in the arm3'. He could almost form a famly regiment. Anyway, It wasn't Atlstia that put tise \"serve\" in Sorvia; Boston ie said to be annoyed by the cruel war. Price o! beans lias risen. And the warring nations' are those tisat used to condemn \"'the ýunspeakablo Turk' Itwiîl be noted also that the Casino at, Monte. Carlo stayed open longer than the stock ex- changes. Some propliets say tisat this wîll be the iast great war. It will-until tise next. ,Someiow or other that 014 'text aboutý turning thse other çheek seems s3adiy forgotteli by tise Chiristiani nations. asked Judge Carpenter to change bis naine to Frank Miler. The judge con'sented. He knocked something out of Frank's namne. 'What's that? Motto For the Married.-United we stand-but divided we stand it better. Apt In This Case.-Among other little odds and ends that bear the 'Made in Germany\" sign might be in- cluded the present war. Here's Mary again. Mary had a littie coal- A ton and a lI or so- She sold it by the scuttieful And slle made a mint of dougb. Cutting Retort.-He-\"A penny for your thouglits.\" Slie--They're flot worth it.\" He--\"WVhat were they of?\"i 'She-\"Of you.\" One Woman's View.-\"No, I don't believe in votes for women,\" said the littie lady wltli the tart tongue. \"If thereis one blessed littie thing tliat the men can do alone, by ail means let them do it.\" They Surely Are. The corsetlere commits a fraud To gather In lier tin, Because lier lady patrons are Completeiy taken In. OId Job a Back Number.-Thls ls from tlie Bedford Express: \"His principal item on ýSunday after- noon was Coulson Kernahanis 'God \u003cand the Ant,' but lie Included one or two lasser pleces, lncludlng a chapter from tlie Book Of Job.\"i That sureiy sliould wear out tlie patience of old Job. it Hurt9ý-It's a liard Joît to tlie self-made man wlien lie gets married and lis wife decides tliat elie lias to Malte liim ail over again. Localizing the War.-Certain Cana- ,dianu tlieatree wii not. permit players to, mention tlie war tliat is now rag- lng, lest it start arguments 1n tlie playliouse or cause some outbreak In the audience. Apropos of tlils, it la interesting to note tliat tlie proprietor of a certain cosmopolitan restaurant in a big city, fearing trouble if war arguments start, put up tis sign in lis eating- house: '-Tlie War Will Be Settied In Europe. Don't start anytliing HERE.iî He Got lt-A certain lIttie boy we kniow was very anxlous to possses a watcli o! bis own. H-e asked bis father again and agaîn, but lie was told that lie couldn't have IL. Ho thouglit of another way. It was customary for each member o! thse famly to repeat a text on Sumday Jaftrnloons. .Lunuae. n r sisters said tlieir's, and it Ca-me to liýs The Test.-41ust now the suprelo turn. He looked graveiy round and test of the toper's patriotisml is lis repeated, \"Wliat I say unto one, i SaY ability to forego lis usul Ge~\u003crman umto ail, watcli! brand o! beer. iHe got tise watch. The Latest One.-The lateet dance H antIpesd- ok is thse \"Bostonl Pauýse.\" Ho Who \"liesi-4 H Wasn' lpeat- Niagra- tates-' is bast, but lie wlio mnerelY shireman stood gazlng atNagr \"paues\"may oxiinu to anc. ~ Falls. An American strolled along. thpatss it? otiu odac.l \"Pretty wonderful that, isn't it?\" ta it lie salal. 0f Course He la. \"Young man,\" said the girl, \"don't you do Il- If you kiss mie you'l certainly rue l. Ho stopped riglit away- Now sho thînks him a JaY, And lie is-that le ail there ls to it. Wliat'a Net in a Name?.-F?ank Helimiller, o! Chicago, thie other daY \"Wonderful?\"' snorted thse York- shireman, l'not at ail. Water keep- ing on golng dowu isn't wonderful. Now, if the wator went up Instead o! down, you miglit have some'thing to bie proud of! ' Is It?-Wlien s. feilow la loafing bal! lits time away ig it-beçause lie thinks hli a boaf Is botter tisan noue? Handiest fer Daily Swcepirg N0 MATTER wa te ehd reu ~-ploycfrd be eanirg ceira.. aed rug,, there ,,till reniais, the ever3 day nScessity, fir a goed, mediuîm priced, band prcpelled car- pet sîveeper that prcrnptly ard efficiently gather, op ail dirt or litter. i..ithout noee dust or effot. The hous~esives of the world aittest the super;ority of BIS SELLS the genuine. original Carpet Sweeper- the recl gn,,zed leader in evqr~countr3 Nxhere carrets ai d rugs are ,îsed. 2ou can douhle the convenience by having two machines. one for upstairs and one for do-n. The BisselI swepr ï. the handy, inexpessive cleaning feie fr eveey day use. Prices, $3.00 to $4.75 at ail dea'crs. Bookiet on request. BISSEIL CARFET SWEEFER CO. Grand Rapidi Uic\u003e,. Niatara Falls t.ana. j) IRE ûkE OLD\" Cawtlira Mulock \u0026 Co. Emboers of Troeo stock Exchage Brokers And Bankers 12 KING STREET EAST TORONTO, CANADA CAMI ADDRES.-CAWLOCK MORO The Merchants'Bank of Canada HEAD OFFICE - MONTREAL President. Sir H. Montagu Allan. VIce-President, K. W. Blackwell. General Manager,.B. F. Hebden. PaId-up Capital ........$7,00,000 Reserve Fund and UndI- vlded Profits .......... 7,248,134 220 BRANCHES IN CANADA General Banking Buslneisa Transacted. Saving DEPARTMENT at al branches Deposits of $1.00 and upwards recelveal, andl interest allowed at best current rates. TORONTO OFFICES: 12 Wellington St. West; 1400 Queen st. West (Parkdale); 406-408 P ar- liament St.; Dundas St. and Ron- cevffSAve. SLOVENLY SPEECH la a sure mark of Ignorance or iU-breedîng. Botter be as particu- lar about your Elnglish au about your pergonal appearance. The easiest waY la te get that hsnly, little volume, \"A Deslc..Boo of Errera in English \" by Frank H. yisstely. Price, $L.00. Poist-pald. NORMAN RICHARDSON 12 E. Welinfgtonl St. - Toronto",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. r; il Unsurpassed and cleanly bottled, %WCSRA\u0026VES (Chili-proof) PALE ALE, The Cosgrave Brewery Co., Iargest lirewers of mild Aie, Half-and-HaIf and Porter in the DomJiionI. 70ý-G Affairs in New Zealan WAR AND POSSIBILITIES 0F WAR War.Seirvice First-No extra premium wilI be charged on policies in force prior to August lst, 1914, on the lives of any policyholders of the Canada Life Assurance Com-' pany who may engage in military or naval service, in or outside of Canada, irrespective of whether such poilicies provide for an extra premium or not. Second-In the event of any policyholder who is engaged in active service, not having paid any premium fafling due during his absence, the Company will keep his policy in full force and effect during his term of service abroad, the unpaid premium being treated as a loan upon the policy. Pqlicyhoders should notify the Com- \u003epany upon entering foreign service. Canada Lif e Assurance 'Company HERBERT C.ý CON, PrsiJ.ut a G.oral managoe (From Our Special ýCorrespondent.) Wellington, N.Z., July 30. T HE European war, now deflnitely launched by the Austrian dec- laration against Servia, lias effeci even in this far corner of tiie world. Already stock exchianges show weakness and grain an upwaýd tendency, while producers, whose output is stili afloat en route to Eng- land are fearful lest the steamers meet hostile craf t before reaching their destinations. ýHowever, there is yet hope that the storm may not spread mucli beyond the Balkans, and visions of possilole raids by warships do flot spoil our slumbers. Should ]3ritain become seriously embroiled 1 have no doubt many New Zealanders w iii be found ready, aùs they were filteen years ago, to go promptly to the front-wherever it inay be. Austrian Coloniste Excited. There are several thousand Aus- trians, or 'Galicians, engaged lu Lue kauri gum ilianstry in Lne penînsula whidh forms mne norciï.;rn portion of the province of Auckiand, anc the noriheru extremity of the Dominion. The Austrian 'Consul al, Auckland is inviting -applications fromn men will- ing to go home to figlit for their country, but so far his efforts as re- cruiting, agent have not been success- fui. Indeed, they have produced re- suite the reverse of successful, or even of plea.santness. Numbers of Croatians are amonig the alienl gum- digging population usually lumped to- gether, for the sake of convenience, under the genieral heading **Aus- trians.\" Some of these the other uiight '\"demonstrated\" outside thîe Consul's office la Auckland and re- lieved their feelings by. shoutîng, -ýDown with Austria,\" while others dlecided to -work promptly and thor- Dughly to ralse funds for Servia. It is fair to add, however, that coasld- erable numbers of Austrians assured -the Consul of their continued Iloyalty to the homelaisýd, and some, have ai- ready left these shores to join*la the fray. Our Own Warriorà. Speaklngý of war reminds me that pur owa \"armly\" lias been ander re- view by the, Inspector-General of Ov ersea Forces, General Sir Ian Hamilton. Ja lis report to, the Hon. James Allen, ýMinister for Defence, Sir Ian Hamilton pays warm tribute to the work already accompllslied in the Initiation of the compulsory mili- The BUa-nk-in,ý Situati 0 UR Government bank returns*are slow in comlng ont- Elther the bankers or the Ottawa officiais are tied, up la too mucli red tape. The Juiy bank statement on August 26thL Ioî ridiculous-but a fact. The chief feature la July was the recall of eleven millions from New York. Even tlseu our caîl loans there amounted to $126,545,Q000. That la a tidy lîttie suin to have down there. Perbape Hon. Mr. White, the-Minis- ter of Finance, should have- pasaed a law approprlatlng it for the purpose of helplng the Governinent and 'the' people of the countiy to whlch it be- longs. But M~r. White dld not do aniythlng of that kind at the special session of Pariamnent lield receatly. On the other hand, hie dld pass an act whlch enables hlm to give the banks some more money whir-h they say they need. What would Canada du if the United States were te, de- clare that $125,545,000 contraband of var and impound it tili the war is over? What would Canada do if she ever weat to war with the United States-facing a loss of one hundred and twenty-five million la cash the first day? Cali boans la Canada lncreased a mnillion dollars during July, because Europe was selling us back some of the hilh-prtced stock we *ad sold to themn. Rumour says that they have ailother twenty millions of ail ready to \u003eseli no as so stock market opens up ag bajiks will flnd it necess£ range for this littie trans fore the brokers let bed again. Curreut lens' to businE stood at 040,00,O0M or eiS lions les than on July Apparently the busines wanted less mnoney -or got way. Thle savings deposits air~ $7,214,000, an Increase of lion during the year. This littie addition to our \"neE counts, and slows the conf people of Canada have In~ tered banks. The depostsý lng interest, declined~ tel] during the sane twelve mno lng a net gain of forty ml la pretty fair evîdence that are not hoardlug thelr Ba' doubt the forelgners la Cal little gold by for a raiaY the real Canadian takes DlO caution. iSînce war br0k gold lias been pald over counters. During the year the a Ilabilities of the ýbanks niearly flfty millions, buIt have the edge over the 112 approximately q round mI tary training system in New Zeais At the samne Urne hie points out ex ing faults in unequivocal terme; lit indicates the remedy in equý plain words. The General wants waste on non-essentials; ev'cryil must 'be thorough-it may get bY easiest and quickest way to, the ject aimed at, but whatever medium immediately concerl training, organization, or equiPl \"thoroughness\" is the keynote. Ia.n Hamilton saw the New Zeal troops in several big concentrai1 camps, and hie saw them under a1 cious weather conditions. Rain, and wind made the camps -ine case littie Iess than a snowles blizzard-swept Antarctic plain; always the men turned out and tlîeir work in exemplary fash Many of these young fellOWS-cle xv arehousemen, factory employees professional ipen in the cities- turnea to their homes better health, d'espite the Spartan natun~ their training conditions.W poig-,i.ig the way to secure efficiency, General Sir Ian Ha[\"' 13 good enough to, pat us on thle ý and say we have begun well; b' we must do better! Our Naval Matters. ¶tegarding naval matters, tlierl littie change. Last, week 14- Phulomel was off icially taken 0T8J the New Zealand Goverament, tc used as, a training slip -for Yc New Zealanders desirîng to enter navy. There have been somre cussions on the subject 'Êince Pa nment met; but thie Governiir determination to continue Its pre polcy 'Io expressed la the od the Minister for Defence a few ago that \"this country was nût d ahl it could to, help la Imperial fence. We were willing to' Put, hands la our pocke ts; but the Ùad corne when we should alsÊ) t our young men and offer theln service la the Imperial, navy.\" Parliament has been lu sessic month, and littie real progress seen. The Opposition wasted li ergles and the country5 molOY censure debate the outcome of was a foregone conclusion. ,POeM h'ý was doue to secure what one 1 ber described as a weeding ouit sheep froni the goats-Just a e proaiouncemeiit by one or twO bers thought to'be 'doubtful they stood on a Party test. FeRANK ]W.OU»",
         "WOMAN 'S SUPPLENENT-CANADIAN COURIER. WOMEN SEF A Page of Comment In War Time UGUST, tbe montb of holiday engagement and lazy loitering by river and lake, has proved, duzr¶ng the last fortnight, a veritable, montb Of Mars, and tbe -peace year,\" whicb was ~beeni celebrated so gladly, wîll end in the (f arme and the clash o! contending hosts. 3mg-dreaded \"ýgreat European war\"l is devas- the older lands, while Great Britain's self- ilag Dominions, colonies and dependencies, \"to st. least lump 0f corail\" are rallyirig to the tbe Plucky littie Island Kingdom, wbich is 'ed to figbt to a finish In this titanic struggle. Il those wbo have been disýposed to criticize 1 policy in former confiicts are agreed tbat etion , ! the Present war is inevitable. Sir 'd Grey bas displayed tbe most admirable '4lsblp iu bis long efforts towards concilia- i bis obylous desire to mediate betweefl Rus- Il Aulstria. Tbe Kaiser's attitude towa-rds Bel- la that o! an uncompromislng belligerent, and detgrandison of Queen Victoria is evidently ed on1 war aginst Great Britai% and France. 'l5aSsination of tbe beir to h e Austrian anSd bis wlfe, afforded an excuse, did not t'lie a cause, for tbe movement of Austrian Sgainst Belgrade. Tbe stormn bas been '119 for years and xiow i bas broken With )'c Of accumulated f ury. have flot realized yet just what the struggle \" IEven w-ben our Canadian forces bave and are lu tbe midst o! the fray, we sbali ud this confllct \"corne home\" to us, as it to5 lusei the British Isies. Tbey, wbo e, carrylng for so long the burden of war MenIt and Dreparation, are deserving of our es loyaltY and beartlest support, and it is \"'1119, liad ail .the foreboding, to see tbe fr~ont whjeh tbe Britisb Empire presents w o'rld. Vanisbed is the strife in Ireland, th~ere Dot a Callagban looking after'tbe adare flot lrisbmen, north and south, -pasfigbtîng men,\" wbenever need arises? ~Wi1ee, lu these days of storm, and stress, 'e~ol'k Of Canadian women? It ls being lyudeffectively In tbe homes aud 18of the land, and tbe naval bospital o Ur WvOmeni are to equip and start on Its 011 of ercY ls but the outward and visible ettePatrlotl1c feeling animatlng us ail. gret-radmthrswere called to make Ithe Pioneer days, and, wbatever tbis, oua nleaX of privation or suffering to, tbe or! tbis Dominion, we belleve that tbe pri\"lt will prove' equal to tbe test and e 'v oe1 who came to this Young country ugao wouild bave no need to blusb for ieldauts o! 1914. The Wornan's Part t t6 the words aboutthe sacrifices of lipU.t, rny eyes fell upon a littie blhgany table lu tbis cottage on the Of .\u0026uapoîîs Basin. It bas an iuteresting f tht turdY and much-coveted bit of furni- 0\"l amie across fromn England to .Massacbu- 40 hundred Years ago. Tben, lu the days fol- .\u0026m ierlcan War, Its owner packed tbe Gli ad the old dlock, to. say uothlng of cer- t 'ver, aud made bis way witb bis bouse- [aCnda, wbere hie stilI migbt be under tbe iv V' hese qualut and lovable rural homes a tb ere la, hardly a room witbout its rto Its timeworu chair whlcb bas a story the telllng. The East ias howlng a Quiet 1trc e - cause of the Mother Country whlch a stic Of its people. Tbe past Is repeatlflg 1,S-John, A.~pll Roand Halifax. The 0iug bts loyal spirit 411 unmlatakable )wUhere, ou the Atlantic coat, one realizes, erieel8e lu, the Dominion, the contlnuity of 'WbCe*eich Britalu has known. rht l ety whlcb la Nova Scotla's seat of Inltt the capital of our wile Pacific Pro- the 1~ re3o8 f the women isl the saine. All DIG re forgotten, ahI divisions merged, lu (laeluO! Prov-idiug, for the comfort o! our tallugents. Iu every great criais, there, beO \"rigbts,, or of \"place,\" Eacb is eager tu Drt, aud one toucb o! war's tragedy miales atiof one. If the tbougbt o! tbe stemfi a aits our men on the other aide o! tt es on the buslest gatberIng, it la ailb- 0t11e s irît whlch 18 ready to support and ýI tlorsol iers. Sucb. bas been the Imme- lttue lu Agilo-Saxon nations, and we lo rer and m ea ner people, If t ever 4e lIuing the has t ten years, inueb abuse. Ie o 5oer on those wbo saw. this danger r'O Uadolbelleved firmly lIn the preparatiok of ail British countries to face it. \"Alarmist\" and \"militarist\" were the mlldest ternis used against those who were sure that Germafly's military activity meant hostility to Great Britain, although botb in Afrîca and the Orient it was manifest that the Kaiser biad no friendly intentions towards tbe British possessions. Canadians have flot any hysterical teudencies in the matter of international conflict. We are flot \"«spoiling for a war\"l-but neither are we ever dis- posed to shirk our military responsibilities. Now, the most serions Crisis whicb Britain bas faced for a century confronts us and neither men nor women are lacking in enthusiastic service. The Canadiaen woman bas won especial recognitioni for bier quali- ties as nurse. It bas long been admitted in New York tbat for skill and endurance, the nurse from Canada is -unexcelled. The demand -for nurses ls sure to be answered by our women, witb a supply of trained and expert belpers, equal even to the ter- rible exactions of such a struggle as is now con- vulsing Europe. Already some hundreds of Cana- MRS. JAMEiS C0. MaeGRECOR, Wlfe of :the Lleutenant.Governor of Nova Scotta, Who Is pleased at the response by the women of the provinlce to her letter Invitiflg their interest In the Hospital Ship Fund. The contributionl amouflted to $3,000. dian nurses bave volixnteered for field wo rk. The hardest part o! aIl lu this or any other war la to be played tby tbe wornen whose busbandsanSd sons go forth to the war, for the passive lot o! the one w'ho waits for tidinga !rom tbe armny or the fleet ls jn-ftnitely more heart-breaking than that of the figbter wbo is lu the ridat o! t'he ouset. Century ufter cenitury, British women~ bave watched their sons rail away for conifliit, wltb the fear lu thelr beerts tbat tbey bad sad a luat \"good-bye' to the cager youug warriors. Iu France sud Russa aud tbroughout the British Empire to-day, we are thorougbly convluced that a terrible cost must be reckoued bc-fore the autocratie aggresslou o! one mruher is tu be beld lu effectuaI check. We bave met thia reckoulug in ths pa. As Kiplng says: \"If blood be tbe price o! Admirahty, Lord God, we ba' pald it lu fuli,\u003e' Tbe womneu o! the land prove wortby o! the bravery of t'belr boys, and once 8,gain it 15 sbowll that \"the womau's cause la inun's,' for sucil readîness o! ser- vice could not be displayed by Canadian men to-day, were it net for the motilers wbo, lu the pat, lu- culcated the lemaý3on o! Promptuesa and fortîtude. 0N ahi aides, we heur conjecture as to the ont- '4Jcomle o! the struggle, sud onie opinion la voiced ,agaln sud agalu: \"It will be the hast great war.\" The definition o! war, given ilu oie' brîe! sylla\u003eble by Genierul Sherman.I, la its sordldtrutb, aud it la, perbaps, throngb proVlng the horrible effective- ucas o! moderi englues o! warfai'e, that the clvlllzed world wlll be led to a conviction o! its su preme desolatio3l The struggIe O! 1870 meant a logs o! an THE WAR imperial crown, and the recogni tion that the fo]ly of one vain man was iargely to be blamed. After the smoke has cleared from the combat of 1914, it is to be hoped that the spirit of Hohenzollerflisma will be chastened and subdueri. This is. we believe, a struggle between sane democracy and purbllnd ambi- tion. It is flot Engiand, but Germany, wbich has been exalting militarism as the ideal of citizen ser- vice--and it has, fot been the best of Germany. Tbere is so xnucb that is of the finest in modern scientific, industrial and musical achievement, in the Land of the Rhine, that one of the saddest features of the present strife ls the bitterness whicb may be engzendered towards everythiflg Teutonic for years to corne. However deplorable certain aspects may be, the figbt ls on, and we bave but one duty as ýCanadians In the preseut juncture. We are at this time a united Empire- 1 \"One heart, one flag, one fleet, one throne, Britons, bold your own.\" ERIN. The Price of Liberty A Satire on War C OUNCIL ad been taken lu te tree dominions celestial, terrestrial and infernal-the date being lu the second of tbese, which alone counts time, the Year 1914. God baed gathered bis Councillors together, among themn Eartb's Ambassador, bis Off-sprlng, lu wbose frume are tbe cicatrices, seals of tbe eartbly mission, yet remainlng. \"Eurtb troubles me\"-thus tbe Almigbty; and all over tbe Japer cbamber bauds buslbed the murmur o! tbe barp-strings. \"Once dld 1 visit tbe star wltb vengeance. I sent deluge. But after it the rainbow. Once did I pour my com- passion upon it, my Son's beart tbe sacrîficial vessel! Once bave I given Hlm, Hie conseutiug. Shall God twice ordain the Crucifixion? Or, say, my Council0I5for wratb consumes mne-sball 1 drop this planet, into tbe sun, whicb vexes me wltb ita armafeents and navies, which treats tbe Prince o! Peace wltb contutnely?\" Then stepped the Earth's Ambassador forward, tbe wouuds white on bis palme aud on bis îuateps. \"Patience were better, 0 my Lord. Many there be on the Earth wbo grieve because 'the new commaudmelit' ls broken. For the sake o! wbom let it be remetnbered that Tbou wbo gavest to man to choose budat planted tbe forbldden thlng beside hlm; to tbe end tbat obedience sbouid glorlfy Tbee and tbatodefauit ahould maguify Tby grace. WberefOre, permit that tbe Holy Gboat be sent to menl ere yet Tby wrath 'be klndled. S.enýd forth Thy Dove upon tbe Eartb.\" The kings o! tbe phanet sat lu conclave. AggraudIzemnt was the namne o! one, Funatlcism the title o! 'a second, Liberty a third's-there were many present. Tbey had met to consaler terme of' peuce, a war-cloud lmpending, but each tested the edge o! bis sword, covertly, wble !raming compromises. Tbe roof under wbich tbey had met wa lo!ty-the Dome o! St. Peter'5, more than likely; for waa not tbe cause of their comlng oonseci'ated? So the shock was lea\" than one badl imaglned wben dlown fromn tbe frescoed belgbt a vole dropped. \"Remember,\" It said, \"the Prince of Peuc 'e, my beloved, Son, lu wbom 1 am thorougbly pleased.!\" A Dove poisedl, like ýsuow lu sunlight, blndlng the eyes wbleb blinked to sec it vanlsh. Aggrandlzement scoffed ut bbc apparition. Fana- tlclsmi perverted its message. Liberty had a band- age over bis cyes. As the kdngs wltbdrew tromn the Councîl, wur buvlng been liatcbed lu deiberatioil, onily one puaed on the thresbold, vaily, hoolç.ng into the dome where God bad apoken. HIB naime was Defeilce. The Prince o! Darkness consuitcdl bis advlsers. rut ie w\u0026s III e-t case. \"Whut troubles mne,\"l quoth hie, \"la 'not that the nations arseut wur. War la bell. But out o! that wur, 1 lear me somnehow, will corne tbe trutil to mnild. We stand for despotism. The war la for liberty. 'Our only hope Is that the price o! liberty will etaggcr.the world.\" M. J. T. The- Ship Fund and Its Use T HE Imperal gift, of a hopîtl ship, whlh was T uggested lu Toronto tbrough the Daughters o the Empire as thle Contribution of Canadin women to the Britishl war cquipmeuit and toward the realzation (o! which respouses have poured lu toi the centreai conimittee with the expected generoslty aud promptucas, bas been cbangedi by requeat o! the British Admiralty to a gif t intact o! the funda rulsed to date, September lat, for a suppiemlentary naval hospitai ut Haslar, near Portsmouth, England. ýWbl'ch. change lu the appropriation o! the ablp fund la atrictly lu accordunce with the original resohutIon whlch was made ut tbe meeting o! tbt% AS",
         "WOMAN 'S SUiPPLEMENT-CANADIAN COURIER. RAISING MONEY AN EASY TASK. A well-known citizen tagged by a quartetteý of the Toronto ladies who raised the gratifying sum total of thlrty-one thousand dollars In one day for the Canadlan women's war-gift to Britain. The fund wll be used to equlp a naval hospital at Haslar, which will bear the name of the patrlotlc donors. 1. O. D. 'E,-the body from whicii the. movexuent emanated-when It was declded ta aid the Empire In the care a! the slck and wounded, If nlot w1th the git of a liospital ship, thea wltb a sumn ta b. ex- c]uslvely devoted ta mlltary and naval hospital uses- Miss Plummer, wha suggested the hospital ship, is a devoted admirer of the Canadian nurse, and would have been gratified and delighted had thbe gif t taken tbe !orm se thouglit of witb full Canadian nurslng and medical service. Nevertheless, this ardent lmn- periallat la anious, lîke ail otber wa!n ln Canada', ta se. the fund expended where need le greatest. Whlch. need le tbe sald supplement- ary bospîtal, as the grateful Admir- alty lias lntlmated. Nor wlll the Identlty a! the git b. last by the change lu tii. use ta b. made o! tbe sblp fund, for the. Duchess of Con- naugbt bas seen ta It tbat the re- lief station-ta-be at Haslar will bear the naine \"'The Canadian Wo- nien's Hospital.\" Thle equipment W111 be for onie hundred and ten beds at least. The first officiai communications excbanged between the Duchess of Connauglit, wbo lnaugurated the movement, and the First Lord o! the Admlralty ber. fallow:- \"Women of Canada anxious ta offer Hospital Sblp to Bril Navy. Before startlng fund, auxi- ous ta kuow whether sucli offer would b. acceptable. \"Loulse Margaret Duchess of Connauglit.\" \"Board of Admlralty respectfully tliank Your Royal Higbness for graclous message, and beg that their deep appreciation of the offer made by thie *omen of Canada, whlcli they gratefully accept, may b. made known. \"Wluston Churchill.\", Subsequent etudy of the situa- tJon resulted lu the change lu the t use of funde. A bospitai abip was less needed, as the AdmIralty bas \u003cSuggese many, than wae tbe elulpment Go forthi, Best-I wbicb will sbortly exist at Haslar. This yak.e wouli Sa, for tbat purpase the full fund And glory in thi received te date Sept. Iet by the Tho' h.art chou~ Central Cammlttee of the Hospital ShIP F'und was iorwarded te Her For, thy heart, Royal Highness the Duceess of From mine whl Caniiaught ta affer. The com- Wuîi often heav~ ittee disbanded ou1 that date aise. And troubled f Ail Iater contributions 'ta the Shlp Kund are belng recelvied by a smali committee, the personnel beiug Lady Drummond, Mrs. Ag-r Adamn- son and MIes Plummer, and wlll b. devot\u003c ,. ta mUti- tary bospital uses. The response ta thie appeal on behalf o! the. men, soldiers aud sallore who have gone to the. front, on the part of our women wbo have contributed ta the. columus wth friends, Bons, busbands, brothers and fathers, bas been se wideepread as ta b. literally unite4, snd not ouly has generaaity prevalled, but fhe greatest expediton bas been used by ail lu amassing t.ie !unds the. movement called for. *Tag- day alone lu Toronto resulted lu a sum for the fund of $31,000, Ottawa ralsed lu two weeks sometbing over $10,000. And emaller centres have followed suit superbly. East ta west ail Canada bas aided, and neyer bas thie blood lu the velus of this. country been stirred ta a greater filial ferveur than under the pres- ont menace ta Great Brîtalu, to vanquieb wbicb our womexi are backlng our soldiers. The muen wbo go to the front are brave; the women wbo help them aise are berolc. To the 1. O. D. E. bellongs the credit o! calllng the Central Commlttee together and Issuing the first caîl A WOMAN'S LAST WORD by the above scene ut the Union Station, Toronto, Auguet 2n. oved. 'Tic for thy cake d hide its sorrow y cholce to-day, Id break to-morrew. tee, when far removed ch beats s0 wlldly, y for thy wlfe \u003er our child b. My hands, what thaugh they Cannot yet RelinquISh thee ta danger, Shall ceas. ta cling, in pride that thou To valour art no stranger. Farewell, my L.lfel Ou4r fîreaide Shall falthfully be tended Against thy-yea-thy comInq home When cruel strife is erded. ta service, but it le notewortby that the sald com- mnittee was a ver\u003e' tiioraugl representatioii of ail the nationally-urgaiiized societies of wamen lu tbe coun- try. The commlttee, whlch as sucli bas campleted its business, will continue new and important work a! a patriotle nature under the naine the. Centrai Committee o! Wameu's Patriotie Service. Sa far the womeu have concen'trated effort te as- sust lu the. work a! relief for damaged soldiere. 'Tbey' are now praceedlug ta fix attention on another phase of the war need, namel\u003e', relief for the women at home flot only the relatives of soidiers at the but others who will feel the pinch of comuiig times.\" Meýanwhile, ail the societies of wofinE assisting the work of the Red Cross organizc The Positionless Gir] T1HE precipitation of war upon Great B ritai T ]ad as one of îts lmdaeotoe h ing out of their various positions o! largE bers of clerks and stenographerS employed offices of stock brokers and other men of bu who were flrst to feel the paralysis of the war -, Consequently, lu many o! our cities the emaPlo bureaus are being besýleged by scores o! su'~ \"jobless\" young women and girls. One bas the account by a fair young ejectiol o ne sucli down-town place lu Toronto, of he \"adventure,\" as she terms It, lu the queue. \"There were dozens there,\" said iny pret formant, who, despite the fact a! ber curls a\"i pies, and the !act that it is less than a year sini graduated from a New York business college manded by worth, lest you think by indulgel decent pay of fifteen dollars weekly. \"I had to wait quite a while,\" She continUIE inquiry Ïhad started at half-past eight aud I v hour behind the first arrivais,, Some of th,' looked dreadfully anxIous, but as yet there are 1 vacancies lu plenty, and It was good to see tii. clear up on bearing. I could see Jeanle fr0 office when a joor opened on the. roim ad: wblch proved to- be the waltlng,-room for 'it I wanted to laugh when I lit on Jeanle. St waiting as though she had always walted, and go on doing so to the end of doomsday. 0Oh' dered wbat would happen ber at lu-ncl-time.\" \"Wbat are Juniors?\" one lnterrupted, whlt something of an achievement, lu this Instance \"Oh, they are the girls who got under ten dol their envelopes at their last situations. s wait the longe:st. And that, my dear, lu the w, the psalmist, Is 'the wormwood and the gai nasty business.\" \"And wbat of your turn when It came-if corne ? 'ITuru! Milk's lu The Bluebird was uotblflg turn. They gave me my choice of a 'wicked who 'groces' wliolesale lu cabbages and dead and a manufacturer of radiators, wlrth *bon\" 1 t I would be less likely to lose tues ldentlty 1 131 This witb a flourlsh. \"Serlously, thougb,\"1 caflfiÉ maiden, \"I amn cutting out o~ the way of drese and tbe 1 and pleasure expenses, f manency le a trickster lu WlJ and my 'Job' may provo around the corner.\" The Kaiser's A R ING set with a black stone Ise sal\u003c talisman of the ' Jern iamily. Its hletorY d ta the turne o! the fathier erick the Great. This uWC bis accession 'was proe,~ the ring wlth the inlul keep it safely for so long~ mained lu the familY the J the Hohenzollerus would Thie ring was stolen frain1 William Il. bY' bis iist Countesz LicliteiM, and 1 were attributed the. rev\u003e' 1tained by the. Prussl505 Napaleonic wars. It w5w lu 1813, the year of the liberatiohi, and it le decli bigb autiiorit\u003e' that the ring was, woru by WilliaDý during the. Franco-Prus8i' 1870. *-jnB3r ief,-Patril M RS. HAIWILTON GA~ viRfollow lier husb Montreal rnlllioh1ai wbo equlpped the. Prilc81 Lig'bt Iuiautry, ta the frP wIll Join the Britishi nurinig -forces. The. Toronto Girl GI planning a big rally on Q The eventt wlll be a pat ceede from wbicb will b The ladies of the provincial braflch Society in Quebec bave been orga groups of ten workers each, to sew a distribute fu.nds and supplies for and woiunded soldier4g. Tbe orgaflîza ln Moutreal. Ail patterns used for",
         "WO.MAN 'S SUPPLEMItNT-CANADIAN CO URIER,. submltted to the military authorities for aPproval. The COloljrs presented by hier Royal Hibn~Princes5 Patricia of Con- Il ght to lier namesake regiment of L'9ght Infantry, before their departure trin Vartier., were worked by the P ýlness~ Own liands. A gracious 5ýPeecIh accomnpanied the presentation. Tlie Organizing officers of the 1. O. tE. have been kePt 'busy since the Olitbrea\u003c Of 'War with the inauguration Otfil uxiers of 11,w chapters. The \"e\"\"chene\" chpte at St. Claire ha8foritsregntMrs. Richard Kerry. 'ýe Aune de Bellevule has also formed 1 ehaPte. bA Canadiau nurse, who has gone to hefotWith the British Red Cross îmon t Mis Alice Mercier, of The u u O de Ouumer and Permanent resi- not ''lîttle Metis, P.Q., generously a ~te te, the Hospital Ship Fund ars. o!Ireta five thouisand feoe1r~ D t Was stated ýby Pro- reai s 'Ick, President of the Mont- orgi l-a.trage Associationi, that the Ila d 0 f which she is the head ld led to devote ail funds this gi~ltt Ilatrlotîc objects. The suffra- the leordiuglY are represented in ý4itreaI Patriotlc Fund. th l auîe Macliar, o! Kingston, welltiio.wul Writer, wlio calîs hier- ilft eilis lea itten a poem in tite .' wh hg bears the up-to-date tls 8 H'osPita Slip.\" But there 1 sýo\"' even greater ub-to-date- Iral 11,uaxillary Of the newly Red Cross Society ln Win- !en 'w Opo1 O! some fifty prom- ilelncudlng amaong the fOdk9a figures- Dr. Mary Craw- GDtlaray, head o! the General 7ýr8fe nd Mias Cotter, of the Staff for Public schools.ý O', euch..Canadian ladies o! he, a aveexerted every effort In 41 tOwe pud 8ugment the Hospital 1toUg kng among tliem- t'9 CO-operating with the lu ie allt, 0f the city, they have therelef u IàkeOttawa's sh arc' Ull a large one. brOaDuncan, the famous classlc 14 ')otda,-8r, hai installed one bel4droi be lleue p a ler dancing school at ~arlsq, for the use o! the Government, and shc will also receive chidren of needy persons at lier atelier and in lier private residence in Paris. ,Miss Brenda Williams-Taylor, of Montreal, is taking a private course in \"First Aid\" witli the firm intention of enlisting as a volunteer nurse. The lady's fiance is already on the field, and hier only brother, Mr. Travers Williams-Taylor, has been given a commission, and lias enlisoed for foreign service. Miss Wini!red Hiclos-Lyne, the vocalist who lias just returned to, To- ronto from England, contributed to the programme at a recent concert ut Georgina Heuse, that city, from wliich the receipts were added to the Hcspital Slip Fund. Perhaps the most ardent and ap- pealing o! women writers, in Canada, on woman's part in war-time is \"Kit,\" wlio acted as war correspon- dent in ïCuba during tlie Spanisli- American trouble. \"Kit\" is Mrs. Coleman, o! Hamilton, Ont. At tlie time of lier adventure lu the West Indies, tliis brilliant Journalist was connected witli the office of The Mai. and Empire, Toronto,. National Hymns of the Cougntries at War \"TET me malte the songs of a Carey. While destitute o! poetic L.country and you shall make phrases or auy o! the -subtle graces its laws.\" Sudh was the power of poetry, it las survived the vicissi- that Fletdher ascribed to the ballad- tudes o! more than a century and a makers wlio catch a spirit and clothe liai! and bids fair to live for many it in the fiesli of stirring language. ages. It is lierewith given: In the liglit of whidli, it, is wortli while God save our graclous King, ta examine wliat songs are now being Long live our noble King, God save the King! Seind hlm victorlous, Happy and glorlous, Long ta reig4 over us, God save the king! O Lord our God, arise, Scatter lis enemies, And make tliem fall. Con!ound their politlcs, Frustrate tlir ituavusù trichs; un 'i liee our hearts we fix, God save us ail! Tliy dlioicest gi!ts lu store, (in hlm be pleased ta pour, Long may lie reign. May lie defend our laws, And ever give us cause, To sing witli heart and volce, God save the King! PRINCESS MARY Who is active with lier mother at the present time in orgaflizifg the needie- wormen of Engiand for the making of garments and supplies for the British soldiers. nationally vaunted at a time when lialf tlie world is nerved to conflict. God Save the King. The origin of our National Anthelfl, \"God *Save the King,\" -is doubtftul. More rhyrnsters have claimed this lionour than succeeding rulers have deemed It expeient ta pension. The version uuiversally rendered, ho«w- ever, is popularly attributed toi Henry Marseillaise Hymn. T H-1E French are sluging the Mar- seillalse hymu, the stirrii.g, woras and music of whicl war-song were composed on AprIl 4tli, 1792, by Claude Josephi ,,_Ueet de Lisle, a youug Frenchi officer of engineers then sta- tioned at Strassburg. It was called by hlm, Le Chant de 1'Armee du Rhin, but received its present naine because «ung with great fervour by a body o! 'iolunteers from Marseilles, wlio en- tered the Frenchi capital on July 20t1 of the same year and obus made it knowu I1o the Parisians. The historic song was under the ban under the Restoration and durlnèç the Second Empire, but speedily became the national song on the outbreak o! the Franco-German war. Louis Philippe ALL VOLUNTEERS FOR FIELD WORK. acdunaid \u003cmarked X) of the Permanent Army Medîcal Corps ard six of the A. M. C. nurses, who took a direction at the Schooi of Milltary Inlstructionl, Kingston. The pictui'esque blue unhforin, wlth brase eorking-dress of the Canalian 4Army Nursi ng .5ervice. Thbe head-dress, as le seetn, la quite diStInctive. Make Last Year's Sait Look Like a Stunning New One Dianiond Dyes en- able, yuu to recolor your clothes youI.- self'. To use Dia- mond Dyes is simple andl easy. In fact iflany womeo fin( h'orne dyeing to be atascinating pas- time. Every w0onma n likes new Clothes, Buy ai Your purse aïffois but make tserv do double sevce by clianging Cheir colors when their newness wears off. Mrs. Cora Hastings Of Buffalo wrîtes: \"i had a maho. gany calor s u i t made of the new gabardine. i tired of the color as anc 18 apt to When you wear It very aften, and as it was an expensive suit, 1 didn't feel as though i could afford ta throw it away. \"Whiie tai king about It ta a friend she suggested 'Dia. mond Dyes.' i was almost afraid i Mahogany Gabar- couldn't do lt, but dine dyed Brown. the druggist ex- plained to me how simple It was go 1 bought a package of brawn dye, and 1 have a stunning new suit. .1 also dipped an oid hat in thc dye and moulded It aver while wet a.id i am not afraid ta go anywhere with my Psui outfit.\" \"k child cai use them'\" Slmply dissolve the dye in water and boit the material in the colored water Miss L. Helm of Pittsburgh writes: 11I needed a new suit for early Faîl ln the worst waY and no money to get one as 1 had been aut of a position for some time. 1 n glancing over the pages af a magazine, i saw an ad. of Diamond Dyes, which set me thinking. ,\"I had a cloth suit fom iast Sprlng whlch had been a beautîful shade of purpie when new, but, like manie others it had faded g0 that 1 hlreaded to put it an again. i thought 1 cauldn't make It fluch worse no matter how stupid 1 mlght b., and as the directions for uuing the Diamond Dyes were go plain, i bought a package of black dye. i Wae deiightecd with the resuit. It 'Came Out a beautîful black and has flot sMUt one bit.#$ Truth About Dyes for Home Use There are two alSases f abrlcs__anmIj lIbre fabries and veget\"\u003ej libre fabrc\u0026 upe lt Wool and Silk are Purpe Blcth anfimal libre fabrlcs dydBc. Cotton and Linen are Vegetable libre fabrIcs. \"Union\" or \"MlxNed\" goods are asull 60eto 80% COttOn-90o ust be treaed s vgetable fibreý fabrica. It Is a chemnical lmPosslbîlt3 tao get Perfect color results on ail classes of fabries with anyr dyeth aistcor AnimalFibre s, and Vegetej,î0 Fibre Fabrica e ýly well In one bath. We manufacture two classes of Dia- mond D)yes, narmelY-Diamond Dyes for ,Wool or Slk ta color Animal Fibre P1abrics, And Dlamond flyes for Cotton, Linen, Or Mlxed Qoods ta color Vege- table Fibre Fabrica, so that you may Ob- tain the very best resuits on EVEýRy fabrie. Diamoepi Dges Seil at 10e Per Package Valuable Book and Samples Fre. Sernd uis your dealer's naine and ad- (ireas-tei US whetlier -,r not he sells Dianond Dyee, -We wlll then send you that famnous bookz of helpa, the Diamond Dye 'Annua1 and Direction ]3ook, ale' 36 sanPIes of DYed Cloth-Free, The WELIS \u0026 RICH'ARDSON Ccaip\u0026ny, Litîd 12M0 M..ntai,, Si.. MONTREAj,. Caasdê",
         "WOMAN'S SUPPLEMENT-CANADIAN COUIlER. pensioned the author in 1830. A popu- lar translation Is as follows: Ye sons o! fredom, wake to glory! ark! hark! what myriads bld you Your children, wives, and grandsires hoary, Behold their tears and hear their cries! Shall hateful tyrants, mischief breed- Ing, With hireling hosts, a ruffian band, Affright and desolate the land, While peace and liberty lie bleedlng? To arme! to arms, ye brave! The avenging sword un- sheathe, March on! mardi on! ail hearts resolved On victory or death. Now, now the dangerous storm is roll- ing, 'Which treacherous kings, confeder- ate, raise; The dogs of war, let loose, are howl- ing, And Io! our fieldis and cities blaze; And shahl we basely view the ruin, powder actually saved their While lawle.3s force, with guilty hese letters: stride, Spreads desolation far and wlde, the usual rendering is as foi] A voice resounds llae thunder-P 'Mid clashing waves and cli steel- 'The Rime, the Rine, the Ge Rhine! Who guards to-day MY S divine?\" Chorus- Dear Fatherland, no danger tht Firm stand thy sons to watel Rime! They stand a hundred tho( strong' QuIck to avenge their cou. wrong; With filial love their bosoms They'll guard the sacred laii( Weil! The dead of a herole race From heaven look down and thleir gaze; They swear with dauntless hea Rine Be Gernian as this breast of Dl'] -While flows one drop Of G blood, Or sword remains to guard thY While rifle reste in patriot bal N*foe shall tread theY sacred s J- MR. J. C. EATON'$ YACHT \"THE FLORENCE\" Whlch ha$ been p1aced by ltd Toronto owner at the Governmeflt'S for use in war-tlme. With crimes and blood is bande lm- bruing? With luxury and pride surrounded, The vile, insatiate despots dare, Their thlrst of power ýand gold un- bounded, To meet and vend the light and air; Like beasts' of burdel would they load us, Like godes would bld their slaves adore: But man Is man, and whO lei more? .hen, shahl they longer lash and goad us? C)Liber ty! eau man resigu thee, once havîng feit thy geilerous fiamne? Clan dungedus, boîtS, or bars confine thee? or whlps thy noble spirit tamne? Too long the world lias wept, be- That dggr tg Th-a a'iing ' age te wield, But freedom i, le ur sword and sbield, j,nd ail thelr arts are unavalliflg- To arms!1 to armes, ye brave! The avengling s-word un- sheathe, Ma3'ch on! march On! ail hearts resolved On vlctory or deatb, Thile Watch on the RhlflS. T RE German le Vau tng he jfayourite wareOJg,, belYlug the Beeming plety of it ln the present war of unepeaiýabIe aggres. sion. The verses were compoeed by Max Schneckexnburger lu thre Year lS40; but were llttle lcnowI untl thlrty yeare later, when they isud- deuly becamne thre batte-crY of the ln- vading German hosta, lu the figlit against France. JAgan the Invader ls nervlng ie figliters by the, use or abuse of thre filial auitlema Of wblch Our hearts will guard tlhý divi'ne: The Rhine, the Rhine, thi( Rime!\" Russian National Anti 'T riE Russian national hY' peace, and strikes il lronlcally Wistful il 1t thre Cossaclis and plain-sol! are pourIflg dowi n lu mgl the Kaiser. It runs as fol' God, the ahl-terrible, ordaineSt, Thurnder -Lhy elarionl a\"Ic Thy sword. Shlow forth Thy plty On Thou reignest, o Give to US peace il Lord. God, the ail-mnerdiful, eartl saken Thy holy wayls and biSA Thy word; je~t not Thy wrath il awakeu, Give to us peace il 01 Lord. God, the omnnipotent, Milg Watchlng invisible, i, heard; Save us il mercY aud danger, Give to us peace lu O Lord. T HE .Austrlau 'ruil Tchlevous boy neyer dreamied tîon which hlie fate lîglit lu tînder Eýur pralsed lu thre so0ni who are 110w llr.i of deadlY couflllt- Don't be bothered No trouble, No mus\u0026 R1F.D ALLEY CO LTD",
         "WOMAN 'S SUPPLEMENT-CANADIAN COURIER. thein by Hasclika is here translated: Ced upheld thee, mighty Emp'rer, 1j1enarch of aur Eastern land. Power and Wisdom e'er attend thee Rigkteousness with thee shall stand, Till with laurel crewned a victer Ail hearts bow at thy command. God uphold thee, and defend thee, Emp'ror of our Austrian land. Happy flow'ry land! lis sceptre itules o'er valley, meunt and plain, Mldly, calmaly, justly ruleth, He the people\"-s love would gain. 'iet his weaponed might ln splendeur Beams thre' ail the land amain. _,od uphoid thee, warrier, Father, .4onarch of the Austklan land! H1e deiights the poor te cherish, He awakes the minstrei's lay, 1-e weuid net that any perlsh, Ail admire the gentie sway. H--eav'n reward hlm, God defend hlm,\" Thus we sing and thus we pray, Kaiser, Emperer, :Monarch, Father, Ail thy peaceful rule obey. H£- from, bondage will deliver, H1e wouid make us truly free! ln the German heart shall ever H1e the brightest mem'ry be, Till in other worlds a weicome ,reets in blest eteîuiitY. God defend thee, God attend thee, Emp'ror, Éranz, ail hall te thee! italy's War-Soflg. Ail forward! Ail forward! Ail forward te battie! the trumpets are cryitig, AIl forward -ail forward! Our eld flag is flying, WThen ýLinerty calis us we linger ne longer, Rebels, ct.me on! though a thousand te one! s an Liberty! iÂberty! deathles n glorieus, Under thy banner thy sens are viC- torieus, Free seuls are valiant, and stroflg arma are etrenger, God ýshahl go wîth us and battle be won. Chorus- Hurrahi fer the bannier! Hurrah for the banner! durrab, fücr iur banner, the flag ef the free! Ail forward! Ail ferward! Ail forward for ±ereedem! Ia terrible splendeur She contes to the loyal who die te defend hier. Her stars and s tripes e'er the wild wave et battise Shahl fleat la the heavens te wei'Ceme us en. Ail forward! te glory, tho' life-blood la pouring,- lsig Where brîght swordis are lsng and cannons are roarlng* Welcome te death lai the bullet'5 quick rattie,- Fighting, or faiiing, shahl freedom be won. The Paternal Big Store Tr H1E foliowing generous letter was .1 issued on the seventeenth of August by the management et ~the T. Eaten Coe., Toronto, and Per-* sena!iy signed by the president, Mr- J. C. EatoIi, te, every man la the tac- tory or store who has jelned la the active defens of the Empire's honourý *'Dear ÎSîir- -W e wlsh te infermn yeu that 'we are contlnuîiig yoursalary at (hait! or full rate as single or marrled) whlS yOll are, engaged ln active service, aldinig Great Britain la the presemit war. \"In answeriiig your counftry's eall te arms, we appreciate your loyaity and hope te see you retura, ID thie net far distant future, having doue your dutY honoliîabiy and well. ,\"Yeirs truly, etc.\" In addition te, wbich cornes the Offi-- ciai reassurance that the same 00211- pa ny whieh provides employaient te somne eleven theusand perseas, about two-thirds of the number girls and womnen, has determined net te dis- charge employels nor te redUCe salaries lu the present crisis, and is hopefl It may net have te later. PATENTS. A WORKING'MODEL should bebuilt Our modern machine shop and tools are at your service. We are the only manu- facturing attorneys in the world. Get oui- advlce regardîng yeur- invention. Ail advice free. The Patent Selling and Manufacturing Agency, 206 Simcoe St., Toronto. y1RITE for our 112 page Blue Book on patents. Tells how to lovent and dispose of patents. Trademarks regis- tered ail couritries. Robb \u0026 Rebb, 287- 290 Southema Bldg., Wsashington, D.C. T AENOTICEyhr we, theunde.-- prepared to supply. at a reasonable price, an'y demnd for~ the water purifying ap- paratus described in Canadian Letters Patent No. 127572, granted AUgts lSth, 1010. to Lucien Linden. We are aso pre- pared to receive offers for the sale of the patent or for licenses te manufacture under the saine. Ridout and Maybee, 69 Yonge Street, Toronto, Canada. BAKERS' OVENS. 11UBBARD PATENT PORTABLE Oven. -Plans supplled; iatest machinery. iowest prices; catalogue free. Warren Manufacturing Co., 782 Kling West, To- runte. PACKAGE free to coIlectors for 2 cents postage; aise otier hundred different foreign stamps; catalogue; hinges; live cents. We buy stamps. Marks Stamp Ce., Toronto. (IOLLECT STAMPS. Package free te %J'beginners asking for approval selec- tiens. M~. W. Heiwig, Hanover, Ontario. EDUCATIONAL. ARCHITECTURAL D R A W I N G for builders, contractors, etc.; aise mechanicai drawlng and machine desigris ta.ught by mail. Write Canadian Corre- spendence Ceilege, Limited, Dppt. XI Toronto, Can. PR INTIN G. VISITING CARDS-Ladies' or Gentle- men's,, printed te erder latest styles; flfty cents per hundred, post-paid. Frank i. Barnard, Pînter, -35 Dundas Street, Toronto. BOOKS. A LL Canada eager for the greatest seli- -ing book of generation, \"Modern Europe: Causes and Issues of The Great War.\" Thriiling illustrations. Lew prîce. Best termis. Extraordinary money mak.. Ing epportunlty. Splendid sample book free. Winston Co., Llmited, Toronto. KINQ EDWARD MOTEL Toronto, Canada.\u003c -Fireproof- Accommodation for 750 guests. $1.50 up1. American and European Plans. (Llmlted) TORONTO, ONTARIO. European Plan. Absolutely Fireproof. Rooms ;wlth or without bath froin $1.50 and up4per day. PALM]ER HOUSF TORONTO - - CANADA. H. V. O'Connor, Proprietor. Rates-42.00 to $3.00. HOT-EL DURECT'ORY QU2EN0 tO TL *40 mecnTRPla . 300 Roome. TH4E NEW FREEMA N'S MOTEL (European Plan.\u003e One Hundred and Flfty Rooma. Single reoins. wlthout bath, $1.50 and $2.00 per day; roims with bath , $2.00 per day and upwards. St. James and Notre Dame $tse, Montreai. THE TECUMSE14 MOTEL London, Canada. Amierîcan Plan, $3.00 per day and un. Ail reoms wlth running hot and ce'd water. aise telephones. Orill reoom open 8 e1 ..Geo. H. O'Nell, Proprietor. How to Win Batties More Victories are won by siege tactica than by assaults App'ày this to business and £,ee what it mneans: it mneans that continuous and steady advertising is more resultfui than campaigns that corne and go, corne and go with long intervals in between. For an advertiser with goods to, seil to, suspend his sel1 ing effort now is to make conditions worse for hirnself, and is no sign of that courage which is ýup- posed to, possess every Canadian heart in these war trnes. Win and hold your position ini bus- mess y stadfastneéss in attack SHOPPERS' GUIDE",
         "CANADlAN CUIR The Great Varnish Food O-Cec'ar PolIi~ gives all furniture and vernished woodwork a 'new- like appearance and lustre. It cleans while it polishes. See your dealer to-day and get a boutle cf OuCear -Gd~ For cleanir'g and pol'shing those hard-to-get-at 1 -.- Places, use the 0-Ceclar F olish Mop. It is treated ~ t with 0-Cedar Poli'h. Unconditioiialy guaranteed. efF.:ý Channeil Chemnical Co., Limited I ' 369 Sorauren Avenue, Toronto Unnecessary. Risks. )1-1Y. run the risk of loss or destruction of Bonds,. Stock Certificates, Insurance Policies or other valuable documents? Boxes in our Safety BDeposit Vaults mnay he rented for $3.00 per year and upwards according to size. Inspection invited. 18-22 KING STREET EAST, TORONTO otreal Wxnnip.g Edmnonton Seakatoon Rgn TME INDEPENDENT On'rDR 0F FORESTERS FURNISHES A COMPLETE SYSTEM OF INSURANCE Policies issueci by the Society are for the protection of your Famiy and cannot be bought, sold or pledged. Beuefits are payable to the Beaeficiary in case of death, or to the member in case of bis total disability, or to the mem- ber on attaining scventy years of age. Pelicies iasued, froni $500 t. $500 TOTAL BENEFITS PAI, 42 MILLON DOLLARS Fer fartetoe mntM* \u0026\"d laeratur. ap*W te FRED J. DARCH, 8.S. L G. STEVEISON, S.C.I. Joepl \"î.«ia TORONTO THIS INVESTMENT Ha$ paId 7 Pr Cent. Pr Annum half yearly slUce the Securitien of this Corporation were placed on the, mnanlet 10 years ago. Business establIshe(1 28 years. Investinent may be wlthdrawii In part or whole any timoe after one year. Saf. Us a mortgage. Fuil particulars and boolet gladly furnlshed on National Securities Corporation, Limnitc-d Con federation Lite Building - Toronto, Ont. A DESK ]BOOK 0F ERORS IN ENGLISH Assoclate Editor of the Standard Dlctionary, treets the hundred and ue questions that arise in dally speech and correspotidexice which are iiut treated of in the dlctionary. The New York Times: \"The5 scope and plant of the volume, whlch ls of handy sze and alphabetical arrangement, strike one as pleasantly salle and sound.\" 12 mo. cloth, 240 pages. Price $1.00 post-paid. NORMAN RICHARDSON 12 East Wellington Street, - Toronto Thie Rights of Small Nations Premier Asquith Recalis to Par- liament the Honourable 1Traditions of Warfare ALL doubts as to the absoute sYm- pathy between Great Britain and Bigium are ended. For a time the Belgians, having taken the full impact of tne Lk~rmans, were z-aid to, be disgruntle* by the slow advance of the Allies. Thle alleged fati of Namur was set down by some alarmists as due to Belgian weaken- ing. But the speech of Premier As- quith moving the resolution asking K~ing George to convey to Belgium the thanks of the British nation, makes 1L clear that the iirst and lest principle of the war, so far as Eng- lang is concerned, is to respect thie rilts of smalt neutral states like Lelgium. Tlie Premier is an Anglo- ;ýaxon speaker of the John Brighit school. He neyer batinizes. His speech, concentrated in plain words, the present temper of the British nation, niot the flamboyant patriot- ism of France, not the blind infatua- tion of Germany, flot the overwhelm- ing stolldity of Russia, but the sober, steady sentiment of the race whlch. accustomed to wars the world over, lias flot; for centuries had a battie on lier own sou. in. guaranteeing the neutrality of Belgium as a closed door to France, the Premier knew, as the British race knows, that the occupa- t:,on of ±seigium. by Germany, and the probable swift defeat of Jrance, if Britain shouid remai-n neutral, would mean the ultîmate anuiexation of Bel- gium to Germnany, and a still greater menace to England herjdeIf. TVhe Premier said: \"'Very few words are necessary to commend to the House the ternis of tliis address. The war, which l\u0026 now sliaklng to its foundations the whole European system, originated in a quarrel la which thi3 country had no direct concern. We sýtrove with ail cur mlght, as every one now knows, to prevent its outbreak, and, when tliat was no longer Possible, tO limit its area. It is of importance that It should be cleariy uaderstood. when ît was and why it was we lntervened. It 'was only ýwhen we were confronted wlth the cholce betwieen keeping and breaking solemil obligations, in the discharge of a binding trust, and a slameles-i Fubservience to naked feree,« that we threw away the- scab- bard. We do trot repent our decision. '!hle Issue was one whlch no great and s elf-respecting nation, certalnlY hioue bred and nurLured luke dur- i'eves in this ancient home of iberty, could withcut undying shame have declined. -Wett~ were' bound by obligations pia.n and va:îîmüount to assert and ruaintain, the t,îreatened Independence of a smaii and useful, ýtaXe. Belglum. had no lnterests of her own to serve except the onle supreme and over-_ riding Interes, of every State, great oz ultIle, which is worthy of the rinme -the preservation of hier lntegrity and lier national life. Hlistory tells us that the duty of asserting and. -iiialntaliniug tha t great principle, which Is, after ail, the, well-â.pring of ,civillzatlon, lias again and again, at most critical, perlods in the past failea upofi States relatively small lie area, and ta population, but great iu courage ai-dresource, on Athens, .uparta, tue SwIss cantons, and not less gloriously three centuries ago ont the Netlierlands. ,,\u003cI the annals of liberty the Bel- gians have won for îliemseives the immortai giory 'whlcli belongs to a people who prefer freedoma to ease aitti recurity, even to life, ltself.\" la this speech, te premier, volcitig the sentiments uf eVerY EmPire-suli- ject, gave thie glory te the smail nation, Belgiulm. Tt was but due and fltting.' Belgium played the part of David te the Goliatli. Beigluan, and with but a sling anai a few sMaUl Stones, was able te impede the progress of the present mani of Gatli. Ail honour to lJIt1e ]3elglm. The~ Kaiser's gran- ite Is being marked noz only by the British butldog, but by bils piaymatýes., C 0 U R I ER.",
         "CANADIAN COUIRIERI. TUe FIFTHWIILEL ki Ieaticeand Rrrc \u0026PTER XXXV. -(Continuedil) R eyes fell before the passion- ate fire Of lits, and lier breatb laid bis hand over hers where IL on1 the arm of the chair. we part to-day,\" lie coatinued Btly, \"God onîy linows, wbat aew nla'y happen to separate us. we are Married, nothing mat- o O see, d'arling?\" Lt il there is more trouble about '.8e1?\" sbe sug \u003egested. len wee wiîî meet It together. bellev, that I am innocent of hare la It, don'% you? You linow .0Peakîng the truth when 1 say 'lever knew the girl at ahl.\" belliecve every word you say, tOtbelleve that I love you witb hle heart and seul and trust me t thlngs straigbt wbea you are îLe. iil You corne, Fen?\" helltated for a moment longer. Lu0s sha'bby\" s e sid, looliing O.t the simple serge dress in sÂld travelled home. lUg1hed and rose. 'TI engage ni for You aad Theo to ýtIdy up 'il aid, \"an give you ten min- Thn le emuet start.\" folowed hlmi across the louage 'ere the others were sitting. Y'oi feel like a best man?\" a Gsked 'Mauleverer. answere Tubby, \"the belle -~ever lived-juet engaged to gi ~rl fl the world.\" lo' Bnile, softly tender and \"~I'I'leented the assertion. e Ioie aloag and see me tura- L'.ixrie sald. CHAPTER xxxvi. are thIrtysix numbers on a b arad they ail have their ~llike lifeu-sometirnes you hi One and thea a red, some- avle aou f one or the \"I yo hr and then cornes a Youtart afresh. W~~i'en1y brief and quiet, 0111nY Theo and Tubby as 111ils-ss asover. Fenella in \u003e0! tapIness that seemed as a 0a Wayworn traveller, too t4. Derfect no t o be vision- 'tDiL ine the centre of the llVtle t'hotel louage while the etheia touched glasses and h l1ealth* Mr F Laur ence Pridliam,\" said l 1g lits and clInking Theo's e'8n Wishlng lier rnany of the day. Fen, 1 Yoi 1ride,\" heo proclaimed. Ilve lappy ever after.\" t é, Ping, put la I.aurie, e yOu -two, no heeltape!\" Z ali draîaei 'theIr glasses. el2 t this very moment that a tr ,j,thrOuigh the louage calllng ~nulrber and sald, la reply 101 rom Laurle as Vto what lefrdwltd for, '\"Tlere's a gentie- u a'Itlegirl looklng for one cf tbroke In Fenella, catchlng repeople at the other end, 1 Lz aine Instant, the chlld, . 9 ber two frlends, ran to- (.p'fOllowed by hes, mother 'rdlna.ld Saxon. rate Mrs. Moorliouse, ses In t daughter's entluslastlc FenIella, lntroduceil lier- ýe it lî Miss Leach,\" she saîd. \"I arn Eve's mother. You can imagine lîow full rny heart is of gratitude towardls you. I thouglit My little darling was lost. I neyer hioped te see ber again-and then 1 beard of your wonderful beroism. 1 cannot thanli you enough. And Mr. Maule- verer-which is lie?\" Fenella indicatedl Tubby wbo, in bis old lazy drawl, said-to end tbe em- barrassment of Mrs. Moorhouse's thanklv bas made a mistake. That isn't Miss Leach really. As a niatter of faot Miss Leach ceased ta exist about haîf-an-hour ago.\" Eve bubbled over with laugbiter and calledl hlm a story-teller, aad Tubby continued, \"This lady is Mrs. Laurence Pridham.\" Mrs. Moorhouse looked at hlm doubtfully, suspecting a jolie of soe lihnd, whereupon Tubby gravely intro. duced Laurie to Vbem both-and sug gested that -the bride's healtb iol be drunli again with ahl the hionours. ,Meanwbile Mr. Saxon, waiting a few paces away, liid gatbered what was piassing and now approaclied. 'ýMy dear, lie said to bis niece \"I sbould be glad if you would presert me,\" addiag to tliern ail, \"I hape I don't intrude, in joining Vhis little party as an uninvited guest.\" di HIS is rny unche, Mr. Saxon,\" T Mrs. Moorbouse said, ,He lias just corne bacli from Aix-les- Bains to meet me.\" \"I arn proud and honollred,\" Saxon declared, \"to malie the acquaintance of the lady wlio saved my lttle Eve by bier magnificent unselfish presence of mmnd. No words could express rny grateful appreciation of, as h under- stand-Mrs. Laurence Pridbarn. Sir\" -ie turned to Laurie-\"you are, If I xnay be alloweld to say so, one o! the Most foo'tunate men in thie world at this moment. May I have -the p10as5 ure a! linowing Mr. Theodor Mauh- everer?\" \"A doubtful pleasure, I arn afra.id,\" responded Tubby as lie shooli banda. \"Pardon me,\" Saxon dlsseated, there te no possible doubt as to MnY desire to meet Yeu, Mr. Mauleverer, neot only foryour awn salie, but for the salie o! someone who is going to unite us la close rela.tioaship. I asli- ed your sister'a permision to tell YOii that she lied consented to becorne MiY wife.\"1 Tubby's equable politeneas was proof egainst this surprisiag In1- 'tehlgence, and lie rnerely seid, \"Is thet so?\" with an air of rnildly civil interest. \"That Ils so. Ihope to persuade ber to let me fix an early date for the wedding, if the state of your father5 IeaJth permita. SaIlle is witli bor I I3rismain now, as You probably linaw.\" \"Yes, I shahl have Vo be movliig on there,\" remarlied Tubby. \"i shoul1d have, goae to, St. G'eorge's Square stralght from the station but for un- fore seen cîrcumstances.\" He giaaced \u0026t. Thea, and SaXon'L5 eî'es foliowed bis. \"Pleuant ones. I arn sure,\" sald the mîllilonaire, gai- iantly. \"~May 1 lie perrnItted to, asli the nemne of Vhs Young lady?\" Tlieo's cheelis dinipied at lm, for sile was very please'dladeed at bis ennouaicemient about Saille. It clear- cd the declis for baurie at home, she considered. Rt was declded eventuehly that Tubby should accornpay bis brathel' ln-la-w-eleet ta St. George's Square, returnIng laVer to, dine witli Saxon et the 'Cecil, where lie had talion- a suite of mroos for hîiself and the Moor- houses. \"ýBut You will see me at the Chase to-morrow, without Laul,\" Tubby said to Theo as t11ey withdrew to a corner together before parting. \"I shall bring my father's blessing with me, I linow-tbougb very littie elie, l'in -orry to say, my poor child.\" \"Don'ýt, Tub'by!\" The brown eyes fiashed witbi sudden tears. \"As if I x4anted anything else 'but you.\" \"A badl bargain for you, kiddie. But I'mi going to worli in future. No more philandering-no more gambling. If you'll throw in your lucli with mine, and if there isn't a 'billet here, I'mi ready to go abroad. Would you corne?\" \"To the end of the world,\" she breathed softly. There was a pause. \"Beastly places, these palm-courts, for saying good-bye in,\" observed Tubby. \"I'm afraid we must save Up for to-morrow, kid.\" Wbule they were talking and Laurie lAad gone to fetch bis bat and coa-t, leaving Fenella with the Moorhouses, Ferdinand Saxon, seating birnself, tooli out a diminutive pocliet cheýque- booki and a stylo. After writing a cheque la four fig- ures, lie signalledl a waiter and asked for a sheet of -paper and an envelope. This being brouglit, lie indited a brief message, enclosed lt witb the chieque in the envelope and addressed It to Mrs. Laurence Pridlîam. Then, wlth a smile of satisfaction, hie 1rejoined the others and tooli bis part in tbe farewells, finally placing the envelope ln Fenella's hand. \"We are going to be great friends, I hope,\" lie said, \"and it seem to me there's a possibility of our being con- nections in the future.\" He paused to looki towards Theo and Tubby. \"I hlope Mr. Pridhan' xvil alir\u003ew me to 1resent my littie wedding gift to his bride.\" F ENELLA blushed a vivid rose- colour and accepted the envelope unhesitatingly. \"I1 have neyer,\" continued Saxon, Ilfelt so mucli pleasure la a wedding glft as I do to-day. As an aId man, Mr. Pridham, and under such ex- ceptional circurnstances, You won' t refuse me that pleasure I know. A wedding-day la a special occasion and 1 dlaimi aîl the usual privileges.\" \"It ls awfully hind of you, Mr. Saxon,\" Fenella replied, and began to open the envelope. \"R1end lt at your leisure,\" hie sald. \"I1 hope this is only au revoir and we sil rneet soon again.\" After his departure Fenella opened the envelope. The message was a obaracterlstC one. \"For the sal of the littie chlld 'whbrn we bath love, and whose Ile you saved, accept my homage and with it this smaîl gift, to rexnind. you of phitt I shaîl neyer farget. Ferdin- and !Saxon.\" She .looked at the chequ e and bield it out to hier husband vilth ýdismay. 'ýLaurle!\" sbe gasped, \"It's for TWO tbousand pounds! Wbat a wonderful old man. I wish lie hadn't gleen me so rnucb except-well-'I shahl not corne to, you se enp'ty-handed, ýLaurle. I can't send 1V bacli, since lie put it ln this way.\" Laurle was contented tha.t she should do as she thouglit best. Money neyer counted with him, except as a necessar means to, an end. \"Vie mus.t jog along aow,\" hesald, Mark your linen with Required by schools and colleges. Any came in fast color threafi can be woyeo, into fine, white catubrie tapa. 12.00 for 12 dos., 11.25 for 6 doz., 85e for 3 dot, dut\u003e' paifi. More than mavetheir cost b\u003e' preveuting laundr\u003e' louse. Orders 11Ud hâ a weeh tbrmugh your dealer. flr write for sampte., order blatiks, cataogu\u003co woyee ternes, trimmings, friiuings, etc,, direct to J. \u0026 J. CASH. Ltd. SOI\u0026 St. James St., cot e. n or 305 Chutenut St., So. Norwalk\u003c. cienl U.S.A. IA Truly IIelpful Environmient fer your daughter at the poiod, wlse f., 0-f For prospectus and -teras, write -thei principal 150 i IL 1.WarnerU.A.,D.D. St Thoin Ont (BASE \u0026I SANB ORN'S SEAL BRAND COFFEE91 SATISFIES.ý 1Packedt iat ozre \u0026. tw» 1pouazd CHASE \u0026 SANBORN MONTREAL. 149",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. CONVENIENCE W ITHOUT a donlit a convertible Davenport or Divanette is a convenience; wlien needed It is alisoiuteiy Indispensable. It permits of accommodations lieing made for tlie guest wlio unexpectedly nemains oven nriglit, witli- tut inconvenience to the hostess. WHETHER it be a Davenport or Divanette \u003coccupy - ing but 41h ft. of wall space) Is, of course, a matter of preference and s p a c e accommodations, but whether it meets every requirement of such an article depends entirely upon the kind It is. If it is a lac\" it will. Foilf Itisa UM It will neyer by any detail o f appearance in its day- time use suggest its other purpose. that of a bed. In service as a bed it will mneet every requirement 0f comafort that could be made of It. T HERE arae tliree 1types of the Ound Kin'd. The Somer- sauitic, tlie Debuxe and the Divanette. Eacli type accompiielies the same purpose; perheps one kind will flnd great- er favon in your consifi. eration than another. If it is alBu it is the final possibility of choice. The new booklet, \"The House That Grew,\" ie ready f o r distribution. WIlI you send for your copy to-day, as the edi- tion la limaited? The furniture, store you kn w and ike to patronize i, the store that solla the Mandu kind THE In4 BED COMPANY LIMITED 16 Clifford Street TORONTO GRAND RAPIDS Schools and Colleges ME Il\u0026 AVERGAL ,COLLEGE 1Jarvls St., T Oronto Thorough education on modern lines. irit Year University work. Havergal Diploma, Honour Matricuistion, and other exanx natians, Domestic Science Department. Separate Junior School. Gymnasium, Large Grounde for Outdoor Gamnes, Skating Rink, Swicning B1ath. AVERGAL-ON-TH E-H IL. St. Cilr Ave., Toronto Dayand BoaningSchool for NorthernToronto, Separate JuniorSchool for Chîidren under tonyearsaciage. Large playing grounda,--crlcket, tentis, bakethali, hockey. Schoola re-open Sept 100%. For illustrated calendars and prospectus apply to the Bursar. R. MILLICHAMP. Hon. Sec..Treaa. 1 A RESIDENTIA.L SCHOOL FOR GIRLS Situated opposite Qucen's Park, Bloor Street West Re-opens Tuesday, September8t Calendar meIl.on requset J. A. PATaRgs, IC.C.. Uns. A. R. GuzwoaV, *sproldat Prîncil1 11 feel an awful gooseberry,\" pouted rheo. \"I arn a superfluous woman! You haci better put me into another compartment, Laurie. You two muet have sucli lieaps to say to one Lo another. It's a sort of miracle your being married, isn't it?\" That was how it seemed to Fenella. LC The gate of heaven liad opened suddeniy, and she liad passed in- with baurne! As they approaclied Fleet Station, ail tlie old familier siglits sootlied their emotions, reminding them tliat everyday life went on its course, in spi-te of ail the i11e and accidents that tiecli ls heir to. Th'le glimpses of the canal, in spite of the sunshine glUnting on is dark water, made 'Fenella, sliudder with sudden remembrance, but the view of Spinney Cliase, illumined by a food of sunset gold, reassured hier. Ail the horrible past was a ilightmare-dis- pelled when bannie awakened. At the lodge gate Laurie alighted. \"X1 want to, see mother*quite alone or first,\" lie sald, \"let me go on aliead of er you, and foliow in five minutes.\" He walked quickly up the drive, and for five minutes Fenelia and Theo gat siiently glde by side, Theo's band-L~ resting canessiýngly on lier new sister- in-law's, arin. W~y HIEREIS Tlieo?\" aslied Agnes, Was 8he stepped from the ver- andali to greet Laurie. 'iComing in a moment,\" lie answer- ed. \"Wliere's mo\u003ether?\" Agnes inýdicated tlie littie noprning- room wliere -Mrs. Pridli retired always, to write lier letters and con- duct thie business of life; and lie hastened tliere. \"Laurie--my boy-yon are bacli again!\" Mrs. Pridliam looked up eagerly. Slie liad been sounding tlie depths, of lier own lieart dnring the iast two days and learning tliat neither wealtli nor society nDr even a titie can give undivided satisfac- tion. Tliene ie invariaebly a liuman nàte that must be in tone witli thp- daiiy life to cneete 1iarmony, a lieart initenest wlierewitli to make a cage for the (Bine Bird, alwýays ready to lie on the wlng. '\"Mdtler!\" H1e put lis axms fondly round lier and kissed lier twioe. Tlien lie told lier evenytling tliat; had liap- pened up to tlie moment et tlie Hotel Cecil wlien lie asked Feneila to make lier sacrifice for hlm complete. '\"Now,\" lie said~ \"it is in your power to neward 'Fen for ail lier goodnese and devotion and to malte me supremely lihappy by taking lier to your lieart. Motlier, rememben tliat odds are egainst happlness of success of every klnd. Remember that no amout of money can bny them. if Fate e against you. Rememben liow neanly ours wes ail eliipwnecked ,by thie merest string of accidents and co- Incidences, and tlien tell me if you stili deny me my lieart's desire.\" She looked into lis eager face long and earnestly. \"bLanne,\" sie said, 1'thlnk liow your fatlier lias toiied- thlnk of tlie years it lias taken hlm, and me-for I have helped-to build tliis up. T'hink of the disappointment it muet lie for a man wlio lias done ail lie lias, to flnd that lits only son wlio wlll Inherit It prefers to marry a penniiess nobody.\" ~He lnterrupted lier gently. \"She is the girl I love,\" lie said, \"who liolds my liearît in the hllow of lier hand. Witliout lier I should lie iost. Slie te my gulding-star. Mother, give lier to me. Tell me If -I may marry hier wltli your consent, and tlia)t you wlll lie good to lier for my sake. Think what il means to me to lie divlded be- tween- the. girl wliom 1 adore and -the motlier wlio comes, firat of everyone to me in tlie world. Oniy such a littie ,wile ago and my life was neither your8 non my own to malte or mur. [ was Just a useless log, witli no past or present or future. Now ail tliree hnave 'been given bacit to, me and I oniy ae1k une itliug more. D)ou't you cane enougli to give lt to me?\" Again .tley looked et one anothen nnd then *the liarness ln Mrs. Prid- iain's face broke up and she smiled tLenderly. 'ýCaa'e for you!\" ýhe sald. \"I be- Reopefla Tuesday, Septernber A tlionongl course iu ail bf music and dnamatic art at ate cost Gend for year book and currý ttie L. Armîstrong, Registrar. F Linforth Wi Mus. Bsc- TORONTO Eonservatory et MU A. S. V/OGT, Mus- Musical DireCt\u003c REOPENS TUESDALY,.SEPl EMb1 A national institution, unr'v\u0026 Canada as regards the distmecuec faculty and the superior charadec buildings and general equipineat. Send for YEAR BOOK and CENTRE SYLLABUS of 19141 ,pamphlet descriptive of the V Residence. Conservatory Scheol of Expfr\u00264 Special Caiendar. F. H. KiZcatrick, Ph. Pr Publie Reading, O,.atory phys Vocal Culture. Draunstie Art \" ture. CHOOSE 'WITII CA The long, successful reCO ) 4 MMMC, O guardians. For full informin w1 il 1 1 Kindel VDivanette Design Sheraton DAY 8-N IGMT SERVICE NEW YORK Ridley Collegze St. Catharinell, Oit RESIDEMTAL ICHOOL FO OS The Schoot han won Matricule- tion scholarobilp tu four out of the lasat AvIe cears. Tbre. woe won In Separate buildings and \"ctAl ,,,zpen WediesaySept 9. Eov. j. o. ILLER. ILA., D.C.L. MrUnR\"a Schools and Co11ei ndon Conservatory of Muai School of Elocution, Limit INDON, - - - ON ý",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. 'liBve I would give you the moon if you really wanted lt!\" \"D1earest,\" hie answered, \"you don't kflOW11 what it is to me 'that you SliO1uld say if. Vou'l guess when 1 teIl You that I married Fen by special liCefise to-day. Listen! Don't blame 1i, or take back what you have said. It was the Only right -thing to do. She eOtl»d flOt COMie back here in any other waY, and after ail she has done for 11y 'Bake, 1 could flot let hier face the wOrld alone. She is neither penniless UQi' a flobody, but a girl whom every- \"\"1 WOuId be Proud to know, as Mr. Saxon' aidto-day.\"I \"Thbe filllonaire?\", Lauie answered* in the affirmative anld tOld the story of the wedding Pi'BSBIt..aîsOo0f Salue's engagement. 'Wli didn't you say ail this bie- foi'ey\" M4rs. Pridham asked. '\"Salle heln en gaged, makes a great dif- ference, Of course.\" (e8B Maire none,\" hie said. 'Il Wale ou to give your consent of YoUr free will and out of love for Pr eAn You've done it, mother, tiaa te Lord! Now let us -tell' fMlier. If he doesn't taire very ci'lI to he suddenness of it, you SSiOoth R over for us-and I know wey ent together to -the library T~i'ater an interval, Fen and anel A'les joined them. wit Oalk e up to her father and It ier al around bis neck. ýerer 8 e sa!d, \"Tubby Maule- ( Said 't es.' 1e has explained ,ai n to me a'bou't poor Liz 1 lie I S elieve in hlm. 'So does t tector, and he says hie doesn't th ere 111l 'be n more trouble pille at? asked Mr. Pridham Tib eongt eeh, \"are you and fil' ygoi toset Up hueepn br0a 1 Ou dress allowance, with anllk 11 clieese and hisses for the ý;a?,, sh\"' le said soberly, \"hie is going beliigrk. 80 arn I. We are tired of lJ5,ý9 frlvOlolJs and useiess, both of ear, the people of the Brit- IlItpire will bie celebrating 'lctory of Waterloo. It wilh Xremory of a century. 1915, and the field of Itime and place memor- SWill the British people \u003ecelebrae that tîme and iCtlng that the great trio, rinany aad Britain, are eu- keepîng the peace, or en- a mfore la the tragedy of ai ts pathos and bathos? 1 forecast. 're, Belgium la the prize- e world. It may bie that be another clshl of ,arme 'y field of Waterloo itself. lrrnany and Brîtain make Ito-day, as tliey did a cen- 'But this time the arrange- iferent, France and Britain Rigainst Germany. In 1815 il Germany Made commofi luat France. once more, 'uftres are fighting, not se ItiOti as a man. But this ýaDoheon la a German, not an. Napoleon was the past if Europe. Tlie Kaiser la 't Onle. Shades of Bluclier 'IgtOI1 and Napoleon-the 11.4 flashes next to tlie Brit- the German. the Germana and the BrIt- nmagnlficat, and the Frencli Who xviii sing the song anid wio xviii moan the the aext Waterloo? la a re s veral storles told of Wý1aterîoo. Napoleon was one of his perlodicallY Ivtoods the niglit before 1 18th o! June. The mor- 'and wltli It Blucher to elhngton. The battîe went lD)Olen,and when aIl hope y for hlm. hadl been cruslied ' Ilis officers: \"Gentlemen, Mr. and M'rs. Pridham looked at bier with a lenient smile. The prospect of their youngest daughter becoming Lady Brismain some day was soothing, and supplied the link with the old aristocracy which, in Laurie's case, had proved a missing one. -if thbis wretched affair would get settled,\" Mr. Pridham said, \"and give us a littie peace cf mind, 1 daresay mother and I\"-he glanced at his wife-\"could spa-re something ýto bellp you young people to jog aloag.\" Then lie went across to Fen and took hier hand in bath his. \"My dear,\" lie said, \"ýyou have hall more than your fair share of ail thus misery. You have fought a gallant figlit and we muet try and mahe it Up to you. I thinir Laurie has chosen well and wisely, and we shall be proud of you as his wife.\" H1e stooped and hissed bier on the forehead and then, stili holding bier band, led 'ler to bis wife. \"Mobther,\" ýhe siaid, \"«give a welcome to our neW daughter.\" Agnes slipped quietly out of the room and up to lier littie Oratory. The way seemed clear to bier now to bier heart's dearest wish; in imagination she saw herseif dedicatedl te, the ser- vice she longed to enter. But first she wanted to give thanlis for the consummation devoutly hop- ed for, just attainefi, and 'to pray that tbe hast sliadow of dishonour over the patb of those s0 dear to lier might bie dispelhed. As Fen and Laurie drove througb the London streets, on -their way back to the Cecil, sonne placards of the evening newspapers attraoted tlieir at- tention. \"CANAL. ILYSTERY SOLVED. EXTIRAORDINARY DISýCOVERY.\" Laurie stopped the taxi and hailed a paper 'boy running past. They turned to the hate news column eagerly, and wbat they read there hifted them1 ou't of the shadows irto the light. (Conciuded next weeh.) ail la bast. Let hlm save himself who can! \" * * a But it, is fot geaeralhy knowrt that Lord Acton autbenticated another saying of the Emperoras on the field of Waterloo. Napoheofi, when the allies could not bie stayed, retreated, and turning to bis aide, sald: \"Oh tbese English, these Engllab-tbeY are invincible! \" * * la They are already telling a story of Kitchener, Britain'a new Mînister for War. On bis appointment lie wentl te, the War Office. After lookiflg round and obervlng things, lie sbot a question at hae guide. \"Have you got a bied here,?\" \"No. my ýLord.\" \"Then get one,\" said K. of K. Kitcliener means to be on the Jobi. la la There are those who thinh It a slg- nificant thlag that Wlnaton Oburcli- 111, who lias been sucli a Successfil sea-dog, was neyer made Minister for War. As A. G. Gardiner says of hlma he lias eeen more wara than any man of hie age, and wrltten more books \u003etlîan any soldier living. A story la tohd of hlm wlien lie liad been made a prîsoner of war la one8 campalgn. A general of the oppoalng forces belli up the train that bore \"Wlnnle\" and hils felIow-pi501irs. The generai was, struck by this young man wltli the near-red hair, wuo, gave hlmsel! Up. \"May I have special privih.eges?I am a war correspondent,\" said the young man, witli the utmost Sang froid. \"lYou figlit too well to bie treated a a civilian,\" came the general's, retort. A Marlboroughi once won Blenheimi for the Engliah. And thîs present restiesa Marlborough knows very welh how to, be a brave solier: The BIGGEST five cents' worth of refreshing, beneficial enjoyment to be found. It satisfies the desire for sweets, without burdening the stomnach. It helpe teeth, breath, appetite and digestion. Re surpe it'a WRGLEY'S Every package tightly aê,aled Chew it after every mneal Head Master -J. TYSON WILLIAMS, B.1 ]Emmanuel Colle\", Camnbridge. Thiswef-lcownboadIg seboolfor boyp la ettuated about 100 miles frorn Montrea, on tbe GT.,O P.Pt,,an,] gooton\u0026 Mains Ry., giN ng ensynccýse to NewYork and ]15temx states de woll aall lointo, ain = :a The buildi[ngs fr the upor and proparatory acbool are beautifully situated. lip-to-data, satar and wal unl]td oospif ,ryn,tum, playroomos as \"eIl as extensive playgroitnds. weoys iaea cprie foR M .. Klojrtm, thea UniyUSltdm and BusIal. ifa by an ettlis.snt staff o Mauters, mffltiy graduatm% of iEug1i-h 17,1vemlies. For £'akndas, Inormeation, etc., alMIV la t he Head Maser. War Stories, Old and New By HUGH S. EAYRS ASHBURY COLLEGE ROCKLIFFE PARK, OTTAWA. BOARDING SCHOOL FOR BOYS modern iroprool buldings on beautiful site of ton acres. NO 'DAY BOYS TAKEN. Classes are amali and Individual attention la padto a ch pp IN MAY, 1914 FOR THE SECOND TIME IN FOUR YEARS, THE SCHQOL OSTAIN'ED effRST PLACE IN THE R.M.C. ENTRANCE. ALL CANDI- DATES SENT IN PASSED. School, Re n Se tober Oth 194. For Calondar apply: OZ. . wma:hmBmILZ(Oxon.\u003e. Headmaster,",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. RepresentatIve for the Dominion of Canada: Mr. Frank S. Bail, P. O Box 577, *Toronto. Phone No. Main 2875. Telegrams, *Onît,, '1 u ronto. Electric Service Means comfort, convenience, economy, and safety. The home that is completely equipped with electri- cal devices is a happy one. Ail the drudgery of housekeeping is eliminated by electricîty. You cari wash, iron, sew, sweep, cook, keep cool in summer and warm in winter, by means of electrical apparatus designed especially to, relieve you of un- necessary and fatiguing labor. At our showrooms ail these devices are ready for your inspection. Competent demonstrators wili operate and explain them for you. The Toronto Electric Ligaht Co., Limited \"AT \u003eOUR SERVICE\" 12 Adelaide St. E. Téléphone Adelaide 404 THE CANADIAN BANK 0F CMEC SIR EDMUND WALKER, C.V.O., L D., D.C.L., Prosident ALEXANDER LAIRD, G.neroîl Manager JOHN AIRD, Ass't General Manage r CAPITAL, -$15,OOOOO RESERVE FOND, $13,50086O SAVINGS BANK ACCOUNTS Interest at the current rate is allowed on ail deposits of $1 and upwards. Careful attention is given to every account. Small accounts are welcomed. Accounts may be opened and or erated by mail. Accounts may be opened in the names of two or more persons, with.- drawals to be mnade by any one o themn or by the survivor. IN ANSWrRING ADVERTISEMENTS MENTION \"THE CANADIAN COURIER. There'sSomethiiig in theEnglishAfter I VE been meditating iately that when everything is toid, There's something in the Englieh af ter ail; T.hey may be teo bent on conques*., and toe eager after goid, But there's something In the Eng- lish after ail; Though their sins and faults are many, and I won't exhaust my breath By endeavouring to tell you of them ail, Yet they have a sense of duty, and they'ii face it to the death, Se there's something in the English after ail. If you're wounded by a savage foe and bugles sound \"'Retire!\" Theres something in the English after ail; You may bet your if e tbey'ii carry you beyonýd the zone of fire, For there's eomething In the Eng- iish after ail; Yes, although t.heir guns be empty, and their blond be ebbing fast, And te stay by wounded comrades be to fall. Yet they'ii set týheir teeth. like bull- doge and proteet you to the las, Or they'ii die-like English soldiers -after ail. When the seas demand their t! and a British ship goes dc There's something in the after ail; There's no panic rush for safety, the weak are left to drowfl For there's something in the E after ail. But the women and the childrE the first to leave the wrec With the crew in hand, as as a wail, And the captain le the iast te upon the sinking deck, So there's something in theE after ail. Tbough the half of Europe hates and would joy in their dec Yet there's something ia the E after aul; They may scorn the seantY nul o! the thin red 'British liail Yet they fear its lean bat' after ail; For they know that from the\u003c to the drummer in the bal ýThere us not a single soldier il ail But would go te biind destructiol their country te demnafd, And cail It simpiy \"duty\"-.f' -Bertrand Shad Britain's Answer MR. KIPLING7S PROPHETIC VISION. The offers recsived and accepted from the Dominions within lese w eek after the deciaratien of war suggest to the \"Morning Post\" the r cation ef Mr. Rudyard Kipling's weiî-knowa pem. T RULY ye core of The Bood; slower to bless than to ban; Little used to lie down at the bidding of any man. Flesh of tbe flesh that I bred, bons cf the bons that I bare; Stark as your sons shail be-stern as your fathers were. Deeper than speech our love, strenger than life our tetber, But we do not fall on the neck nor kiss when we come together, My arm le nothing weak, my strength le net gene by; Sons, 1 have borne many sons, but my dugs are rot dry. Draw now the three-fold knot flrm on the nîne-fold bande, And the Law that ye make shahl be law aftsr the rule of yeur la\"1 This for the waxen Heath, and that for the Wattle-bloem. This fer the Mapie-leaf, and that for the seuthern Broom. Tbe Law that ye make shall be law and I de flot press my will, Because ye are Sons e! The Blood and eall me Mother etili. Now muet ye spea:k te your kinsmen and they muet speak to, yolU After the use of the Engllsb, In straigbt-flung worde and few. Go te your work and fbe strong, haiting net in your ways, Bauiking the end half-wen for an instant dole of praise. Stand te your work and be wiseecertainl o! sword and Pen, Who are neither cildren ner Geds,, but men in a world of me\"' To Lucast 1a, on Going to the Wai T ELL me not, Sweet, I am unkind, Tbat from the nunnery 0f thy chaste breast and quiet nuind To war and armes I fly. True, a new mîstress now I dbase, The first foe In the fild; And with a stronger faitb ent' A sword, a borse and ;hie] Yet*this inconstancy is such As you, too, shall adore; I could flot love thee, Dear, Loved I not honour more. -colonel LO' The, Man Who lKeeps His Hei ( \"Britain's Motto: Business as UsuaI.\"ý-H. E. Morganl.) Tr HERE'S a man who flghts fer England, and he'll keep ber' still , He will guard her from dishoneur In the market and the sli He will save ber homes from terror on the ilelds of DailY Hle's the man who sticks to business, hers the mani who keeps bi$ Let the oe wbo strikes at England hear ber wheels of commerce Let the ships that war with England ses her factory furnace burfl' For the fos most fears the cannon, and bis hsart most quals with Wbsn behlnd the man In khakl Is the man who keeps bis hsad. Brand hlm, traiter and assassin wbo witb miser's coward mood Has tbe gold locked up la secret and bis larderas tored with food, Who bas cast adrift bis workers, wbo lies swsating In bis bsd, And wbo snarîs te hear the laugbter of the man wbo keeps bils Let the poor man teach the rlch maxn, for the poor man's coatW le from day today to seek work, day, by day to war* wlth lfe, And the peor man's home hangs ever by a frail and brittîs tbread And tbe poor man's often bungry, ,iut the poor man keeps his ii151 Wbsn thse ebIpe come back from slaugbter, and the troope march war; Wben tbe bavee strswn bebind us threats tbe road that lies befOr Every hero shahl be welcomsd, svsry orpbau shall be fed By the mnan wbo stucet to business, by thse man who kspt bis isead. -H..arold",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. lLighter Vein Most Ufljust.-\"Your busband, madam, 1 SUfterjflg from voluntary inertia.\" 00oo feliow! And here V've been tell- lng hüm he's just lazy. \"-Baltimore Anierican. AMere Shadow.A junior barrîster wGfi hurrylng across to the law courts when hie alrnost collided with a cab. The drt,er, who had Pulled Up with a jerk, PrOnounced his opinion in plain English about absent-.minded people. hCul 't YOu see the bloomin' 'oss ?\" eO kO With ithering sarcasmn. rite *l! gSPed the startled bar- rite ýl0 n contemptuously at the Olir to the curb. \"I didn't see YOis bodrse wh en 1 stood in front of hlm,- he b41 \"bt I can see sometblng when o 00k at* hin sldeways. \"-The Argonaut. P'vf1 an asylum two worthies ilaned Sardie and Tamn formed a plan to iliake their escape. Sandie said to Tain: a n doon and l'Il get on yer back ne \" tap o' the wall and haut ye 13lii4 on, 1 the top of the wall and \"Ta the other aide, saying: fot thlnJ Ye'il better to bide anither r'c,± for YOU're no near sane yet.\" \"cotne ~I0BStage.-Hoe Walter- iiedi air ir, You really must go off to a-bZg \u003cYaWns.) Why, the dawn's it do llrw .Le it break-and put in thre bill, waiter.\"-Punch. ýse1Id,.-h Ancient Mariner- aier 'haflesd.Th W, . ng2 I should think I 'ave, Yo'0 Yî WeInkleton used to be that quiet t1ow. Whear a Pin drop! But look at It th 1Wba '% WIth the picture palace and thi ri. y1t and themi swing-boats and 111hr 1bzai' o to be a fair y4~IC.....he(after seeing her liter- tlre)r In a bathing-suit for the first ao.t~Or goOdness sake, Henry. say ngbrillant..Lf tell ofpite Of Himsef.-...n Denver they dyIha Younxg Britisher who will some ledjO aihý title, and who not long ago t8lh3 daughter of a supposedly A t n\u0026I1 Of thal, town. ..atinrtho s after the Inarriage, the Ain took~ the husband aside. u 11, rylid!\" bie exclaimed. 'Trac- co e ioenlt la gone!\" erI gatve was a good loser, however. ai]xl4 ae vent to a long, îow whîstle, \"b, -jliied Witb a Uittie laugh: veoY Glre \u003e e Idi rry for el. 1--Itwas a sweet, sad et eeWas hardly a dry band- the. in the house. But one man in b esivlen rritated is neighbours celraib refusing to take the per- ee ilig h ProPer spirit. Instead 'b e, e laughed. While others 111111gr gtbeir eyes and endeavouring thio-b-, bis face beamed wlth i I beMetaan burst into Inappropriate ., 1 rdt ly by his side turned upon ' nl' rOw wlrat brought y-you k.*t e4 with streaming eyes, ; gh9er hand against ber aching it 19 lit 1if t Y-yo don't Ilke the p-play 1t -let Other P-people enjoy ltl\" \u0026htkl i 0\"-Ms.Wbittler-\"What de- ]ý JEr Your dauthter bas!\" ,Uat ben DrOdly-' Yes. You see, Sl waY fromn home so much.\" you belleve in I dreaaned you me. What la )u were dream- Woe to ail mankind, ir wo-man. with love so kîid, d lt woo-man. Mnd witb pride, 'ckets brimniing, i of wbiis err1 whim-men. -Corneil Widow. Brains have a higher market value to-day than at any, other time in the historY of the wvorid. The mnan with ideas-the manl who can think quickly and accurately-can conimrand his ovwn price. Brainworkers should realize the vital importance of the food they eat and drink. Unless body and brain be properly nourished, it is impossible to do the best wvork. A bottie of O'KEEFE'S PILSENER LAGER is a bouîle of liquid food and strength for ail workers. It restores the flagging energy and refreshes the wvhole systemn. Order a case from your dealer anid have a bottle for dinner to-day. Ali O'Keefe beers are brewed 01147 from pure barley malt, choiceat hops and filtered water. 00'KEEFF. BREWERY Co LIMITED TORONTO",
         "Beautyecret, Toayone of ancient Egypt's lost arts is becomning universal' kn:)wledge. Apparently Nitoc ris, Hatasu, Cleopatra, and other queens of E'ypt, ail used Palm and Olive Oils at their daily toiles. g To these two natural sources they owed much of their celebrated beauty. No ot. cleansing, In the used in ni olive is Palm a For over three thousand years these enriching oils have been fragrance famous for their cleansing, softening and beautifying virtues. Orient. So we use themn in Palmolive Soap. We unite themn in a Fifteer scîentific blend which greatly enhances their old-time eficacy. luxury 'W Palmnolive READ THIS TRANSLA' (1) As for her who desires (2) She is wont to anoint with 1 oùt of palm and olives. (3) There cause to flourish ointments the ski». (4) As for the oil of Palm I t olives, I there is not thei; revivifyintg, mak ng I s purifying the ski». EXPLANA TORY NOý This is a translation of thie palm and olive oils written in glyphies of 3,000 years ago. The characters and the trans, correctly shown according to ent-day k»owledge of the sufr Read hierogtyphics down, aL ber combmaâtion we know of is so Sooti so truly beneficial to tenderest skins. form of Palmüolivýe these healthful ojis ani ijilions of world homes. The utter purityo0 evidenced by the delicate -green color- id Olive Oils. The exquisite is a veritable breath f rom the icents per cake puts this truly regal ithin easy reach of ail. In hard water or soif, hot water or cold, for toilet, bath or shampoo, Palmolivelathers freely andreadily, cleanses and refreshes in a way that is strictly \"PALM OLI VE.\" PALMOLIVE SHAMPOO -the Olive 011 Bhampoo- and adds a dellgbtful touch after the use of Palm- makes the liair lustrous and healthy and la excellent olive Soap. Price 50 cents. for the scalp. It rinses out easlly and leaves the hair THREEFOLD SAMPLE OFFER-Liberal cake o f soft and tractable. Frice 50 cents. Palinolive, bottie of Shanipoo and tube of Cream, packed lu neat saxnple package, ail mafled on ré- PALMOLIVE CREAM cleanses the pores of the skin ceîpt of! five 2-cent stamps. B. J. JOHNSON SOAP COMPANY, Limited, 155-157 George Street,, Toronto, Ont. AMERICAN ADDRESS: B. J. Johnson Soap Company, Inc., Mlhvaukee, Wia."
      ],
